Even as the sun with purple-col­our’d face

Had ta’en his last leave of the weep­ing morn,

Rose-cheek’d Adonis tried him to the chase;

Hunt­ing he lov’d, but love he laugh’d to scorn;

Sick-thoughted Venus makes amain unto him,

And like a bold-fac’d suitor ’gins to woo him.



“Thrice fairer than my­self,” thus she began,

“The field’s chief flower, sweet above com­pare,

Stain to all nymphs, more lovely than a man,

More white and red than doves or roses are;

Nature that made thee, with her­self at strife,

Saith that the world hath end­ing with thy life.



“Vouch­safe, thou won­der, to alight thy steed,

And rein his proud head to the saddle-bow;

If thou wilt deign this fa­vour, for thy meed

A thou­sand honey secrets shalt thou know:

Here come and sit, where never ser­pent hisses,

And be­ing set, I’ll smother thee with kisses;



“And yet not cloy thy lips with loath’d sati­ety,

But rather fam­ish them amid their plenty,

Mak­ing them red, and pale, with fresh vari­ety:

Ten kisses short as one, one long as twenty:

A sum­mer’s day will seem an hour but short,

Be­ing wasted in such time-be­guil­ing sport.”



With this she seiz­eth on his sweat­ing palm,

The pre­ced­ent of pith and live­li­hood,

And trem­bling in her pas­sion, calls it balm,

Earth’s sov­er­eign salve to do a god­dess good:

Be­ing so en­rag’d, de­sire doth lend her force

Cour­ageously to pluck him from his horse.



Over one arm the lusty courser’s rein,

Under her other was the tender boy,

Who blush’d and pouted in a dull dis­dain,

With leaden ap­pet­ite, un­apt to toy;

She red and hot as coals of glow­ing fire,

He red for shame, but frosty in de­sire.



The stud­ded bridle on a ragged bough

Nimbly she fastens;—O! how quick is love!—

The steed is stalled up, and even now

To tie the rider she be­gins to prove:

Back­ward she push’d him, as she would be thrust,

And gov­ern’d him in strength, though not in lust.



So soon was she along, as he was down,

Each lean­ing on their el­bows and their hips:

Now doth she stroke his cheek, now doth he frown,

And ’gins to chide, but soon she stops his lips,

And kiss­ing speaks, with lust­ful lan­guage broken,

“If thou wilt chide, thy lips shall never open.”



He burns with bash­ful shame, she with her tears

Doth quench the maiden burn­ing of his cheeks;

Then with her windy sighs and golden hairs

To fan and blow them dry again she seeks:

He saith she is im­mod­est, blames her miss;

What fol­lows more, she murders with a kiss.



Even as an empty eagle, sharp by fast,

Tires with her beak on feath­ers, flesh and bone,

Shak­ing her wings, de­vour­ing all in haste,

Till either gorge be stuff’d or prey be gone;

Even so she kiss’d his brow, his cheek, his chin,

And where she ends she doth anew be­gin.



Forced to con­tent, but never to obey,

Pant­ing he lies, and breatheth in her face.

She fee­deth on the steam, as on a prey,

And calls it heav­enly mois­ture, air of grace;

Wish­ing her cheeks were gar­dens full of flowers,

So they were dew’d with such dis­tilling showers.



Look, how a bird lies tangled in a net,

So fasten’d in her arms Adonis lies;

Pure shame and aw’d res­ist­ance made him fret,

Which bred more beauty in his angry eyes:

Rain ad­ded to a river that is rank

Per­force will force it over­flow the bank.



Still she en­treats, and pret­tily en­treats,

For to a pretty ear she tunes her tale;

Still is he sul­len, still he lours and frets,

’Twixt crim­son shame and an­ger ashy pale:

Be­ing red, she loves him best; and be­ing white,

Her best is bet­ter’d with a more de­light.



Look how he can, she can­not choose but love;

And by her fair im­mor­tal hand she swears,

From his soft bosom never to re­move,

Till he take truce with her con­tend­ing tears,

Which long have rain’d, mak­ing her cheeks all wet;

And one sweet kiss shall pay this count­less debt.



Upon this prom­ise did he raise his chin,

Like a dive-dap­per peer­ing through a wave,

Who, be­ing look’d on, ducks as quickly in;

So of­fers he to give what she did crave;

But when her lips were ready for his pay,

He winks, and turns his lips an­other way.



Never did pas­sen­ger in sum­mer’s heat

More thirst for drink than she for this good turn.

Her help she sees, but help she can­not get;

She bathes in wa­ter, yet her fire must burn:

“O, pity,” ’gan she cry, “flint-hearted boy!

’Tis but a kiss I beg; why art thou coy?



“I have been woo’d as I en­treat thee now,

Even by the stern and dire­ful god of war,

Whose sinewy neck in battle ne’er did bow,

Who con­quers where he comes in every jar;

Yet hath he been my cap­tive and my slave,

And begg’d for that which thou un­ask’d shalt have.



“Over my al­tars hath he hung his lance,

His bat­ter’d shield, his un­con­trolled crest,

And for my sake hath learn’d to sport and dance,

To toy, to wan­ton, dally, smile, and jest;

Scorn­ing his churl­ish drum and en­sign red

Mak­ing my arms his field, his tent my bed.



“Thus he that over­rul’d I over­sway’d,

Lead­ing him pris­oner in a red rose chain:

Strong-tem­per’d steel his stronger strength obey’d,

Yet was he servile to my coy dis­dain.

O, be not proud, nor brag not of thy might,

For mast’ring her that foil’d the god of fight!



“Touch but my lips with those fair lips of thine—

Though mine be not so fair, yet are they red—

The kiss shall be thine own as well as mine.

What see’st thou in the ground? hold up thy head:

Look in mine eye­balls, there thy beauty lies;

Then why not lips on lips, since eyes in eyes?



“Art thou ashamed to kiss? then wink again,

And I will wink; so shall the day seem night;

Love keeps his rev­els where there are but twain;

Be bold to play, our sport is not in sight:

These blue-vein’d vi­ol­ets whereon we lean

Never can blab, nor know not what we mean.



“The tender spring upon thy tempt­ing lip

Shows thee un­ripe; yet mayst thou well be tasted:

Make use of time, let not ad­vant­age slip;

Beauty within it­self should not be wasted:

Fair flowers that are not gather’d in their prime

Rot and con­sume them­selves in little time.



“Were I hard-fa­vour’d, foul, or wrinkled old,

Ill-nur­tur’d, crooked, churl­ish, harsh in voice,

O’er­worn, des­pised, rheum­atic and cold,

Thick-sighted, bar­ren, lean, and lack­ing juice,

Then mightst thou pause, for then I were not for thee;

But hav­ing no de­fects, why dost ab­hor me?



“Thou canst not see one wrinkle in my brow;

Mine eyes are grey and bright, and quick in turn­ing;

My beauty as the spring doth yearly grow,

My flesh is soft and plump, my mar­row burn­ing;

My smooth moist hand, were it with thy hand felt,

Would in thy palm dis­solve, or seem to melt.



“Bid me dis­course, I will en­chant thine ear,

Or, like a fairy, trip upon the green,

Or, like a nymph, with long dishevell’d hair,

Dance on the sands, and yet no foot­ing seen:

Love is a spirit all com­pact of fire,

Not gross to sink, but light, and will as­pire.



“Wit­ness this prim­rose bank whereon I lie;

These force­less flowers like sturdy trees sup­port me;

Two strength­less doves will draw me through the sky,

From morn till night, even where I list to sport me:

Is love so light, sweet boy, and may it be

That thou shouldst think it heavy unto thee?



“Is thine own heart to thine own face af­fected?

Can thy right hand seize love upon thy left?

Then woo thy­self, be of thy­self re­jec­ted,

Steal thine own free­dom, and com­plain on theft.

Nar­cissus so him­self him­self for­sook,

And died to kiss his shadow in the brook.



“Torches are made to light, jew­els to wear,

Dain­ties to taste, fresh beauty for the use,

Herbs for their smell, and sappy plants to bear:

Th­ings grow­ing to them­selves are growth’s ab­use:

Seeds spring from seeds, and beauty bree­deth beauty;

Thou wast be­got; to get it is thy duty.



“Upon the earth’s in­crease why shouldst thou feed,

Un­less the earth with thy in­crease be fed?

By law of nature thou art bound to breed,

That thine may live when thou thy­self art dead;

And so in spite of death thou dost sur­vive,

In that thy like­ness still is left alive.”



By this the love-sick queen began to sweat,

For where they lay the shadow had for­sook them;

And Titan, tired in the mid­day heat,

With burn­ing eye did hotly over­look them;

Wish­ing Adonis had his team to guide,

So he were like him and by Venus’ side.



And now Adonis with a lazy spright,

And with a heavy, dark, dis­lik­ing eye,

His lour­ing brows o’er­whelm­ing his fair sight,

Like misty va­pours when they blot the sky,

Sour­ing his cheeks, cries, “Fie, no more of love!

The sun doth burn my face; I must re­move.”



“Ay me,” quoth Venus, “young, and so un­kind?

What bare ex­cuses mak’st thou to be gone!

I’ll sigh ce­les­tial breath, whose gentle wind

Shall cool the heat of this des­cend­ing sun:

I’ll make a shadow for thee of my hairs;

If they burn too, I’ll quench them with my tears.



“The sun that shines from heaven shines but warm,

And lo I lie between that sun and thee:

The heat I have from thence doth little harm,

Thine eye darts forth the fire that bur­neth me;

And were I not im­mor­tal, life were done,

Between this heav­enly and earthly sun.



“Art thou ob­dur­ate, flinty, hard as steel,

Nay more than flint, for stone at rain re­len­teth?

Art thou a wo­man’s son, and canst not feel

What ’tis to love? how want of love tor­men­teth?

O, had thy mother borne so hard a mind,

She had not brought forth thee, but died un­kind.



“What am I, that thou shouldst con­temn me this?

Or what great danger dwells upon my suit?

What were thy lips the worse for one poor kiss?

Speak, fair; but speak fair words, or else be mute:

Give me one kiss, I’ll give it thee again,

And one for in­terest, if thou wilt have twain.



“Fie, life­less pic­ture, cold and sense­less stone,

Well-painted idol, im­age dull and dead,

Statue con­tent­ing but the eye alone,

Th­ing like a man, but of no wo­man bred!

Thou art no man, though of a man’s com­plex­ion,

For men will kiss even by their own dir­ec­tion.”



This said, im­pa­tience chokes her plead­ing tongue,

And swell­ing pas­sion doth pro­voke a pause;

Red cheeks and fiery eyes blaze forth her wrong;

Be­ing judge in love, she can­not right her cause:

And now she weeps, and now she fain would speak,

And now her sobs do her in­tend­ments break.



So­me­times she shakes her head and then his hand,

Now gaz­eth she on him, now on the ground;

So­me­times her arms in­fold him like a band:

She would, he will not in her arms be bound;

And when from thence he struggles to be gone,

She locks her lily fin­gers one in one.



“Fond­ling,” she saith, “since I have hemm’d thee here

Within the cir­cuit of this ivory pale,

I’ll be a park, and thou shalt be my deer;

Feed where thou wilt, on moun­tain or in dale:

Graze on my lips; and if those hills be dry,

Stray lower, where the pleas­ant foun­tains lie.



“Within this limit is re­lief enough,

Sweet bot­tom grass and high de­light­ful plain,

Round rising hil­locks, brakes ob­scure and rough,

To shel­ter thee from tem­pest and from rain:

Then be my deer, since I am such a park;

No dog shall rouse thee, though a thou­sand bark.”



At this Adonis smiles as in dis­dain,

That in each cheek ap­pears a pretty dimple:

Love made those hol­lows, if him­self were slain,

He might be bur­ied in a tomb so simple;

Fore­know­ing well, if there he came to lie,

Why there love lived, and there he could not die.



These lovely caves, these round en­chant­ing pits,

Open’d their mouths to swal­low Venus’ lik­ing.

Be­ing mad be­fore, how doth she now for wits?

Struck dead at first, what needs a second strik­ing?

Poor queen of love, in thine own law for­lorn,

To love a cheek that smiles at thee in scorn!



Now which way shall she turn? what shall she say?

Her words are done, her woes the more in­creas­ing;

The time is spent, her ob­ject will away,

And from her twin­ing arms doth urge re­leas­ing.

“Pity,” she cries; “some fa­vour, some re­morse!”

Away he springs and hasteth to his horse.



But, lo, from forth a copse that neigh­bours by,

A breed­ing jen­net, lusty, young and proud,

Adonis’ tramp­ing courser doth espy,

And forth she rushes, snorts and neighs aloud:

The strong-neck’d steed, be­ing tied unto a tree,

Break­eth his rein, and to her straight goes he.



Im­per­i­ously he leaps, he neighs, he bounds,

And now his woven girths he breaks asun­der;

The bear­ing earth with his hard hoof he wounds,

Whose hol­low womb re­sounds like heaven’s thun­der;

The iron bit he crush­eth ’tween his teeth,

Con­trolling what he was con­trolled with.



His ears up-prick’d; his braided hanging mane

Upon his com­pass’d crest now stand on end;

His nos­trils drink the air, and forth again,

As from a fur­nace, va­pours doth he send:

His eye, which scorn­fully glisters like fire,

Shows his hot cour­age and his high de­sire.



So­me­time he trots, as if he told the steps,

With gentle majesty and mod­est pride;

Anon he rears up­right, cur­vets and leaps,

As who should say, “Lo, thus my strength is tried,

And this I do to cap­tiv­ate the eye

Of the fair breeder that is stand­ing by.”



What reck­eth he his rider’s angry stir,

His flat­ter­ing “Holla,” or his “Stand, I say?”

What cares he now for curb or prick­ing spur?

For rich ca­par­is­ons or trap­pings gay?

He sees his love, and noth­ing else he sees,

Nor noth­ing else with his proud sight agrees.



Look, when a painter would sur­pass the life,

In limning out a well-pro­por­tion’d steed,

His art with nature’s work­man­ship at strife,

As if the dead the liv­ing should ex­ceed;

So did this horse ex­cel a com­mon one

In shape, in cour­age, col­our, pace and bone.



Round-hoof’d, short-join­ted, fet­locks shag and long,

Broad breast, full eye, small head, and nos­tril wide,

High crest, short ears, straight legs and passing strong,

Thin mane, thick tail, broad but­tock, tender hide:

Look, what a horse should have he did not lack,

Save a proud rider on so proud a back.



So­me­times he scuds far off, and there he stares;

Anon he starts at stir­ring of a feather;

To bid the wind a base he now pre­pares,

And where he run or fly they know not whether;

For through his mane and tail the high wind sings,

Fan­ning the hairs, who wave like feather’d wings.



He looks upon his love, and neighs unto her;

She an­swers him as if she knew his mind:

Be­ing proud, as fe­males are, to see him woo her,

She puts on out­ward strange­ness, seems un­kind,

Spurns at his love and scorns the heat he feels,

Beat­ing his kind em­brace­ments with her heels.



Then like a mel­an­choly mal­con­tent,

He vails his tail that, like a fall­ing plume,

Cool shadow to his melt­ing but­tock lent:

He stamps, and bites the poor flies in his fume.

His love, per­ceiv­ing how he was en­raged,

Grew kinder, and his fury was as­suaged.



His testy mas­ter goeth about to take him;

When, lo, the un­back’d breeder, full of fear,

Jeal­ous of catch­ing, swiftly doth for­sake him,

With her the horse, and left Adonis there:

As they were mad, unto the wood they hie them,

Out­strip­ping crows that strive to over­fly them.



All swoln with chaf­ing, down Adonis sits,

Ban­ning his bois­ter­ous and un­ruly beast:

And now the happy sea­son once more fits,

That love-sick love by plead­ing may be blest;

For lov­ers say, the heart hath treble wrong,

When it is barr’d the aidance of the tongue.



An oven that is stopp’d, or river stay’d,

Bur­neth more hotly, swel­leth with more rage:

So of con­cealed sor­row may be said;

Free vent of words love’s fire doth as­suage;

But when the heart’s at­tor­ney once is mute,

The cli­ent breaks, as des­per­ate in his suit.



He sees her com­ing, and be­gins to glow,

Even as a dy­ing coal re­vives with wind,

And with his bon­net hides his angry brow;

Looks on the dull earth with dis­turbed mind,

Tak­ing no no­tice that she is so nigh,

For all askance he holds her in his eye.



O, what a sight it was, wistly to view

How she came steal­ing to the way­ward boy!

To note the fight­ing con­flict of her hue,

How white and red each other did des­troy!

But now her cheek was pale, and by and by

It flash’d forth fire, as light­ning from the sky.



Now was she just be­fore him as he sat,

And like a lowly lover down she kneels;

With one fair hand she heaveth up his hat,

Her other tender hand his fair cheek feels:

His ten­derer cheek re­ceives her soft hand’s print,

As apt as new-fall’n snow takes any dint.



O, what a war of looks was then between them!

Her eyes pe­ti­tion­ers to his eyes su­ing;

His eyes saw her eyes, as they had not seen them;

Her eyes woo’d still, his eyes dis­dain’d the woo­ing:

And all this dumb play had his acts made plain

With tears, which, chorus-like, her eyes did rain.



Full gently now she takes him by the hand,

A lily prison’d in a gaol of snow,

Or ivory in an ala­baster band;

So white a friend en­girts so white a foe:

This beau­teous com­bat, wil­ful and un­will­ing,

Show’d like two sil­ver doves that sit a-billing.



Once more the en­gine of her thoughts began:

“O fairest mover on this mor­tal round,

Would thou wert as I am, and I a man,

My heart all whole as thine, thy heart my wound;

For one sweet look thy help I would as­sure thee,

Though noth­ing but my body’s bane would cure thee.”



“Give me my hand,” saith he, “why dost thou feel it?”

“Give me my heart,” saith she, “and thou shalt have it;

O, give it me, lest thy hard heart do steel it;

And be­ing steel’d, soft sighs can never grave it:

Then love’s deep groans I never shall re­gard,

Be­cause Adonis’ heart hath made mine hard.”



“For shame,” he cries, “let go, and let me go;

My day’s de­light is past, my horse is gone,

And ’tis your fault I am bereft him so:

I pray you hence, and leave me here alone;

For all my mind, my thought, my busy care,

Is how to get my pal­frey from the mare.”



Thus she replies: “Thy pal­frey as he should,

Wel­comes the warm ap­proach of sweet de­sire:

Af­fec­tion is a coal that must be cool’d;

Else, suf­fer’d, it will set the heart on fire:

The sea hath bounds, but deep de­sire hath none;

There­fore no mar­vel though thy horse be gone.



“How like a jade he stood, tied to the tree,

Servilely mas­ter’d with a leath­ern rein!

But when he saw his love, his youth’s fair fee,

He held such petty bond­age in dis­dain;

Throw­ing the base thong from his bend­ing crest,

En­fran­chising his mouth, his back, his breast.



“Who sees his true-love in her na­ked bed,

Teach­ing the sheets a whiter hue than white,

But, when his glut­ton eye so full hath fed,

His other agents aim at like de­light?

Who is so faint, that dare not be so bold

To touch the fire, the weather be­ing cold?



“Let me ex­cuse thy courser, gentle boy;

And learn of him, I heart­ily be­seech thee,

To take ad­vant­age on presen­ted joy;

Though I were dumb, yet his pro­ceed­ings teach thee:

O, learn to love; the les­son is but plain,

And once made per­fect, never lost again.”



“I know not love,” quoth he, “nor will not know it,

Un­less it be a boar, and then I chase it;

’Tis much to bor­row, and I will not owe it;

My love to love is love but to dis­grace it;

For I have heard it is a life in death,

That laughs and weeps, and all but with a breath.



“Who wears a gar­ment shape­less and un­fin­ish’d?

Who plucks the bud be­fore one leaf put forth?

If spring­ing things be any jot di­min­ish’d,

They wither in their prime, prove noth­ing worth:

The colt that’s back’d and bur­den’d be­ing young

Loseth his pride, and never waxeth strong.



“You hurt my hand with wringing; let us part,

And leave this idle theme, this boot­less chat:

Re­move your siege from my un­yield­ing heart;

To love’s alarms it will not ope the gate:

Dis­miss your vows, your feigned tears, your flat­tery;

For where a heart is hard they make no bat­tery.”



“What! canst thou talk?” quoth she, “hast thou a tongue?

O, would thou hadst not, or I had no hear­ing!

Thy mer­maid’s voice hath done me double wrong;

I had my load be­fore, now press’d with bear­ing:

Melodi­ous dis­cord, heav­enly tune, harsh-sound­ing,

Ear’s deep-sweet mu­sic, and heart’s deep-sore wound­ing.



“Had I no eyes but ears, my ears would love

That in­ward beauty and in­vis­ible;

Or were I deaf, thy out­ward parts would move

Each part in me that were but sens­ible:

Though neither eyes nor ears, to hear nor see,

Yet should I be in love by touch­ing thee.



“Say, that the sense of feel­ing were bereft me,

And that I could not see, nor hear, nor touch,

And noth­ing but the very smell were left me,

Yet would my love to thee be still as much;

For from the stil­lit­ory of thy face ex­cel­ling

Comes breath per­fumed that bree­deth love by smelling.



“But, O, what ban­quet wert thou to the taste,

Be­ing nurse and feeder of the other four!

Would they not wish the feast might ever last,

And bid Sus­pi­cion double-lock the door,

Lest Jeal­ousy, that sour un­wel­come guest,

Should, by his steal­ing in, dis­turb the feast?”



Once more the ruby-col­our’d portal open’d,

Which to his speech did honey pas­sage yield;

Like a red morn, that ever yet be­token’d

Wrack to the sea­man, tem­pest to the field,

Sor­row to shep­herds, woe unto the birds,

Gusts and foul flaws to herd­men and to herds.



This ill pres­age ad­visedly she mar­keth:

Even as the wind is hush’d be­fore it raineth,

Or as the wolf doth grin be­fore he bar­keth,

Or as the berry breaks be­fore it staineth,

Or like the deadly bul­let of a gun,

His mean­ing struck her ere his words be­gun.



And at his look she flatly falleth down,

For looks kill love and love by looks re­viv­eth;

A smile re­cures the wound­ing of a frown;

But blessed bank­rupt, that by love so thriv­eth!

The silly boy, be­liev­ing she is dead,

Claps her pale cheek, till clap­ping makes it red;



And all amaz’d brake off his late in­tent,

For sharply he did think to rep­re­hend her,

Which cun­ning love did wit­tily pre­vent:

Fair fall the wit that can so well de­fend her!

For on the grass she lies as she were slain,

Till his breath breatheth life in her again.



He wrings her nose, he strikes her on the cheeks,

He bends her fin­gers, holds her pulses hard,

He chafes her lips; a thou­sand ways he seeks

To mend the hurt that his un­kind­ness marr’d:

He kisses her; and she, by her good will,

Will never rise, so he will kiss her still.



The night of sor­row now is turn’d to day:

Her two blue win­dows faintly she up-heaveth,

Like the fair sun when in his fresh ar­ray

He cheers the morn, and all the world re­lieveth:

And as the bright sun glor­i­fies the sky,

So is her face il­lu­min’d with her eye;



Whose beams upon his hair­less face are fix’d,

As if from thence they bor­row’d all their shine.

Were never four such lamps to­gether mix’d,

Had not his clouded with his brow’s re­pine;

But hers, which through the crys­tal tears gave light,

Shone like the moon in wa­ter seen by night.



“O, where am I?” quoth she, “in earth or heaven,

Or in the ocean drench’d, or in the fire?

What hour is this? or morn or weary even?

Do I de­light to die, or life de­sire?

But now I liv’d, and life was death’s an­noy;

But now I died, and death was lively joy.



“O, thou didst kill me: kill me once again:

Thy eyes’ shrewd tu­tor, that hard heart of thine,

Hath taught them scorn­ful tricks, and such dis­dain,

That they have murder’d this poor heart of mine;

And these mine eyes, true lead­ers to their queen,

But for thy piteous lips no more had seen.



“Long may they kiss each other for this cure!

O, never let their crim­son liv­er­ies wear!

And as they last, their ver­dure still en­dure,

To drive in­fec­tion from the dan­ger­ous year!

That the star-gazers, hav­ing writ on death,

May say, the plague is ban­ish’d by thy breath.



“Pure lips, sweet seals in my soft lips im­prin­ted,

What bar­gains may I make, still to be seal­ing?

To sell my­self I can be well con­ten­ted,

So thou wilt buy and pay and use good deal­ing;

Which pur­chase if thou make, for fear of slips

Set thy seal-manual on my wax-red lips.



“A thou­sand kisses buys my heart from me;

And pay them at thy leis­ure, one by one.

What is ten hun­dred touches unto thee?

Are they not quickly told and quickly gone?

Say, for non-pay­ment that the debt should double,

Is twenty hun­dred kisses such a trouble?”



“Fair queen,” quoth he, “if any love you owe me,

Meas­ure my strange­ness with my un­ripe years:

Be­fore I know my­self, seek not to know me;

No fisher but the un­grown fry for­bears:

The mel­low plum doth fall, the green sticks fast,

Or be­ing early pluck’d, is sour to taste.



“Look, the world’s com­forter, with weary gait,

His day’s hot task hath ended in the west;

The owl, night’s her­ald, shrieks, ‘ ’Tis very late;’

The sheep are gone to fold, birds to their nest,

And coal-black clouds that shadow heaven’s light

Do sum­mon us to part, and bid good night.



“Now let me say ‘Good night,’ and so say you;

If you will say so, you shall have a kiss.”

“Good night,” quoth she, and, ere he says “Adieu,”

The honey fee of part­ing tender’d is:

Her arms do lend his neck a sweet em­brace;

In­cor­por­ate then they seem; face grows to face.



Till, breath­less, he dis­join’d, and back­ward drew

The heav­enly mois­ture, that sweet coral mouth,

Whose pre­cious taste her thirsty lips well knew,

Whereon they sur­feit, yet com­plain on drouth,

He with her plenty press’d, she faint with dearth,

Their lips to­gether glued, fall to the earth.



Now quick de­sire hath caught the yield­ing prey,

And glut­ton-like she feeds, yet never fil­leth;

Her lips are con­quer­ors, his lips obey,

Pay­ing what ransom the in­sul­ter wil­leth;

Whose vul­ture thought doth pitch the price so high,

That she will draw his lips’ rich treas­ure dry:



And hav­ing felt the sweet­ness of the spoil,

With blind­fold fury she be­gins to for­age;

Her face doth reek and smoke, her blood doth boil,

And care­less lust stirs up a des­per­ate cour­age;

Plant­ing ob­li­vion, beat­ing reason back,

For­get­ting shame’s pure blush and hon­our’s wrack.



Hot, faint, and weary, with her hard em­bra­cing,

Like a wild bird be­ing tamed with too much hand­ling,

Or as the fleet-foot roe that’s tired with chas­ing,

Or like the froward in­fant still’d with dand­ling,

He now obeys, and now no more res­isteth,

While she takes all she can, not all she listeth.



What wax so frozen but dis­solves with tem­per­ing,

And yields at last to every light im­pres­sion?

Th­ings out of hope are com­pass’d oft with ven­tur­ing,

Chiefly in love, whose leave ex­ceeds com­mis­sion:

Af­fec­tion faints not like a pale-faced cow­ard,

But then woos best when most his choice is froward.



When he did frown, O, had she then gave over,

Such nec­tar from his lips she had not suck’d.

Foul words and frowns must not re­pel a lover;

What though the rose have prickles, yet ’tis pluck’d:

Were beauty un­der twenty locks kept fast,

Yet love breaks through and picks them all at last.



For pity now she can no more de­tain him;

The poor fool prays her that he may de­part:

She is re­solved no longer to re­strain him;

Bids him farewell, and look well to her heart,

The which, by Cu­pid’s bow she doth protest,

He car­ries thence en­caged in his breast.



“Sweet boy,” she says, “this night I’ll waste in sor­row,

For my sick heart com­mands mine eyes to watch.

Tell me, Love’s mas­ter, shall we meet to­mor­row?

Say, shall we? shall we? wilt thou make the match?”

He tells her no; to­mor­row he in­tends

To hunt the boar with cer­tain of his friends.



“The boar!” quoth she; whereat a sud­den pale,

Like lawn be­ing spread upon the blush­ing rose,

Usurps her cheek; she trembles at his tale,

And on his neck her yok­ing arms she throws:

She sinketh down, still hanging by his neck,

He on her belly falls, she on her back.



Now is she in the very lists of love,

Her cham­pion moun­ted for the hot en­counter:

All is ima­gin­ary she doth prove,

He will not man­age her, al­though he mount her;

That worse than Tan­talus’ is her an­noy,

To clip Elysium and to lack her joy.



Even as poor birds, de­ceived with painted grapes,

Do sur­feit by the eye and pine the maw,

Even so she lan­guish­eth in her mis­haps,

As those poor birds that help­less ber­ries saw.

The warm ef­fects which she in him finds miss­ing

She seeks to kindle with con­tinual kiss­ing.



But all in vain; good queen, it will not be:

She hath as­say’d as much as may be proved;

Her plead­ing hath de­serv’d a greater fee;

She’s Love, she loves, and yet she is not loved.

“Fie, fie,” he says, “you crush me; let me go;

You have no reason to with­hold me so.”



“Thou hadst been gone,” quoth she, “sweet boy, ere this,

But that thou told’st me thou wouldst hunt the boar.

O, be ad­vised! thou know’st not what it is

With javelin’s point a churl­ish swine to gore,

Whose tushes never sheathed he whetteth still,

Like to a mor­tal butcher bent to kill.



“On his bow-back he hath a battle set

Of bristly pikes, that ever threat his foes;

His eyes like glow-worms, shine when he doth fret;

His snout digs sep­ulchres where’er he goes;

Be­ing moved, he strikes whate’er is in his way,

And whom he strikes his crooked tushes slay.



“His brawny sides, with hairy bristles arm’d,

Are bet­ter proof than thy spear’s point can enter;

His short thick neck can­not be eas­ily harm’d;

Be­ing ire­ful, on the lion he will ven­ture:

The thorny brambles and em­bra­cing bushes,

As fear­ful of him, part, through whom he rushes.



“Alas, he naught es­teems that face of thine,

To which Love’s eyes pay trib­u­tary gazes;

Nor thy soft hands, sweet lips and crys­tal eyne,

Whose full per­fec­tion all the world amazes;

But hav­ing thee at vant­age—won­drous dread!—

Would root these beau­ties as he roots the mead.



“O, let him keep his loath­some cabin still;

Beauty hath naught to do with such foul fiends:

Come not within his danger by thy will;

They that thrive well take coun­sel of their friends.

When thou didst name the boar, not to dis­semble,

I fear’d thy for­tune, and my joints did tremble.



“Didst thou not mark my face? was it not white?

Saw’st thou not signs of fear lurk in mine eye?

Grew I not faint? and fell I not down­right?

Within my bosom, whereon thou dost lie,

My bod­ing heart pants, beats, and takes no rest,

But, like an earth­quake, shakes thee on my breast.



“For where Love reigns, dis­turb­ing Jeal­ousy

Doth call him­self Af­fec­tion’s sen­tinel;

Gives false alarms, sug­gesteth mutiny,

And in a peace­ful hour doth cry ‘Kill, kill!’

Distem­per­ing gentle Love in his de­sire,

As air and wa­ter do abate the fire.



“This sour in­former, this bate-breed­ing spy,

This canker that eats up Love’s tender spring,

This carry-tale, dis­sen­tious Jeal­ousy,

That some­time true news, some­time false doth bring,

Knocks at my heart and whis­pers in mine ear,

That if I love thee, I thy death should fear:



“And more than so, presen­teth to mine eye

The pic­ture of an angry-chaf­ing boar,

Under whose sharp fangs on his back doth lie

An im­age like thy­self, all stain’d with gore;

Whose blood upon the fresh flowers be­ing shed

Doth make them droop with grief and hang the head.



“What should I do, see­ing thee so in­deed,

That tremble at the ima­gin­a­tion?

The thought of it doth make my faint heart bleed,

And fear doth teach it divin­a­tion:

I proph­esy thy death, my liv­ing sor­row,

If thou en­counter with the boar to­mor­row.



“But if thou needs wilt hunt, be ruled by me;

Un­couple at the timor­ous fly­ing hare,

Or at the fox which lives by sub­tilty,

Or at the roe which no en­counter dare:

Pur­sue these fear­ful creatures o’er the downs,

And on thy well-breath’d horse keep with thy hounds.



“And when thou hast on foot the pur­blind hare,

Mark the poor wretch, to over­shoot his troubles

How he out­runs the wind, and with what care

He cranks and crosses with a thou­sand doubles:

The many musets through the which he goes

Are like a labyrinth to amaze his foes.



“So­me­time he runs among a flock of sheep,

To make the cun­ning hounds mis­take their smell,

And some­time where earth-delving conies keep,

To stop the loud pur­suers in their yell,

And some­time sor­teth with a herd of deer:

Danger de­vis­eth shifts; wit waits on fear:



“For there his smell with oth­ers be­ing mingled,

The hot scent-snuff­ing hounds are driven to doubt,

Ceas­ing their clam­or­ous cry, till they have singled

With much ado the cold fault cleanly out;

Then do they spend their mouths: Echo replies,

As if an­other chase were in the skies.



“By this, poor Wat, far off upon a hill,

Stands on his hinder legs with listen­ing ear,

To hearken if his foes pur­sue him still:

Anon their loud alar­ums he doth hear;

And now his grief may be com­pared well

To one sore sick that hears the passing bell.



“Then shalt thou see the dew-be­dabbled wretch

Turn, and re­turn, in­dent­ing with the way;

Each en­vi­ous briar his weary legs do scratch,

Each shadow makes him stop, each mur­mur stay:

For misery is trod­den on by many,

And be­ing low never re­liev’d by any.



“Lie quietly, and hear a little more;

Nay, do not struggle, for thou shalt not rise:

To make thee hate the hunt­ing of the boar,

Un­like my­self thou hear’st me mor­al­ize,

Ap­ply­ing this to that, and so to so;

For love can com­ment upon every woe.



“Where did I leave?” “No mat­ter where;” quoth he,

“Leave me, and then the story aptly ends:

The night is spent.” “Why, what of that?” quoth she.

“I am,” quoth he, “ex­pec­ted of my friends;

And now ’tis dark, and go­ing I shall fall.”

“In night,” quoth she, “de­sire sees best of all.”



But if thou fall, O, then ima­gine this,

The earth, in love with thee, thy foot­ing trips,

And all is but to rob thee of a kiss.

Rich preys make true men thieves; so do thy lips

Make mod­est Dian cloudy and for­lorn,

Lest she should steal a kiss and die forsworn.



“Now of this dark night I per­ceive the reason:

Cyn­thia for shame ob­scures her sil­ver shine

Till for­ging nature be con­demn’d of treason,

For steal­ing moulds from heaven, that were di­vine;

Wherein she framed thee, in high heaven’s des­pite,

To shame the sun by day and her by night.



“And there­fore hath she brib’d the Destinies,

To cross the curi­ous work­man­ship of nature,

To mingle beauty with in­firm­it­ies,

And pure per­fec­tion with im­pure de­fea­ture,

Mak­ing it sub­ject to the tyranny

Of mad mis­chances and much misery;



“As burn­ing fevers, agues pale and faint,

Life-pois­on­ing pes­ti­lence and fren­zies wood,

The mar­row-eat­ing sick­ness, whose at­taint

Disorder breeds by heat­ing of the blood:

Sur­feits, im­posthumes, grief, and damn’d des­pair,

Swear Nature’s death, for fram­ing thee so fair.



“And not the least of all these mal­ad­ies

But in one minute’s fight brings beauty un­der:

Both fa­vour, sa­vour, hue and qual­it­ies,

Whereat the im­par­tial gazer late did won­der,

Are on the sud­den wasted, thaw’d and done,

As moun­tain snow melts with the mid­day sun.



“There­fore des­pite of fruit­less chastity,

Love-lack­ing vestals and self-lov­ing nuns,

That on the earth would breed a scarcity

And bar­ren dearth of daugh­ters and of sons,

Be prod­igal: the lamp that burns by night

Dries up his oil to lend the world his light.



“What is thy body but a swal­low­ing grave,

Seem­ing to bury that pos­ter­ity,

Which by the rights of time thou needs must have,

If thou des­troy them not in dark ob­scur­ity?

If so, the world will hold thee in dis­dain,

Sith in thy pride so fair a hope is slain.



“So in thy­self thy­self art made away;

A mis­chief worse than civil home-bred strife,

Or theirs whose des­per­ate hands them­selves do slay,

Or butcher-sire that reeves his son of life.

Foul canker­ing rust the hid­den treas­ure frets,

But gold that’s put to use more gold be­gets.”



“Nay then,” quoth Adon, “you will fall again

Into your idle over-handled theme:

The kiss I gave you is be­stow’d in vain,

And all in vain you strive against the stream;

For, by this black-faced night, de­sire’s foul nurse,

Your treat­ise makes me like you worse and worse.



“If love have lent you twenty thou­sand tongues,

And every tongue more mov­ing than your own,

Be­witch­ing like the wan­ton mer­maid’s songs,

Yet from mine ear the tempt­ing tune is blown;

For know, my heart stands armed in mine ear,

And will not let a false sound enter there;



“Lest the de­ceiv­ing har­mony should run

Into the quiet clos­ure of my breast;

And then my little heart were quite un­done,

In his bed­cham­ber to be barr’d of rest.

No, lady, no; my heart longs not to groan,

But soundly sleeps, while now it sleeps alone.



“What have you urged that I can­not re­prove?

The path is smooth that leadeth on to danger:

I hate not love, but your device in love,

That lends em­brace­ments unto every stranger.

You do it for in­crease: O strange ex­cuse,

When reason is the bawd to lust’s ab­use!



“Call it not love, for Love to heaven is fled,

Since sweat­ing Lust on earth usurp’d his name;

Under whose simple semb­lance he hath fed

Upon fresh beauty, blot­ting it with blame;

Which the hot tyr­ant stains and soon be­reaves,

As cater­pil­lars do the tender leaves.



“Love com­for­teth like sun­shine after rain,

But Lust’s ef­fect is tem­pest after sun;

Love’s gentle spring doth al­ways fresh re­main,

Lust’s winter comes ere sum­mer half be done;

Love sur­feits not, Lust like a glut­ton dies;

Love is all truth, Lust full of forged lies.



“More I could tell, but more I dare not say;

The text is old, the orator too green.

There­fore, in sad­ness, now I will away;

My face is full of shame, my heart of teen:

Mine ears, that to your wan­ton talk at­ten­ded,

Do burn them­selves for hav­ing so of­fen­ded.”



With this, he break­eth from the sweet em­brace,

Of those fair arms which bound him to her breast,

And home­ward through the dark laund runs apace;

Leaves Love upon her back deeply dis­tress’d.

Look, how a bright star shooteth from the sky,

So glides he in the night from Venus’ eye.



Which after him she darts, as one on shore

Gaz­ing upon a late-em­barked friend,

Till the wild waves will have him seen no more,

Whose ridges with the meet­ing clouds con­tend:

So did the mer­ci­less and pitchy night

Fold in the ob­ject that did feed her sight.



Whereat amazed, as one that un­aware

Hath dropp’d a pre­cious jewel in the flood,

Or ’ston­ish’d as night-wan­der­ers of­ten are,

Their light blown out in some mis­trust­ful wood,

Even so con­foun­ded in the dark she lay,

Hav­ing lost the fair dis­cov­ery of her way.



And now she beats her heart, whereat it groans,

That all the neigh­bour caves, as seem­ing troubled,

Make verbal re­pe­ti­tion of her moans;

Pas­sion on pas­sion deeply is re­doubled:

“Ay me!” she cries, and twenty times “Woe, woe!”

And twenty echoes twenty times cry so.



She mark­ing them be­gins a wail­ing note,

And sings ex­tem­por­ally a woe­ful ditty;

How love makes young men thrall and old men dote;

How love is wise in folly, fool­ish-witty:

Her heavy an­them still con­cludes in woe,

And still the choir of echoes an­swer so.



Her song was te­di­ous, and out­wore the night,

For lov­ers’ hours are long, though seem­ing short:

If pleased them­selves, oth­ers they think, de­light

In such-like cir­cum­stance, with such-like sport:

Their co­pi­ous stor­ies of­ten­times be­gun,

End without audi­ence and are never done.



For who hath she to spend the night withal

But idle sounds re­sem­bling para­sites,

Like shrill-tongued tap­sters an­swer­ing every call,

Sooth­ing the hu­mour of fant­astic wits?

She says, “ ’Tis so:” they an­swer all “ ’Tis so;”

And would say after her, if she said “No.”



Lo, here the gentle lark, weary of rest,

From his moist cab­inet mounts up on high,

And wakes the morn­ing, from whose sil­ver breast

The sun aris­eth in his majesty;

Who doth the world so glor­i­ously be­hold

That ce­dar-tops and hills seem burn­ish’d gold.



Venus sa­lutes him with this fair good mor­row:

“O thou clear god, and pat­ron of all light,

From whom each lamp and shin­ing star doth bor­row

The beau­teous in­flu­ence that makes him bright,

There lives a son that suck’d an earthly mother,

May lend thee light, as thou dost lend to other.”



This said, she hasteth to a myrtle grove,

Mus­ing the morn­ing is so much o’er­worn,

And yet she hears no tid­ings of her love:

She hearkens for his hounds and for his horn:

Anon she hears them chant it lust­ily,

And all in haste she coasteth to the cry.



And as she runs, the bushes in the way

Some catch her by the neck, some kiss her face,

Some twine about her thigh to make her stay:

She wildly break­eth from their strict em­brace,

Like a milch doe, whose swell­ing dugs do ache,

Hast­ing to feed her fawn hid in some brake.



By this, she hears the hounds are at a bay;

Whereat she starts, like one that spies an ad­der

Wreathed up in fatal folds just in his way,

The fear whereof doth make him shake and shud­der;

Even so the timor­ous yelp­ing of the hounds

Ap­pals her senses and her spirit con­founds.



For now she knows it is no gentle chase,

But the blunt boar, rough bear, or lion proud,

Be­cause the cry re­maineth in one place,

Where fear­fully the dogs ex­claim aloud:

Find­ing their en­emy to be so curst,

They all strain cour­tesy who shall cope him first.



This dis­mal cry rings sadly in her ear,

Through which it enters to sur­prise her heart;

Who, over­come by doubt and blood­less fear,

With cold-pale weak­ness numbs each feel­ing part:

Like sol­diers, when their cap­tain once doth yield,

They basely fly and dare not stay the field.



Thus stands she in a trem­bling ec­stasy;

Till, cheer­ing up her senses sore dis­may’d,

She tells them ’tis a cause­less fantasy,

And child­ish er­ror, that they are afraid;

Bids them leave quak­ing, bids them fear no more:—

And with that word she spied the hunted boar,



Whose frothy mouth, be­painted all with red,

Like milk and blood be­ing mingled both to­gether,

A second fear through all her sinews spread,

Which madly hur­ries her she knows not whither:

This way she runs, and now she will no fur­ther,

But back re­tires to rate the boar for mur­ther.



A thou­sand spleens bear her a thou­sand ways;

She treads the path that she un­treads again;

Her more than haste is mated with delays,

Like the pro­ceed­ings of a drunken brain,

Full of re­spects, yet nought at all re­spect­ing;

In hand with all things, nought at all ef­fect­ing.



Here ken­nell’d in a brake she finds a hound,

And asks the weary caitiff for his mas­ter,

And there an­other lick­ing of his wound,

’Gainst venom’d sores the only sov­er­eign plaster;

And here she meets an­other sadly scowl­ing,

To whom she speaks, and he replies with howl­ing.



When he hath ceas’d his ill-re­sound­ing noise,

Another flap-mouth’d mourner, black and grim,

Against the welkin vol­leys out his voice;

Another and an­other an­swer him,

Clap­ping their proud tails to the ground be­low,

Shak­ing their scratch’d ears, bleed­ing as they go.



Look, how the world’s poor people are amazed

At ap­par­i­tions, signs and prodi­gies,

Whereon with fear­ful eyes they long have gazed,

In­fus­ing them with dread­ful proph­ecies;

So she at these sad sighs draws up her breath

And sigh­ing it again, ex­claims on Death.



“Hard-fa­vour’d tyr­ant, ugly, mea­gre, lean,

Hate­ful di­vorce of love,”—thus chides she Death—

“Grim-grin­ning ghost, earth’s worm, what dost thou mean

To stifle beauty and to steal his breath,

Who when he lived, his breath and beauty set

Gloss on the rose, smell to the vi­olet?



“If he be dead—O no, it can­not be,

See­ing his beauty, thou shouldst strike at it:—

O yes, it may; thou hast no eyes to see,

But hate­fully at ran­dom dost thou hit.

Thy mark is feeble age, but thy false dart

Mis­takes that aim, and cleaves an in­fant’s heart.



“Hadst thou but bid be­ware, then he had spoke,

And hear­ing him, thy power had lost his power.

The Destinies will curse thee for this stroke;

They bid thee crop a weed, thou pluck’st a flower:

Love’s golden ar­row at him should have fled,

And not Death’s ebon dart, to strike him dead.



“Dost thou drink tears, that thou pro­vokest such weep­ing?

What may a heavy groan ad­vant­age thee?

Why hast thou cast into eternal sleep­ing

Those eyes that taught all other eyes to see?

Now Nature cares not for thy mor­tal vigour,

Since her best work is ruin’d with thy rigour.”



Here over­come, as one full of des­pair,

She vail’d her eye­lids, who, like sluices, stopt

The crys­tal tide that from her two cheeks fair

In the sweet chan­nel of her bosom dropt;

But through the flood-gates breaks the sil­ver rain,

And with his strong course opens them again.



O, how her eyes and tears did lend and bor­row!

Her eyes seen in the tears, tears in her eye;

Both crys­tals, where they view’d each other’s sor­row,

Sor­row that friendly sighs sought still to dry;

But like a stormy day, now wind, now rain,

Sighs dry her cheeks, tears make them wet again.



Vari­able pas­sions throng her con­stant woe,

As striv­ing who should best be­come her grief;

All en­ter­tain’d, each pas­sion la­bours so,

That every present sor­row seemeth chief,

But none is best: then join they all to­gether,

Like many clouds con­sult­ing for foul weather.



By this, far off she hears some hunts­man hollo;

A nurse’s song ne’er pleas’d her babe so well:

The dire ima­gin­a­tion she did fol­low

This sound of hope doth la­bour to ex­pel;

For now re­viv­ing joy bids her re­joice,

And flat­ters her it is Adonis’ voice.



Whereat her tears began to turn their tide,

Be­ing prison’d in her eye like pearls in glass;

Yet some­times falls an ori­ent drop be­side,

Which her cheek melts, as scorn­ing it should pass,

To wash the foul face of the slut­tish ground,

Who is but drunken when she seemeth drown’d.



O hard-be­liev­ing love, how strange it seems

Not to be­lieve, and yet too cred­u­lous!

Thy weal and woe are both of them ex­tremes;

Despair and hope make thee ri­dicu­lous:

The one doth flat­ter thee in thoughts un­likely,

In likely thoughts the other kills thee quickly.



Now she un­weaves the web that she hath wrought;

Adonis lives, and Death is not to blame;

It was not she that call’d him all to naught;

Now she adds hon­ours to his hate­ful name;

She clepes him king of graves and grave for kings,

Im­per­i­ous su­preme of all mor­tal things.



“No, no,” quoth she, “sweet Death, I did but jest;

Yet par­don me I felt a kind of fear

Whenas I met the boar, that bloody beast,

Which knows no pity, but is still severe;

Then, gentle shadow—truth I must con­fess—

I rail’d on thee, fear­ing my love’s de­cease.



“ ’Tis not my fault: the boar pro­vok’d my tongue;

Be wreak’d on him, in­vis­ible com­mander;

’Tis he, foul creature, that hath done thee wrong;

I did but act, he’s au­thor of my slander:

Grief hath two tongues, and never wo­man yet

Could rule them both, without ten wo­men’s wit.”



Thus hop­ing that Adonis is alive,

Her rash sus­pect she doth ex­ten­u­ate;

And that his beauty may the bet­ter thrive,

With Death she humbly doth in­sinu­ate;

Tells him of trophies, statues, tombs, and stor­ies

His vic­tor­ies, his tri­umphs and his glor­ies.



“O Jove,” quoth she, “how much a fool was I

To be of such a weak and silly mind

To wail his death who lives and must not die

Till mu­tual over­throw of mor­tal kind!

For he be­ing dead, with him is beauty slain,

And beauty dead, black Chaos comes again.



“Fie, fie, fond love, thou art so full of fear

As one with treas­ure laden, hemm’d with thieves;

Trifles, un­wit­nessed with eye or ear,

Thy cow­ard heart with false be­think­ing grieves.”

Even at this word she hears a merry horn,

Whereat she leaps that was but late for­lorn.



As fal­con to the lure, away she flies;

The grass stoops not, she treads on it so light;

And in her haste un­for­tu­nately spies

The foul boar’s con­quest on her fair de­light;

Which seen, her eyes, as murder’d with the view,

Like stars ashamed of day, them­selves with­drew.



Or, as the snail, whose tender horns be­ing hit,

Shrinks back­wards in his shelly cave with pain,

And there all smother’d up, in shade doth sit,

Long after fear­ing to creep forth again;

So, at his bloody view, her eyes are fled

Into the deep dark cab­ins of her head:



Where they resign their of­fice and their light

To the dis­pos­ing of her troubled brain;

Who bids them still con­sort with ugly night,

And never wound the heart with looks again;

Who like a king per­plexed in his throne,

By their sug­ges­tion gives a deadly groan,



Whereat each trib­u­tary sub­ject quakes;

As when the wind, im­prison’d in the ground,

Strug­gling for pas­sage, earth’s found­a­tion shakes,

Which with cold ter­ror doth men’s minds con­found.

This mutiny each part doth so sur­prise

That from their dark beds once more leap her eyes;



And, be­ing open’d, threw un­will­ing light

Upon the wide wound that the boar had trench’d

In his soft flank; whose wonted lily white

With purple tears, that his wound wept, was drench’d:

No flower was nigh, no grass, herb, leaf, or weed,

But stole his blood and seem’d with him to bleed.



This sol­emn sym­pathy poor Venus noteth;

Over one shoulder doth she hang her head;

Dumbly she pas­sions, franticly she doteth;

She thinks he could not die, he is not dead:

Her voice is stopt, her joints for­get to bow;

Her eyes are mad that they have wept till now.



Upon his hurt she looks so stead­fastly,

That her sight dazzling makes the wound seem three;

And then she rep­re­hends her mangling eye,

That makes more gashes where no breach should be:

His face seems twain, each sev­eral limb is doubled;

For oft the eye mis­takes, the brain be­ing troubled.



“My tongue can­not ex­press my grief for one,

And yet,” quoth she, “be­hold two Adons dead!

My sighs are blown away, my salt tears gone,

Mine eyes are turn’d to fire, my heart to lead:

Heavy heart’s lead, melt at mine eyes’ red fire!

So shall I die by drops of hot de­sire.



“Alas poor world, what treas­ure hast thou lost!

What face re­mains alive that’s worth the view­ing?

Whose tongue is mu­sic now? what canst thou boast

Of things long since, or any­thing en­su­ing?

The flowers are sweet, their col­ours fresh and trim;

But true-sweet beauty lived and died with him.



“Bon­net nor veil hence­forth no creature wear!

Nor sun nor wind will ever strive to kiss you:

Hav­ing no fair to lose, you need not fear;

The sun doth scorn you and the wind doth hiss you:

But when Adonis lived, sun and sharp air

Lurk’d like two thieves, to rob him of his fair:



“And there­fore would he put his bon­net on,

Under whose brim the gaudy sun would peep;

The wind would blow it off and, be­ing gone,

Play with his locks: then would Adonis weep;

And straight, in pity of his tender years,

They both would strive who first should dry his tears.



“To see his face the lion walk’d along

Be­hind some hedge, be­cause he would not fear him;

To re­cre­ate him­self when he hath sung,

The ti­ger would be tame and gently hear him;

If he had spoke, the wolf would leave his prey

And never fright the silly lamb that day.



“When he be­held his shadow in the brook,

The fishes spread on it their golden gills;

When he was by, the birds such pleas­ure took,

That some would sing, some other in their bills

Would bring him mul­ber­ries and ripe-red cher­ries;

He fed them with his sight, they him with ber­ries.



“But this foul, grim, and urchin-snouted boar,

Whose down­ward eye still looketh for a grave,

Ne’er saw the beau­teous liv­ery that he wore;

Wit­ness the en­ter­tain­ment that he gave:

If he did see his face, why then I know

He thought to kiss him, and hath kill’d him so.



“ ’Tis true, ’tis true; thus was Adonis slain:

He ran upon the boar with his sharp spear,

Who did not whet his teeth at him again,

But by a kiss thought to per­suade him there;

And nuzz­ling in his flank, the lov­ing swine

Sheathed un­aware the tusk in his soft groin.



“Had I been tooth’d like him, I must con­fess,

With kiss­ing him I should have kill’d him first;

But he is dead, and never did he bless

My youth with his; the more am I ac­curst.”

With this, she falleth in the place she stood,

And stains her face with his con­gealed blood.



She looks upon his lips, and they are pale;

She takes him by the hand, and that is cold,

She whis­pers in his ears a heavy tale,

As if they heard the woe­ful words she told;

She lifts the cof­fer-lids that close his eyes,

Where, lo, two lamps, burnt out, in dark­ness lies;



Two glasses, where her­self her­self be­held

A thou­sand times, and now no more re­flect;

Their vir­tue lost, wherein they late ex­cell’d,

And every beauty robb’d of his ef­fect:

“Won­der of time,” quoth she, “this is my spite,

That, thou be­ing dead, the day should yet be light.



“Since thou art dead, lo, here I proph­esy:

Sor­row on love here­after shall at­tend:

It shall be waited on with jeal­ousy,

Find sweet be­gin­ning, but un­sa­voury end,

Ne’er settled equally, but high or low,

That all love’s pleas­ure shall not match his woe.



“It shall be fickle, false and full of fraud,

Bud and be blas­ted in a breath­ing-while;

The bot­tom poison, and the top o’er­straw’d

With sweets that shall the truest sight be­guile:

The strongest body shall it make most weak,

Strike the wise dumb and teach the fool to speak.



“It shall be spar­ing, and too full of riot,

Teach­ing de­crepit age to tread the meas­ures;

The star­ing ruf­fian shall it keep in quiet,

Pluck down the rich, en­rich the poor with treas­ures;

It shall be ra­ging-mad, and silly-mild,

Make the young old, the old be­come a child.



“It shall sus­pect where is no cause of fear;

It shall not fear where it should most mis­trust;

It shall be mer­ci­ful, and too severe,

And most de­ceiv­ing when it seems most just;

Per­verse it shall be, where it shows most to­ward,

Put fear to valour, cour­age to the cow­ard.



“It shall be cause of war and dire events,

And set dis­sen­sion ’twixt the son and sire;

Sub­ject and servile to all dis­con­tents,

As dry com­bus­tious mat­ter is to fire:

Sith in his prime Death doth my love des­troy,

They that love best their love shall not en­joy.”



By this, the boy that by her side lay kill’d

Was melted like a va­pour from her sight,

And in his blood that on the ground lay spill’d,

A purple flower sprung up, chequer’d with white,

Resem­bling well his pale cheeks and the blood

Which in round drops upon their white­ness stood.



She bows her head, the new-sprung flower to smell,

Com­par­ing it to her Adonis’ breath;

And says within her bosom it shall dwell,

Since he him­self is reft from her by death:

She crops the stalk, and in the breach ap­pears

Green-drop­ping sap, which she com­pares to tears.



“Poor flower,” quoth she, “this was thy father’s guise—

Sweet is­sue of a more sweet-smelling sire—

For every little grief to wet his eyes:

To grow unto him­self was his de­sire,

And so ’tis thine; but know, it is as good

To wither in my breast as in his blood.



“Here was thy father’s bed, here in my breast;

Thou art the next of blood, and ’tis thy right:

Lo, in this hol­low cradle take thy rest,

My throb­bing heart shall rock thee day and night:

There shall not be one minute in an hour

Wherein I will not kiss my sweet love’s flower.”



Thus weary of the world, away she hies,

And yokes her sil­ver doves; by whose swift aid

Their mis­tress moun­ted through the empty skies,

In her light chariot quickly is con­vey’d;

Hold­ing their course to Pa­phos, where their queen

Means to im­mure her­self and not be seen.





The Rape of Lucrece





To the

        Right Hon­our­able Henry Wrio­thesly,

        Earl of Southamp­ton, and Baron of Titch­field.

The love I ded­ic­ate to your Lord­ship is without end; whereof this pamph­let, without be­gin­ning, is but a su­per­flu­ous moi­ety. The war­rant I have of your hon­our­able dis­pos­i­tion, not the worth of my un­tutored lines, makes it as­sured of ac­cept­ance. What I have done is yours; what I have to do is yours; be­ing part in all I have, de­voted yours. Were my worth greater, my duty would show greater; mean­time, as it is, it is bound to your Lord­ship, to whom I wish long life, still lengthened with all hap­pi­ness.

Your Lord­ship’s in all duty,

Wil­liam Shakespeare.





The Argument


Lu­cius Tar­quinius, for his ex­cess­ive pride sur­named Su­per­bus, after he had caused his own father-in-law, Ser­vius Tul­lius, to be cruelly murdered, and, con­trary to the Ro­man laws and cus­toms, not re­quir­ing or stay­ing for the people’s suf­frages, had pos­sessed him­self of the king­dom, went, ac­com­pan­ied with his sons and other no­ble­men of Rome, to be­siege Ardea. Dur­ing which siege the prin­cipal men of the army meet­ing one even­ing at the tent of Sex­tus Tar­quinius, the king’s son, in their dis­courses after sup­per, every­one com­men­ded the vir­tues of his own wife; among whom Col­lat­inus ex­tolled the in­com­par­able chastity of his wife Lu­cre­tia. In that pleas­ant hu­mour they all pos­ted to Rome; and in­tend­ing, by their secret and sud­den ar­rival, to make trial of that which every­one had be­fore avouched, only Col­lat­inus finds his wife, though it were late in the night, spin­ning amongst her maids: the other ladies were all found dan­cing and rev­el­ling, or in sev­eral dis­ports. Whereupon the no­ble­men yiel­ded Col­lat­inus the vic­tory, and his wife the fame. At that time Sex­tus Tar­quinius be­ing in­flamed with Lucrece’s beauty, yet smoth­er­ing his pas­sions for the present, de­par­ted with the rest back to the camp; from whence he shortly after priv­ily with­drew him­self, and was, ac­cord­ing to his es­tate, roy­ally en­ter­tained and lodged by Lucrece at Col­la­tium. The same night he treach­er­ously stealeth into her cham­ber, vi­ol­ently rav­ished her, and early in the morn­ing spee­deth away. Lucrece, in this lam­ent­able plight, hast­ily dis­patched mes­sen­gers, one to Rome for her father, an­other to the camp for Col­lat­ine. They came, the one ac­com­pan­ied with Junius Bru­tus, the other with Publius Valerius; and find­ing Lucrece at­tired in mourn­ing habit, de­man­ded the cause of her sor­row. She, first tak­ing an oath of them for her re­venge, re­vealed the actor, and whole man­ner of his deal­ing, and withal sud­denly stabbed her­self. Which done, with one con­sent they all vowed to root out the whole hated fam­ily of the Tar­quins; and bear­ing the dead body to Rome, Bru­tus ac­quain­ted the people with the doer and man­ner of the vile deed, with a bit­ter in­vect­ive against the tyranny of the king; where­with the people were so moved, that with one con­sent and a gen­eral ac­clam­a­tion the Tar­quins were all ex­iled, and the state gov­ern­ment changed from kings to con­suls.





From the be­sieged Ardea all in post,

Borne by the trust­less wings of false de­sire,

Lust-breathed Tar­quin leaves the Ro­man host,

And to Col­la­tium bears the light­less fire

Which, in pale em­bers hid, lurks to as­pire

And girdle with em­bra­cing flames the waist

Of Col­lat­ine’s fair love, Lucrece the chaste.



Haply that name of “chaste” un­hap­pily set

This bate­less edge on his keen ap­pet­ite;

When Col­lat­ine un­wisely did not let

To praise the clear un­matched red and white

Which tri­umph’d in that sky of his de­light,

Where mor­tal stars, as bright as heaven’s beau­ties,

With pure as­pects did him pe­cu­liar du­ties.



For he the night be­fore, in Tar­quin’s tent,

Un­lock’d the treas­ure of his happy state;

What price­less wealth the heav­ens had him lent

In the pos­ses­sion of his beau­teous mate;

Reck­on­ing his for­tune at such high-proud rate,

That kings might be es­poused to more fame,

But king nor peer to such a peer­less dame.



O hap­pi­ness en­joy’d but of a few!

And, if pos­sess’d, as soon de­cay’d and done

As is the morn­ing’s sil­ver-melt­ing dew

Against the golden splend­our of the sun!

An ex­pired date, can­cell’d ere well be­gun:

Hon­our and beauty, in the owner’s arms,

Are weakly fort­ress’d from a world of harms.



Beauty it­self doth of it­self per­suade

The eyes of men without an orator;

What nee­deth then apo­lo­gies be made,

To set forth that which is so sin­gu­lar?

Or why is Col­lat­ine the pub­lisher

Of that rich jewel he should keep un­known

From thiev­ish ears, be­cause it is his own?



Per­chance his boast of Lucrece’ sov­er­eignty

Sugges­ted this proud is­sue of a king;

For by our ears our hearts oft tain­ted be:

Per­chance that envy of so rich a thing,

Brav­ing com­pare, dis­dain­fully did sting

His high-pitch’d thoughts, that meaner men should vaunt

That golden hap which their su­per­i­ors want.



But some un­timely thought did in­stig­ate

His all-too-time­less speed, if none of those:

His hon­our, his af­fairs, his friends, his state,

Neg­lected all, with swift in­tent he goes

To quench the coal which in his liver glows.

O rash false heat, wrapp’d in re­pent­ant cold,

Thy hasty spring still blasts, and ne’er grows old!



When at Col­la­tium this false lord ar­riv’d,

Well was he wel­com’d by the Ro­man dame,

Within whose face beauty and vir­tue striv’d

Which of them both should un­der­prop her fame:

When vir­tue bragg’d, beauty would blush for shame;

When beauty boas­ted blushes, in des­pite

Vir­tue would stain that o’er with sil­ver white.



But beauty, in that white in­tit­uled,

From Venus’ doves doth chal­lenge that fair field:

Then vir­tue claims from beauty beauty’s red,

Which vir­tue gave the golden age, to gild

Their sil­ver cheeks, and call’d it then their shield;

Teach­ing them thus to use it in the fight,

When shame as­sail’d, the red should fence the white.



This her­aldry in Lucrece’ face was seen,

Argued by beauty’s red and vir­tue’s white:

Of either’s col­our was the other queen,

Prov­ing from world’s minor­ity their right:

Yet their am­bi­tion makes them still to fight;

The sov­er­eignty of either be­ing so great,

That oft they in­ter­change each other’s seat.



Their si­lent war of lilies and of roses,

Which Tar­quin view’d in her fair face’s field,

In their pure ranks his traitor eye en­closes;

Where, lest between them both it should be kill’d,

The cow­ard cap­tive van­quish’d doth yield

To those two armies that would let him go,

Rather than tri­umph in so false a foe.



Now thinks he that her hus­band’s shal­low tongue—

The nig­gard prod­igal that prais’d her so—

In that high task hath done her beauty wrong,

Which far ex­ceeds his bar­ren skill to show:

There­fore that praise which Col­lat­ine doth owe

En­chanted Tar­quin an­swers with sur­mise,

In si­lent won­der of still-gaz­ing eyes.



This earthly saint, ad­ored by this devil,

Little sus­pec­t­eth the false wor­ship­per;

For un­stain’d thoughts do sel­dom dream on evil;

Birds never limed no secret bushes fear:

So guilt­less she se­curely gives good cheer

And rev­er­end wel­come to her princely guest,

Whose in­ward ill no out­ward harm ex­press’d:



For that he col­our’d with his high es­tate,

Hid­ing base sin in plaits of majesty;

That noth­ing in him seem’d in­or­din­ate,

Save some­time too much won­der of his eye,

Which, hav­ing all, all could not sat­isfy;

But, poorly rich, so wanteth in his store,

That, cloy’d with much, he pin­eth still for more.



But she, that never coped with stranger eyes,

Could pick no mean­ing from their par­ling looks,

Nor read the subtle-shin­ing secre­cies

Writ in the glassy mar­gents of such books:

She touch’d no un­known baits, nor fear’d no hooks;

Nor could she mor­al­ize his wan­ton sight,

More than his eyes were open’d to the light.



He stor­ies to her ears her hus­band’s fame,

Won in the fields of fruit­ful Italy;

And decks with praises Col­lat­ine’s high name,

Made glor­i­ous by his manly chiv­alry

With bruised arms and wreaths of vic­tory:

Her joy with heav’d-up hand she doth ex­press,

And, word­less, so greets heaven for his suc­cess.



Far from the pur­pose of his com­ing hither,

He makes ex­cuses for his be­ing there:

No cloudy show of stormy blus­ter­ing weather

Doth yet in his fair welkin once ap­pear;

Till sable Night, mother of Dread and Fear,

Upon the world dim dark­ness doth dis­play,

And in her vaulty prison stows the Day.



For then is Tar­quin brought unto his bed,

In­tend­ing wear­i­ness with heavy spright;

For, after sup­per, long he ques­tioned

With mod­est Lucrece, and wore out the night:

Now leaden slum­ber with life’s strength doth fight;

And every­one to rest them­selves be­take,

Save thieves, and cares, and troubled minds, that wake.



As one of which doth Tar­quin lie re­volving

The sun­dry dangers of his will’s ob­tain­ing;

Yet ever to ob­tain his will resolv­ing,

Though weak-built hopes per­suade him to ab­stain­ing:

Despair to gain doth traffic oft for gain­ing;

And when great treas­ure is the meed pro­posed,

Though death be ad­junct, there’s no death sup­posed.



Those that much covet are with gain so fond,

For what they have not, that which they pos­sess

They scat­ter and un­loose it from their bond,

And so, by hop­ing more, they have but less;

Or, gain­ing more, the profit of ex­cess

Is but to sur­feit, and such griefs sus­tain,

That they prove bank­rupt in this poor-rich gain.



The aim of all is but to nurse the life

With hon­our, wealth, and ease, in wan­ing age;

And in this aim there is such thwart­ing strife,

That one for all, or all for one we gage;

As life for hon­our in fell battle’s rage;

Hon­our for wealth; and oft that wealth doth cost

The death of all, and all to­gether lost.



So that in vent’ring ill we leave to be

The things we are, for that which we ex­pect;

And this am­bi­tious foul in­firm­ity,

In hav­ing much, tor­ments us with de­fect

Of that we have: so then we do neg­lect

The thing we have; and, all for want of wit,

Make some­thing noth­ing, by aug­ment­ing it.



Such haz­ard now must dot­ing Tar­quin make,

Pawn­ing his hon­our to ob­tain his lust;

And for him­self him­self he must for­sake:

Then where is truth, if there be no self-trust?

When shall he think to find a stranger just,

When he him­self him­self con­founds, be­trays

To slan­der­ous tongues and wretched hate­ful days?



Now stole upon the time the dead of night,

When heavy sleep had closed up mor­tal eyes:

No com­fort­able star did lend his light,

No noise but owls’ and wolves’ death-bod­ing cries;

Now serves the sea­son that they may sur­prise

The silly lambs; pure thoughts are dead and still,

While lust and murder wake to stain and kill.



And now this lust­ful lord leap’d from his bed,

Throw­ing his mantle rudely o’er his arm;

Is madly toss’d between de­sire and dread;

Th’ one sweetly flat­ters, th’ other feareth harm;

But hon­est fear, be­witch’d with lust’s foul charm,

Doth too too oft be­take him to re­tire,

Beaten away by brain-sick rude de­sire.



His fal­chion on a flint he softly smiteth,

That from the cold stone sparks of fire do fly;

Whereat a waxen torch forth­with he lighteth,

Which must be lode-star to his lust­ful eye;

And to the flame thus speaks ad­visedly,

“As from this cold flint I en­forced this fire,

So Lucrece must I force to my de­sire.”



Here pale with fear he doth pre­med­it­ate

The dangers of his loath­some en­ter­prise,

And in his in­ward mind he doth de­bate

What fol­low­ing sor­row may on this arise:

Then look­ing scorn­fully, he doth des­pise

His na­ked ar­mour of still-slaughter’d lust,

And justly thus con­trols his thoughts un­just:



“Fair torch, burn out thy light, and lend it not

To darken her whose light ex­cel­leth thine:

And die, un­hal­low’d thoughts, be­fore you blot

With your un­clean­ness that which is di­vine;

Of­fer pure in­cense to so pure a shrine:

Let fair hu­man­ity ab­hor the deed

That spots and stains love’s mod­est snow-white weed.



“O shame to knight­hood and to shin­ing arms!

O foul dis­hon­our to my house­hold’s grave!

O im­pi­ous act, in­clud­ing all foul harms!

A mar­tial man to be soft fancy’s slave!

True valour still a true re­spect should have;

Then my di­gres­sion is so vile, so base,

That it will live en­graven in my face.



“Yea, though I die, the scan­dal will sur­vive,

And be an eye-sore in my golden coat;

Some loath­some dash the her­ald will con­trive,

To cipher me how fondly I did dote;

That my pos­ter­ity, sham’d with the note,

Shall curse my bones, and hold it for no sin

To wish that I their father had not been.



“What win I, if I gain the thing I seek?

A dream, a breath, a froth of fleet­ing joy.

Who buys a minute’s mirth to wail a week?

Or sells etern­ity to get a toy?

For one sweet grape who will the vine des­troy?

Or what fond beg­gar, but to touch the crown,

Would with the sceptre straight be strucken down?



“If Col­lat­inus dream of my in­tent,

Will he not wake, and in a des­per­ate rage

Post hither, this vile pur­pose to pre­vent?

This siege that hath en­girt his mar­riage,

This blur to youth, this sor­row to the sage,

This dy­ing vir­tue, this sur­viv­ing shame,

Whose crime will bear an ever-dur­ing blame?



“O, what ex­cuse can my in­ven­tion make,

When thou shalt charge me with so black a deed?

Will not my tongue be mute, my frail joints shake,

Mine eyes forego their light, my false heart bleed?

The guilt be­ing great, the fear doth still ex­ceed;

And ex­treme fear can neither fight nor fly,

But cow­ard-like with trem­bling ter­ror die.



“Had Col­lat­inus kill’d my son or sire,

Or lain in am­bush to be­tray my life,

Or were he not my dear friend, this de­sire

Might have ex­cuse to work upon his wife,

As in re­venge or quit­tal of such strife:

But as he is my kins­man, my dear friend,

The shame and fault finds no ex­cuse nor end.



“Shame­ful it is; ay, if the fact be known:

Hate­ful it is; there is no hate in lov­ing:

I’ll beg her love; but she is not her own:

The worst is but denial and re­prov­ing:

My will is strong, past reason’s weak re­mov­ing.

Who fears a sen­tence or an old man’s saw

Shall by a painted cloth be kept in awe.”



Thus, grace­less, holds he dis­pu­ta­tion

’Tween frozen con­science and hot-burn­ing will,

And with good thoughts makes dis­pens­a­tion,

Ur­ging the worser sense for vant­age still;

Which in a mo­ment doth con­found and kill

All pure ef­fects, and doth so far pro­ceed,

That what is vile shows like a vir­tu­ous deed.



Quoth he, “She took me kindly by the hand,

And gaz’d for tid­ings in my eager eyes,

Fear­ing some hard news from the war­like band,

Where her be­loved Col­lat­inus lies.

O, how her fear did make her col­our rise!

First red as roses that on lawn we lay,

Then white as lawn, the roses took away.



“And how her hand, in my hand be­ing lock’d,

Forced it to tremble with her loyal fear!

Which struck her sad, and then it faster rock’d,

Until her hus­band’s wel­fare she did hear;

Whereat she smiled with so sweet a cheer,

That had Nar­cissus seen her as she stood,

Self-love had never drown’d him in the flood.



“Why hunt I then for col­our or ex­cuses?

All orators are dumb when beauty pleadeth;

Poor wretches have re­morse in poor ab­uses;

Love thrives not in the heart that shad­ows dreadeth:

Af­fec­tion is my cap­tain, and he leadeth;

And when his gaudy ban­ner is dis­play’d,

The cow­ard fights and will not be dis­may’d.



“Then, child­ish fear, avaunt! de­bat­ing, die!

Respect and reason wait on wrinkled age!

My heart shall never coun­ter­mand mine eye;

Sad pause and deep re­gard be­seem the sage;

My part is youth, and beats these from the stage:

Desire my pi­lot is, beauty my prize;

Then who fears sink­ing where such treas­ure lies?”



As corn o’er­grown by weeds, so heed­ful fear

Is al­most chok’d by un­res­isted lust.

Away he steals with open­ing, listen­ing ear,

Full of foul hope, and full of fond mis­trust;

Both which, as ser­vit­ors to the un­just,

So cross him with their op­pos­ite per­sua­sion,

That now he vows a league, and now in­va­sion.



Within his thought her heav­enly im­age sits,

And in the self-same seat sits Col­lat­ine:

That eye which looks on her con­founds his wits;

That eye which him be­holds, as more di­vine,

Unto a view so false will not in­cline;

But with a pure ap­peal seeks to the heart,

Which once cor­rup­ted takes the worser part;



And therein heartens up his servile powers,

Who, flat­ter’d by their leader’s joc­und show,

Stuff up his lust, as minutes fill up hours;

And as their cap­tain, so their pride doth grow,

Pay­ing more slav­ish trib­ute than they owe.

By rep­rob­ate de­sire thus madly led,

The Ro­man lord mar­cheth to Lucrece’ bed.



The locks between her cham­ber and his will,

Each one by him en­forc’d re­tires his ward;

But, as they open they all rate his ill,

Which drives the creep­ing thief to some re­gard:

The threshold grates the door to have him heard;

Night-wan­der­ing weasels shriek to see him there;

They fright him, yet he still pur­sues his fear.



As each un­will­ing portal yields him way,

Through little vents and cran­nies of the place

The wind wars with his torch, to make him stay,

And blows the smoke of it into his face,

Ex­tin­guish­ing his con­duct in this case;

But his hot heart, which fond de­sire doth scorch,

Puffs forth an­other wind that fires the torch:



And be­ing lighted, by the light he spies

Lu­cre­tia’s glove, wherein her needle sticks;

He takes it from the rushes where it lies,

And grip­ing it, the needle his fin­ger pricks;

As who should say “This glove to wan­ton tricks

Is not in­ured; re­turn again in haste;

Thou see’st our mis­tress’ or­na­ments are chaste.”



But all these poor for­bid­dings could not stay him;

He in the worst sense con­strues their denial:

The doors, the wind, the glove, that did delay him,

He takes for ac­ci­dental things of trial;

Or as those bars which stop the hourly dial,

Who with a linger­ing stay his course doth let,

Till every minute pays the hour his debt.



“So, so,” quoth he, “these lets at­tend the time,

Like little frosts that some­time threat the spring.

To add a more re­joicing to the prime,

And give the sneaped birds more cause to sing.

Pain pays the in­come of each pre­cious thing;

Huge rocks, high winds, strong pir­ates, shelves and sands,

The mer­chant fears, ere rich at home he lands.”



Now is he come unto the cham­ber door,

That shuts him from the heaven of his thought,

Which with a yield­ing latch, and with no more,

Hath barr’d him from the blessed thing he sought.

So from him­self im­pi­ety hath wrought,

That for his prey to pray he doth be­gin,

As if the heav­ens should coun­ten­ance his sin.



But in the midst of his un­fruit­ful prayer,

Hav­ing so­li­cited the eternal power,

That his foul thoughts might com­pass his fair fair,

And they would stand aus­pi­cious to the hour,

Even there he starts: quoth he, “I must de-flower:

The powers to whom I pray ab­hor this fact,

How can they then as­sist me in the act?



“Then Love and For­tune be my gods, my guide!

My will is back’d with res­ol­u­tion:

Thoughts are but dreams till their ef­fects be tried,

The black­est sin is clear’d with ab­so­lu­tion;

Against love’s fire fear’s frost hath dis­sol­u­tion.

The eye of heaven is out, and misty night

Covers the shame that fol­lows sweet de­light.”



This said, his guilty hand pluck’d up the latch,

And with his knee the door he opens wide.

The dove sleeps fast that this night-owl will catch:

Thus treason works ere trait­ors be es­pied.

Who sees the lurk­ing ser­pent steps aside;

But she, sound sleep­ing, fear­ing no such thing,

Lies at the mercy of his mor­tal sting.



Into the cham­ber wickedly he stalks,

And gaz­eth on her yet un­stained bed.

The cur­tains be­ing close, about he walks,

Rolling his greedy eye­balls in his head:

By their high treason is his heart misled;

Which gives the watch-word to his hand full soon

To draw the cloud that hides the sil­ver moon.



Look, as the fair and fiery-poin­ted sun,

Rush­ing from forth a cloud, be­reaves our sight;

Even so, the cur­tain drawn, his eyes be­gun

To wink, be­ing blinded with a greater light:

Whether it is that she re­flects so bright,

That dazzleth them, or else some shame sup­posed;

But blind they are, and keep them­selves en­closed.



O, had they in that dark­some prison died!

Then had they seen the period of their ill;

Then Col­lat­ine again by Lucrece’ side,

In his clear bed might have re­posed still:

But they must ope, this blessed league to kill;

And holy-thoughted Lucrece to their sight

Must sell her joy, her life, her world’s de­light.



Her lily hand her rosy cheek lies un­der,

Cozen­ing the pil­low of a law­ful kiss;

Who, there­fore angry, seems to part in sun­der,

Swelling on either side to want his bliss;

Between whose hills her head en­tombed is:

Where, like a vir­tu­ous monu­ment, she lies,

To be ad­mired of lewd un­hal­low’d eyes.



Without the bed her other fair hand was,

On the green cov­er­let; whose per­fect white

Show’d like an April daisy on the grass,

With pearly sweat, re­sem­bling dew of night,

Her eyes, like marigolds, had sheathed their light,

And can­op­ied in dark­ness sweetly lay,

Till they might open to ad­orn the day.



Her hair, like golden threads, play’d with her breath;

O mod­est wan­tons! wan­ton mod­esty!

Show­ing life’s tri­umph in the map of death,

And death’s dim look in life’s mor­tal­ity:

Each in her sleep them­selves so beau­tify,

As if between them twain there were no strife,

But that life liv’d in death, and death in life.



Her breasts, like ivory globes circled with blue,

A pair of maiden worlds un­conquered,

Save of their lord no bear­ing yoke they knew,

And him by oath they truly hon­oured.

These worlds in Tar­quin new am­bi­tion bred;

Who, like a foul usurper, went about

From this fair throne to heave the owner out.



What could he see but migh­tily he noted?

What did he note but strongly he de­sired?

What he be­held, on that he firmly doted,

And in his will his wil­ful eye he tired.

With more than ad­mir­a­tion he ad­mired

Her azure veins, her ala­baster skin,

Her coral lips, her snow-white dimpled chin.



As the grim lion fawneth o’er his prey,

Sharp hun­ger by the con­quest sat­is­fied,

So o’er this sleep­ing soul doth Tar­quin stay,

His rage of lust by graz­ing qual­i­fied;

Slack’d, not sup­press’d; for stand­ing by her side,

His eye, which late this mutiny re­strains,

Unto a greater up­roar tempts his veins:



And they, like strag­gling slaves for pil­lage fight­ing,

Ob­dur­ate vas­sals fell ex­ploits ef­fect­ing,

In bloody death and rav­ish­ment de­light­ing,

Nor chil­dren’s tears nor moth­ers’ groans re­spect­ing,

Swell in their pride, the on­set still ex­pect­ing:

Anon his beat­ing heart, alarum strik­ing,

Gives the hot charge and bids them do their lik­ing.



His drum­ming heart cheers up his burn­ing eye,

His eye com­mends the lead­ing to his hand;

His hand, as proud of such a dig­nity,

Smoking with pride, march’d on to make his stand

On her bare breast, the heart of all her land;

Whose ranks of blue veins, as his hand did scale,

Left their round tur­rets des­ti­tute and pale.



They, mus­ter­ing to the quiet cab­inet

Where their dear gov­erness and lady lies,

Do tell her she is dread­fully be­set,

And fright her with con­fu­sion of their cries:

She, much amaz’d, breaks ope her lock’d-up eyes,

Who, peep­ing forth this tu­mult to be­hold,

Are by his flam­ing torch dimm’d and con­troll’d.



Ima­gine her as one in dead of night

From forth dull sleep by dread­ful fancy wak­ing,

That thinks she hath be­held some ghastly sprite,

Whose grim as­pect sets every joint a shak­ing:

What ter­ror ’tis! but she, in worser tak­ing,

From sleep dis­turbed, heed­fully doth view

The sight which makes sup­posed ter­ror true.



Wrapp’d and con­foun­ded in a thou­sand fears,

Like to a new-kill’d bird she trem­bling lies;

She dares not look; yet, wink­ing, there ap­pears

Quick-shift­ing antics, ugly in her eyes:

Such shad­ows are the weak brain’s for­ger­ies:

Who, angry that the eyes fly from their lights,

In dark­ness daunts them with more dread­ful sights.



His hand, that yet re­mains upon her breast—

Rude ram, to bat­ter such an ivory wall!—

May feel her heart—poor cit­izen—dis­tress’d,

Wound­ing it­self to death, rise up and fall,

Beat­ing her bulk, that his hand shakes withal.

This moves in him more rage, and lesser pity,

To make the breach and enter this sweet city.



First, like a trum­pet, doth his tongue be­gin

To sound a par­ley to his heart­less foe,

Who o’er the white sheet peers her whiter chin,

The reason of this rash alarm to know,

Which he by dumb de­mean­our seeks to show;

But she with vehe­ment pray­ers ur­geth still

Under what col­our he com­mits this ill.



Thus he replies: “The col­our in thy face,

That even for an­ger makes the lily pale,

And the red rose blush at her own dis­grace,

Shall plead for me and tell my lov­ing tale:

Under that col­our am I come to scale

Thy never-con­quer’d fort: the fault is thine,

For those thine eyes be­tray thee unto mine.



“Thus I fore­stall thee, if thou mean to chide:

Thy beauty hath en­snared thee to this night,

Where thou with pa­tience must my will abide,

My will that marks thee for my earth’s de­light,

Which I to con­quer sought with all my might;

But as re­proof and reason beat it dead,

By thy bright beauty was it newly bred.



“I see what crosses my at­tempt will bring;

I know what thorns the grow­ing rose de­fends;

I think the honey guarded with a sting;

All this, be­fore­hand, coun­sel com­pre­hends:

But will is deaf, and hears no heed­ful friends;

Only he hath an eye to gaze on beauty,

And dotes on what he looks, ’gainst law or duty.



“I have de­bated, even in my soul,

What wrong, what shame, what sor­row I shall breed;

But noth­ing can Af­fec­tion’s course con­trol,

Or stop the head­long fury of his speed.

I know re­pent­ant tears en­sue the deed,

Re­proach, dis­dain, and deadly enmity;

Yet strike I to em­brace mine in­famy.”



This said, he shakes aloft his Ro­man blade,

Which, like a fal­con tower­ing in the skies,

Coucheth the fowl be­low with his wings’ shade,

Whose crooked beak threats if he mount he dies:

So un­der his in­sult­ing fal­chion lies

Harm­less Lu­cre­tia, mark­ing what he tells

With trem­bling fear, as fowl hear fal­con’s bells.



“Lucrece,” quoth he, “this night I must en­joy thee:

If thou deny, then force must work my way,

For in thy bed I pur­pose to des­troy thee;

That done, some worth­less slave of thine I’ll slay.

To kill thine hon­our with thy life’s de­cay;

And in thy dead arms do I mean to place him,

Swear­ing I slew him, see­ing thee em­brace him.



“So thy sur­viv­ing hus­band shall re­main

The scorn­ful mark of every open eye;

Thy kins­men hang their heads at this dis­dain,

Thy is­sue blurr’d with name­less bas­tardy:

And thou, the au­thor of their ob­lo­quy,

Shalt have thy tres­pass cited up in rhymes,

And sung by chil­dren in suc­ceed­ing times.



“But if thou yield, I rest thy secret friend:

The fault un­known is as a thought un­acted;

A little harm, done to a great good end,

For law­ful policy re­mains en­acted.

The pois­on­ous simple some­times is com­pacted

In a pure com­pound; be­ing so ap­plied,

His venom in ef­fect is pur­i­fied.



“Then, for thy hus­band and thy chil­dren’s sake,

Tender my suit: be­queath not to their lot

The shame that from them no device can take,

The blem­ish that will never be for­got;

Worse than a slav­ish wipe, or birth-hour’s blot:

For marks descried in men’s nativ­ity

Are nature’s faults, not their own in­famy.”



Here with a cocka­trice’ dead-killing eye

He rouseth up him­self and makes a pause;

While she, the pic­ture of pure piety,

Like a white hind un­der the grype’s sharp claws,

Pleads in a wil­der­ness where are no laws,

To the rough beast that knows no gentle right,

Nor aught obeys but his foul ap­pet­ite.



But when a black-fac’d cloud the world doth threat,

In his dim mist the as­pir­ing moun­tains hid­ing,

From earth’s dark womb some gentle gust doth get,

Which blows these pitchy va­pours from their bid­ing,

Hin­der­ing their present fall by this di­vid­ing;

So his un­hal­low’d haste her words delays,

And moody Pluto winks while Orph­eus plays.



Yet, foul night-work­ing cat, he doth but dally,

While in his hold-fast foot the weak mouse panteth;

Her sad be­ha­viour feeds his vul­ture folly,

A swal­low­ing gulf that even in plenty wanteth:

His ear her pray­ers ad­mits, but his heart granteth

No pen­et­rable en­trance to her plain­ing:

Tears harden lust, though marble wear with rain­ing.



Her pity-plead­ing eyes are sadly fix’d

In the re­morse­less wrinkles of his face;

Her mod­est elo­quence with sighs is mix’d,

Which to her oratory adds more grace.

She puts the period of­ten from his place,

And midst the sen­tence so her ac­cent breaks,

That twice she doth be­gin ere once she speaks.



She con­jures him by high almighty Jove,

By knight­hood, gentry, and sweet friend­ship’s oath,

By her un­timely tears, her hus­band’s love,

By holy hu­man law, and com­mon troth,

By heaven and earth, and all the power of both,

That to his bor­row’d bed he make re­tire,

And stoop to hon­our, not to foul de­sire.



Quoth she, “Re­ward not hos­pit­al­ity

With such black pay­ment as thou hast pre­ten­ded;

Mud not the foun­tain that gave drink to thee;

Mar not the thing that can­not be amended;

End thy ill aim be­fore the shoot be ended:

He is no wood­man that doth bend his bow

To strike a poor un­season­able doe.



“My hus­band is thy friend; for his sake spare me:

Thy­self art mighty; for thine own sake leave me:

My­self a weak­ling; do not then en­snare me:

Thou look’st not like de­ceit; do not de­ceive me.

My sighs, like whirl­winds, la­bour hence to heave thee:

If ever man were moved with wo­man’s moans,

Be moved with my tears, my sighs, my groans:



“All which to­gether, like a troubled ocean,

Beat at thy rocky and wreck-threat­en­ing heart,

To soften it with their con­tinual mo­tion;

For stones dis­solved to wa­ter do con­vert.

O, if no harder than a stone thou art,

Melt at my tears, and be com­pas­sion­ate!

Soft pity enters at an iron gate.



“In Tar­quin’s like­ness I did en­ter­tain thee:

Hast thou put on his shape to do him shame?

To all the host of heaven I com­plain me,

Thou wrong’st his hon­our, wound’st his princely name.

Thou art not what thou seem’st; and if the same,

Thou seem’st not what thou art, a god, a king;

For kings like gods should gov­ern everything.



“How will thy shame be seeded in thine age,

When thus thy vices bud be­fore thy spring!

If in thy hope thou darest do such out­rage,

What darest thou not when once thou art a king?

O, be re­mem­ber’d, no out­rageous thing

From vas­sal act­ors can he wiped away;

Then kings’ mis­deeds can­not be hid in clay.



“This deed will make thee only lov’d for fear;

But happy mon­archs still are fear’d for love:

With foul of­fend­ers thou per­force must bear,

When they in thee the like of­fences prove:

If but for fear of this, thy will re­move;

For princes are the glass, the school, the book,

Where sub­jects’ eyes do learn, do read, do look.



“And wilt thou be the school where Lust shall learn?

Must he in thee read lec­tures of such shame?

Wilt thou be glass, wherein it shall dis­cern

Author­ity for sin, war­rant for blame,

To priv­ilege dis­hon­our in thy name?

Thou back’st re­proach against long-liv­ing laud,

And mak’st fair repu­ta­tion but a bawd.



“Hast thou com­mand? by him that gave it thee,

From a pure heart com­mand thy rebel will:

Draw not thy sword to guard iniquity,

For it was lent thee all that brood to kill.

Thy princely of­fice how canst thou ful­fill,

When, pat­tern’d by thy fault, foul sin may say,

He learn’d to sin, and thou didst teach the way?



“Think but how vile a spec­tacle it were,

To view thy present tres­pass in an­other.

Men’s faults do sel­dom to them­selves ap­pear;

Their own trans­gres­sions par­tially they smother:

This guilt would seem death-worthy in thy brother.

O, how are they wrapp’d in with in­fam­ies

That from their own mis­deeds askance their eyes!



“To thee, to thee, my heaved-up hands ap­peal,

Not to se­du­cing lust, thy rash re­lier:

I sue for ex­iled majesty’s re­peal;

Let him re­turn, and flat­ter­ing thoughts re­tire:

His true re­spect will prison false de­sire,

And wipe the dim mist from thy dot­ing eyne,

That thou shalt see thy state and pity mine.”



“Have done,” quoth he: “my un­con­trolled tide

Turns not, but swells the higher by this let.

Small lights are soon blown out, huge fires abide,

And with the wind in greater fury fret:

The petty streams that pay a daily debt

To their salt sov­er­eign, with their fresh falls’ haste,

Add to his flow, but al­ter not his taste.”



“Thou art,” quoth she, “a sea, a sov­er­eign king;

And, lo, there falls into thy bound­less flood

Black lust, dis­hon­our, shame, mis­gov­ern­ing,

Who seek to stain the ocean of thy blood.

If all these petty ills shall change thy good,

Thy sea within a puddle’s womb is hearsed,

And not the puddle in thy sea dis­persed.



“So shall these slaves be king, and thou their slave;

Thou nobly base, they basely dig­ni­fied;

Thou their fair life, and they thy fouler grave:

Thou loathed in their shame, they in thy pride:

The lesser thing should not the greater hide;

The ce­dar stoops not to the base shrub’s foot,

But low shrubs whither at the ce­dar’s root.



“So let thy thoughts, low vas­sals to thy state—”

“No more,” quoth he; “by heaven, I will not hear thee:

Yield to my love; if not, en­forced hate,

In­stead of love’s coy touch, shall rudely tear thee;

That done, des­pite­fully I mean to bear thee

Unto the base bed of some ras­cal groom,

To be thy part­ner in this shame­ful doom.”



This said, he sets his foot upon the light,

For light and lust are deadly en­emies:

Shame fol­ded up in blind con­ceal­ing night,

When most un­seen, then most doth tyr­an­nize.

The wolf hath seized his prey, the poor lamb cries;

Till with her own white fleece her voice con­troll’d

En­tombs her out­cry in her lips’ sweet fold:



For with the nightly linen that she wears

He pens her piteous clam­ours in her head;

Cool­ing his hot face in the chast­est tears

That ever mod­est eyes with sor­row shed.

O, that prone lust should stain so pure a bed!

The spots whereof could weep­ing purify,

Her tears should drop on them per­petu­ally.



But she hath lost a dearer thing than life,

And he hath won what he would lose again:

This forced league doth force a fur­ther strife;

This mo­ment­ary joy breeds months of pain;

This hot de­sire con­verts to cold dis­dain:

Pure Chastity is rifled of her store,

And Lust, the thief, far poorer than be­fore.



Look, as the full-fed hound or gorged hawk,

Unapt for tender smell or speedy flight,

Make slow pur­suit, or al­to­gether balk

The prey wherein by nature they de­light;

So sur­feit-tak­ing Tar­quin fares this night:

His taste de­li­cious, in di­ges­tion sour­ing,

De­vours his will, that lived by foul de­vour­ing.



O, deeper sin than bot­tom­less con­ceit

Can com­pre­hend in still ima­gin­a­tion!

Drunken Desire must vomit his re­ceipt,

Ere he can see his own ab­om­in­a­tion.

While Lust is in his pride no ex­clam­a­tion

Can curb his heat, or rein his rash de­sire,

Till, like a jade, Self-will him­self doth tire.



And then with lank and lean dis­col­our’d cheek,

With heavy eye, knit brow, and strength­less pace,

Feeble Desire, all rec­re­ant, poor, and meek,

Like to a bank­rupt beg­gar wails his case:

The flesh be­ing proud, Desire doth fight with Grace,

For there it rev­els; and when that de­cays,

The guilty rebel for re­mis­sion prays.



So fares it with this fault­ful lord of Rome,

Who this ac­com­plish­ment so hotly chased;

For now against him­self he sounds this doom,

That through the length of times he stands dis­graced:

Besides, his soul’s fair temple is de­faced;

To whose weak ru­ins muster troops of cares,

To ask the spot­ted prin­cess how she fares.



She says, her sub­jects with foul in­sur­rec­tion

Have bat­ter’d down her con­sec­rated wall,

And by their mor­tal fault brought in sub­jec­tion

Her im­mor­tal­ity, and made her thrall

To liv­ing death, and pain per­petual:

Which in her pres­ci­ence she con­trolled still,

But her foresight could not fore­stall their will.



Even in this thought through the dark night he stealeth,

A cap­tive vic­tor that hath lost in gain;

Bear­ing away the wound that noth­ing healeth,

The scar that will, des­pite of cure, re­main;

Leav­ing his spoil per­plex’d in greater pain.

She hears the load of lust he left be­hind,

And he the bur­then of a guilty mind.



He like a thiev­ish dog creeps sadly thence;

She like a wear­ied lamb lies pant­ing there;

He scowls, and hates him­self for his of­fence;

She, des­per­ate, with her nails her flesh doth tear;

He faintly flies, sweat­ing with guilty fear;

She stays, ex­claim­ing on the dire­ful night;

He runs, and chides his van­ish’d, loathed de­light.



He thence de­parts a heavy con­ver­tite;

She there re­mains a hope­less cast­away;

He in his speed looks for the morn­ing light;

She prays she never may be­hold the day;

“For day,” quoth she, “night’s scapes doth open lay,

And my true eyes have never prac­tised how

To cloak of­fences with a cun­ning brow.



“They think not but that every eye can see

The same dis­grace which they them­selves be­hold;

And there­fore would they still in dark­ness be,

To have their un­seen sin re­main un­told;

For they their guilt with weep­ing will un­fold,

And grave, like wa­ter that doth eat in steel,

Upon my cheeks what help­less shame I feel.”



Here she ex­claims against re­pose and rest,

And bids her eyes here­after still be blind.

She wakes her heart by beat­ing on her breast,

And bids it leap from thence, where it may find

Some purer chest, to close so pure a mind.

Frantic with grief thus breathes she forth her spite

Against the un­seen secrecy of night:



“O com­fort-killing Night, im­age of hell!

Dim re­gister and not­ary of shame!

Black stage for tra­gedies and murders fell!

Vast sin-con­ceal­ing chaos! nurse of blame!

Blind muffled bawd! dark har­bour for de­fame!

Grim cave of death! whis­per­ing con­spir­ator

With close-tongued treason and the rav­isher!



“O hate­ful, va­por­ous, and foggy Night!

Since thou art guilty of my cure­less crime,

Muster thy mists to meet the east­ern light,

Make war against pro­por­tion’d course of time;

Or if thou wilt per­mit the sun to climb

His wonted height, yet ere he go to bed,

Knit pois­on­ous clouds about his golden head.



“With rot­ten damps rav­ish the morn­ing air;

Let their ex­haled un­whole­some breaths make sick

The life of pur­ity, the su­preme fair,

Ere he ar­rive his weary noon-tide prick;

And let thy misty va­pours march so thick,

That in their smoky ranks his smother’d light

May set at noon and make per­petual night.



“Were Tar­quin Night, as he is but Night’s child,

The sil­ver-shin­ing queen he would dis­tain;

Her twink­ling hand­maids too, by him de­filed,

Through Night’s black bosom should not peep again:

So should I have co-part­ners in my pain;

And fel­low­ship in woe doth woe as­suage,

As palmers’ chat makes short their pil­grim­age.



“Where now I have no one to blush with me,

To cross their arms and hang their heads with mine,

To mask their brows, and hide their in­famy;

But I alone alone must sit and pine,

Season­ing the earth with showers of sil­ver brine,

Mingling my talk with tears, my grief with groans,

Poor wast­ing monu­ments of last­ing moans.



“O Night, thou fur­nace of foul-reek­ing smoke,

Let not the jeal­ous Day be­hold that face

Which un­der­neath thy black all-hid­ing cloak

Im­mod­esty lies mar­tyr’d with dis­grace!

Keep still pos­ses­sion of thy gloomy place,

That all the faults which in thy reign are made

May like­wise be sep­ulchred in thy shade!



“Make me not ob­ject to the tell-tale Day!

The light will show, char­ac­ter’d in my brow,

The story of sweet chastity’s de­cay,

The im­pi­ous breach of holy wed­lock vow:

Yea, the il­lit­er­ate, that know not how

To cipher what is writ in learned books,

Will quote my loath­some tres­pass in my looks.



“The nurse, to still her child, will tell my story,

And fright her cry­ing babe with Tar­quin’s name;

The orator, to deck his oratory,

Will couple my re­proach to Tar­quin’s shame;

Feast-find­ing min­strels, tun­ing my de­fame,

Will tie the hear­ers to at­tend each line,

How Tar­quin wronged me, I Col­lat­ine.



“Let my good name, that sense­less repu­ta­tion,

For Col­lat­ine’s dear love be kept un­spot­ted:

If that be made a theme for dis­pu­ta­tion,

The branches of an­other root are rot­ted,

And un­deserved re­proach to him al­lot­ted

That is as clear from this at­taint of mine

As I, ere this, was pure to Col­lat­ine.



“O un­seen shame! in­vis­ible dis­grace!

O un­felt sore! crest-wound­ing, private scar!

Re­proach is stamp’d in Col­lat­inus’ face,

And Tar­quin’s eye may read the mot afar,

How he in peace is wounded, not in war.

Alas, how many bear such shame­ful blows,

Which not them­selves, but he that gives them knows!



“If, Col­lat­ine, thine hon­our lay in me,

From me by strong as­sault it is bereft.

My honey lost, and I, a drone-like bee,

Have no per­fec­tion of my sum­mer left,

But robb’d and ran­sack’d by in­jur­i­ous theft:

In thy weak hive a wan­der­ing wasp hath crept,

And suck’d the honey which thy chaste bee kept.



“Yet am I guilty of thy hon­our’s wrack;

Yet for thy hon­our did I en­ter­tain him;

Com­ing from thee, I could not put him back,

For it had been dis­hon­our to dis­dain him:

Besides, of wear­i­ness he did com­plain him,

And talk’d of vir­tue: O un­look’d-for evil,

When vir­tue is pro­faned in such a devil!



“Why should the worm in­trude the maiden bud?

Or hate­ful cuckoos hatch in spar­rows’ nests?

Or toads in­fect fair founts with venom mud?

Or tyr­ant folly lurk in gentle breasts?

Or kings be break­ers of their own be­hests?

But no per­fec­tion is so ab­so­lute,

That some im­pur­ity doth not pol­lute.



“The aged man that cof­fers-up his gold

Is plagued with cramps, and gouts, and pain­ful fits;

And scarce hath eyes his treas­ure to be­hold,

But like still-pin­ing Tan­talus he sits,

And use­less barns the har­vest of his wits;

Hav­ing no other pleas­ure of his gain

But tor­ment that it can­not cure his pain.



“So then he hath it when he can­not use it,

And leaves it to be mas­ter’d by his young;

Who in their pride do presently ab­use it:

Their father was too weak, and they too strong,

To hold their cursed-blessed for­tune long.

The sweets we wish for turn to loathed sours

Even in the mo­ment that we call them ours.



“Un­ruly blasts wait on the tender spring;

Un­whole­some weeds take root with pre­cious flowers;

The ad­der hisses where the sweet birds sing;

What vir­tue breeds iniquity de­vours:

We have no good that we can say is ours,

But ill-an­nexed Op­por­tun­ity

Or kills his life or else his qual­ity.



“O Op­por­tun­ity, thy guilt is great!

’Tis thou that ex­ecutest the traitor’s treason:

Thou set’st the wolf where he the lamb may get;

Who­ever plots the sin, thou ’point’st the sea­son;

’Tis thou that spurn’st at right, at law, at reason;

And in thy shady cell, where none may spy him,

Sits Sin, to seize the souls that wander by him.



“Thou makest the vestal vi­ol­ate her oath;

Thou blow’st the fire when tem­per­ance is thaw’d;

Thou smother’st hon­esty, thou mur­ther’st troth;

Thou foul abet­tor! thou no­tori­ous bawd!

Thou plantest scan­dal and dis­placest laud:

Thou rav­isher, thou traitor, thou false thief,

Thy honey turns to gall, thy joy to grief!



“Thy secret pleas­ure turns to open shame,

Thy private feast­ing to a pub­lic fast,

Thy smooth­ing titles to a ragged name,

Thy sugar’d tongue to bit­ter worm­wood taste:

Thy vi­ol­ent van­it­ies can never last.

How comes it then, vile Op­por­tun­ity,

Be­ing so bad, such num­bers seek for thee?



“When wilt thou be the humble sup­pli­ant’s friend,

And bring him where his suit may be ob­tain’d?

When wilt thou sort an hour great strifes to end?

Or free that soul which wretched­ness hath chain’d?

Give physic to the sick, ease to the pain’d?

The poor, lame, blind, halt, creep, cry out for thee;

But they ne’er meet with Op­por­tun­ity.



“The pa­tient dies while the phys­i­cian sleeps;

The orphan pines while the op­pressor feeds;

Justice is feast­ing while the widow weeps;

Ad­vice is sport­ing while in­fec­tion breeds:

Thou grant’st no time for char­it­able deeds:

Wrath, envy, treason, rape, and murder’s rages,

Thy hein­ous hours wait on them as their pages.



“When Truth and Vir­tue have to do with thee,

A thou­sand crosses keep them from thy aid:

They buy thy help; but Sin ne’er gives a fee,

He gratis comes; and thou art well ap­paid

As well to hear as grant what he hath said.

My Col­lat­ine would else have come to me

When Tar­quin did, but he was stay’d by thee.



“Guilty thou art of murder and of theft,

Guilty of per­jury and sub­orna­tion,

Guilty of treason, for­gery, and shift,

Guilty of in­cest, that ab­om­in­a­tion;

An ac­cess­ory by thine in­clin­a­tion

To all sins past, and all that are to come,

From the cre­ation to the gen­eral doom.



“Mis-shapen Time, copes­mate of ugly Night,

Swift subtle post, car­rier of grisly care,

Eater of youth, false slave to false de­light,

Base watch of woes, sin’s pack-horse, vir­tue’s snare;

Thou nursest all and mur­therest all that are:

O, hear me then, in­jur­i­ous, shift­ing Time!

Be guilty of my death, since of my crime.



“Why hath thy ser­vant, Op­por­tun­ity,

Be­tray’d the hours thou gavest me to re­pose,

Can­cell’d my for­tunes, and en­chained me

To end­less date of never-end­ing woes?

Time’s of­fice is to fine the hate of foes;

To eat up er­rors by opin­ion bred,

Not spend the dowry of a law­ful bed.



“Time’s glory is to calm con­tend­ing kings,

To un­mask false­hood, and bring truth to light,

To stamp the seal of time in aged things,

To wake the morn and sen­tinel the night,

To wrong the wronger till he render right,

To ru­in­ate proud build­ings with thy hours,

And smear with dust their glit­ter­ing golden towers;



“To fill with worm-holes stately monu­ments,

To feed ob­li­vion with de­cay of things,

To blot old books and al­ter their con­tents,

To pluck the quills from an­cient ravens’ wings,

To dry the old oak’s sap and cher­ish springs,

To spoil an­tiquit­ies of ham­mer’d steel,

And turn the giddy round of For­tune’s wheel;



“To show the bel­dame daugh­ters of her daugh­ter,

To make the child a man, the man a child,

To slay the ti­ger that doth live by slaughter,

To tame the uni­corn and lion wild,

To mock the subtle, in them­selves be­guiled;

To cheer the plough­man with in­crease­ful crops,

And waste huge stones with little wa­ter-drops.



“Why work’st thou mis­chief in thy pil­grim­age,

Un­less thou couldst re­turn to make amends?

One poor re­tir­ing minute in an age

Would pur­chase thee a thou­sand thou­sand friends,

Lend­ing him wit that to bad debt­ors lends:

O, this dread night, wouldst thou one hour come back,

I could pre­vent this storm, and shun thy wrack!



“Thou cease­less lackey to etern­ity,

With some mis­chance cross Tar­quin in his flight:

Devise ex­tremes bey­ond ex­tremity,

To make him curse this cursed crime­ful night:

Let ghastly shad­ows his lewd eyes af­fright;

And the dire thought of his com­mit­ted evil

Shape every bush a hideous shape­less devil.



“Dis­turb his hours of rest with rest­less trances,

Afflict him in his bed with bedrid groans;

Let there bechance him pi­ti­ful mis­chances,

To make him moan; but pity not his moans:

Stone him with harden’d hearts, harder than stones;

And let mild wo­men to him lose their mild­ness,

Wilder to him than ti­gers in their wild­ness.



“Let him have time to tear his curled hair,

Let him have time against him­self to rave,

Let him have time of Time’s help to des­pair,

Let him have time to live a loathed slave,

Let him have time a beg­gar’s orts to crave;

And time to see one that by alms doth live

Dis­dain to him dis­dained scraps to give.



“Let him have time to see his friends his foes,

And merry fools to mock at him re­sort;

Let him have time to mark how slow time goes

In time of sor­row, and how swift and short

His time of folly and his time of sport;

And ever let his un­re­call­ing crime

Have time to wail th’ab­us­ing of his time.



“O Time, thou tu­tor both to good and bad,

Teach me to curse him that thou taught’st this ill!

At his own shadow let the thief run mad,

Him­self him­self seek every hour to kill!

Such wretched hands such wretched blood should spill;

For who so base would such an of­fice have

As slan­der­ous deaths­man to so base a slave?



The baser is he, com­ing from a king,

To shame his hope with deeds de­gen­er­ate:

The migh­tier man, the migh­tier is the thing

That makes him hon­our’d, or be­gets him hate;

For greatest scan­dal waits on greatest state.

The moon be­ing clouded presently is miss’d,

But little stars may hide them when they list.



“The crow may bathe his coal-black wings in mire,

And un­per­ceived fly with the filth away;

But if the like the snow-white swan de­sire,

The stain upon his sil­ver down will stay.

Poor grooms are sight­less night, kings glor­i­ous day:

Gn­ats are un­noted wheresoe’er they fly,

But eagles gazed upon with every eye.



“Out, idle words, ser­vants to shal­low fools!

Un­prof­it­able sounds, weak ar­bit­rat­ors!

Busy yourselves in skill-con­tend­ing schools;

De­bate where leis­ure serves with dull de­baters;

To trem­bling cli­ents be you me­di­at­ors:

For me, I force not ar­gu­ment a straw,

Since that my case is past the help of law.



“In vain I rail at Op­por­tun­ity,

At Time, at Tar­quin, and un­cheer­ful Night;

In vain I cavil with mine in­famy,

In vain I spurn at my con­firm’d des­pite:

This help­less smoke of words doth me no right.

The rem­edy in­deed to do me good

Is to let forth my foul-de­filed blood.



“Poor hand, why quiver’st thou at this de­cree?

Hon­our thy­self to rid me of this shame;

For if I die, my hon­our lives in thee;

But if I live, thou livest in my de­fame:

Since thou couldst not de­fend thy loyal dame,

And wast afeard to scratch her wicked foe,

Kill both thy­self and her for yield­ing so.”



This said, from her be-tumbled couch she star­teth,

To find some des­per­ate in­stru­ment of death:

But this no slaughter­house no tool im­par­teth

To make more vent for pas­sage of her breath;

Which, throng­ing through her lips, so van­ish­eth

As smoke from Aetna, that in air con­sumes,

Or that which from dis­charged can­non fumes.



“In vain,” quoth she, “I live, and seek in vain

Some happy mean to end a hap­less life.

I fear’d by Tar­quin’s fal­chion to be slain,

Yet for the self-same pur­pose seek a knife:

But when I fear’d I was a loyal wife:

So am I now: O no, that can­not be;

Of that true type hath Tar­quin rifled me.



“O, that is gone for which I sought to live,

And there­fore now I need not fear to die.

To clear this spot by death, at least I give

A badge of fame to slander’s liv­ery;

A dy­ing life to liv­ing in­famy:

Poor help­less help, the treas­ure stol’n away,

To burn the guilt­less cas­ket where it lay!



“Well, well, dear Col­lat­ine, thou shalt not know

The stained taste of vi­ol­ated troth;

I will not wrong thy true af­fec­tion so,

To flat­ter thee with an in­fringed oath;

This bas­tard graff shall never come to growth:

He shall not boast who did thy stock pol­lute

That thou art dot­ing father of his fruit.



Nor shall he smile at thee in secret thought,

Nor laugh with his com­pan­ions at thy state;

But thou shalt know thy in­terest was not bought

Basely with gold, but stol’n from forth thy gate.

For me, I am the mis­tress of my fate,

And with my tres­pass never will dis­pense,

Till life to death ac­quit my forced of­fence.



“I will not poison thee with my at­taint,

Nor fold my fault in cleanly-coin’d ex­cuses;

My sable ground of sin I will not paint,

To hide the truth of this false night’s ab­uses:

My tongue shall ut­ter all; mine eyes, like sluices,

As from a moun­tain-spring that feeds a dale,

Shall gush pure streams to purge my im­pure tale.”



By this, lament­ing Philomel had ended

The well-tuned warble of her nightly sor­row,

And sol­emn night with slow sad gait des­cen­ded

To ugly hell; when, lo, the blush­ing mor­row

Lends light to all fair eyes that light will bor­row:

But cloudy Lucrece shames her­self to see,

And there­fore still in night would cloister’d be.



Reveal­ing day through every cranny spies,

And seems to point her out where she sits weep­ing;

To whom she sob­bing speaks: “O eye of eyes,

Why pry’st thou through my win­dow? leave thy peep­ing:

Mock with thy tick­ling beams eyes that are sleep­ing:

Brand not my fore­head with thy pier­cing light,

For day hath nought to do what’s done by night.”



Thus cav­ils she with everything she sees:

True grief is fond and testy as a child,

Who way­ward once, his mood with nought agrees:

Old woes, not in­fant sor­rows, bear them mild;

Continu­ance tames the one; the other wild,

Like an un­prac­tised swim­mer plunging still,

With too much la­bour drowns for want of skill.



So she, deep-drenched in a sea of care,

Holds dis­pu­ta­tion with each thing she views,

And to her­self all sor­row doth com­pare;

No ob­ject but her pas­sion’s strength re­news;

And as one shifts, an­other straight en­sues:

So­me­time her grief is dumb and hath no words;

So­me­time ’tis mad, and too much talk af­fords.



The little birds that tune their morn­ing’s joy

Make her moans mad with their sweet melody:

For mirth doth search the bot­tom of an­noy;

Sad souls are slain in merry com­pany;

Grief best is pleased with grief’s so­ci­ety:

True sor­row then is feel­ingly suf­ficed

When with like semb­lance it is sym­path­ized.



’Tis double death to drown in ken of shore;

He ten times pines that pines be­hold­ing food;

To see the salve doth make the wound ache more;

Great grief grieves most at that would do it good;

Deep woes roll for­ward like a gentle flood,

Who, be­ing stopp’d, the bound­ing banks o’er­flows;

Grief dal­lied with nor law nor limit knows.



“You mock­ing birds,” quoth she, “your tunes en­tomb

Within your hol­low-swell­ing feather’d breasts,

And in my hear­ing be you mute and dumb:

My rest­less dis­cord loves no stops nor rests;

A woe­ful host­ess brooks not merry guests:

Rel­ish your nimble notes to pleas­ing ears;

Dis­tress likes dumps when time is kept with tears.



“Come, Philomel, that sing’st of rav­ish­ment,

Make thy sad grove in my dishevell’d hair:

As the dank earth weeps at thy lan­guish­ment,

So I at each sad strain will strain a tear,

And with deep groans the diapason bear;

For bur­den-wise I’ll hum on Tar­quin still,

While thou on Tereus des­cant’st bet­ter skill.



“And whiles against a thorn thou bear’st thy part,

To keep thy sharp woes wak­ing, wretched I,

To im­it­ate thee well, against my heart

Will fix a sharp knife to af­fright mine eye;

Who, if it wink, shall thereon fall and die.

These means, as frets upon an in­stru­ment,

Shall tune our heart-strings to true lan­guish­ment.



“And for, poor bird, thou sing’st not in the day,

As sham­ing any eye should thee be­hold,

Some dark deep desert, seated from the way,

That knows not parch­ing heat nor freez­ing cold,

Will we find out; and there we will un­fold

To creatures stern sad tunes, to change their kinds:

Since men prove beasts, let beasts bear gentle minds.”



As the poor frighted deer, that stands at gaze,

Wildly de­term­in­ing which way to fly,

Or one en­com­pass’d with a wind­ing maze,

That can­not tread the way out read­ily;

So with her­self is she in mutiny,

To live or die which of the twain were bet­ter,

When life is shamed, and death re­proach’s debtor.



“To kill my­self,” quoth she, “alack, what were it,

But with my body my poor soul’s pol­lu­tion?

They that lose half with greater pa­tience bear it

Than they whose whole is swal­low’d in con­fu­sion.

That mother tries a mer­ci­less con­clu­sion

Who, hav­ing two sweet babes, when death takes one,

Will slay the other and be nurse to none.



“My body or my soul, which was the dearer,

When the one pure, the other made di­vine?

Whose love of either to my­self was nearer,

When both were kept for heaven and Col­lat­ine?

Ay me! the bark peel’d from the lofty pine,

His leaves will wither and his sap de­cay;

So must my soul, her bark be­ing peel’d away.



“Her house is sack’d, her quiet in­ter­rup­ted,

Her man­sion bat­ter’d by the en­emy;

Her sac­red temple spot­ted, spoil’d, cor­rup­ted,

Grossly en­girt with dar­ing in­famy:

Then let it not be call’d im­pi­ety,

If in this blem­ish’d fort I make some hole

Through which I may con­vey this troubled soul.



“Yet die I will not till my Col­lat­ine

Have heard the cause of my un­timely death;

That he may vow, in that sad hour of mine,

Revenge on him that made me stop my breath.

My stained blood to Tar­quin I’ll be­queath,

Which by him tain­ted shall for him be spent,

And as his due writ in my test­a­ment.



“My hon­our I’ll be­queath unto the knife

That wounds my body so dis­hon­oured.

’Tis hon­our to de­prive dis­hon­our’d life;

The one will live, the other be­ing dead:

So of shame’s ashes shall my fame be bred;

For in my death I murder shame­ful scorn:

My shame so dead, mine hon­our is new-born.



“Dear lord of that dear jewel I have lost,

What leg­acy shall I be­queath to thee?

My res­ol­u­tion, love, shall be thy boast,

By whose ex­ample thou re­veng’d mayst be.

How Tar­quin must be used, read it in me:

My­self, thy friend, will kill my­self, thy foe,

And, for my sake, serve thou false Tar­quin so.



“This brief abridge­ment of my will I make:

My soul and body to the skies and ground;

My res­ol­u­tion, hus­band, do thou take;

Mine hon­our be the knife’s that makes my wound;

My shame be his that did my fame con­found;

And all my fame that lives dis­bursed be

To those that live, and think no shame of me.



“Thou, Col­lat­ine, shalt over­see this will;

How was I over­seen that thou shalt see it!

My blood shall wash the slander of mine ill;

My life’s foul deed, my life’s fair end shall free it.

Faint not, faint heart, but stoutly say ‘So be it:’

Yield to my hand; my hand shall con­quer thee:

Thou dead, both die, and both shall vic­tors be.”



This plot of death when sadly she had laid,

And wiped the brin­ish pearl from her bright eyes,

With un­tuned tongue she hoarsely calls her maid,

Whose swift obed­i­ence to her mis­tress hies;

For fleet-wing’d duty with thought’s feath­ers flies.

Poor Lucrece’ cheeks unto her maid seem so

As winter meads when sun doth melt their snow.



Her mis­tress she doth give de­mure good-mor­row,

With soft-slow tongue, true mark of mod­esty,

And sorts a sad look to her lady’s sor­row,

For why her face wore sor­row’s liv­ery;

But durst not ask of her au­da­ciously

Why her two suns were cloud-ec­lipsed so,

Nor why her fair cheeks over-wash’d with woe.



But as the earth doth weep, the sun be­ing set,

Each flower moisten’d like a melt­ing eye;

Even so the maid with swell­ing drops gan wet

Her circled eyne, en­forced by sym­pathy

Of those fair suns, set in her mis­tress’ sky,

Who in a salt-waved ocean quench their light,

Which makes the maid weep like the dewy night.



A pretty while these pretty creatures stand,

Like ivory con­duits coral cisterns filling:

One justly weeps; the other takes in hand

No cause, but com­pany, of her drops spill­ing:

Their gentle sex to weep are of­ten will­ing;

Griev­ing them­selves to guess at oth­ers’ smarts,

And then they drown their eyes or break their hearts.



For men have marble, wo­men waxen, minds,

And there­fore are they form’d as marble will;

The weak op­press’d, the im­pres­sion of strange kinds

Is form’d in them by force, by fraud, or skill:

Then call them not the au­thors of their ill,

No more than wax shall be ac­coun­ted evil

Wherein is stamp’d the semb­lance of a devil.



Their smooth­ness, like a goodly cham­paign plain,

Lays open all the little worms that creep;

In men, as in a rough-grown grove, re­main

Cave-keep­ing evils that ob­scurely sleep:

Through crys­tal walls each little mote will peep:

Though men can cover crimes with bold stern looks,

Poor wo­men’s faces are their own faults’ books.



No man in­veigh against the wither’d flower,

But chide rough winter that the flower hath kill’d:

Not that de­vour’d, but that which doth de­vour,

Is worthy blame. O, let it not be hild

Poor wo­men’s faults, that they are so ful­fill’d

With men’s ab­uses: those proud lords, to blame,

Make weak-made wo­men ten­ants to their shame.



The pre­ced­ent whereof in Lucrece view,

As­sail’d by night with cir­cum­stances strong

Of present death, and shame that might en­sue

By that her death, to do her hus­band wrong:

Such danger to res­ist­ance did be­long,

The dy­ing fear through all her body spread;

And who can­not ab­use a body dead?



By this, mild Pa­tience bid fair Lucrece speak

To the poor coun­ter­feit of her com­plain­ing:

“My girl,” quoth she, “on what oc­ca­sion break

Those tears from thee, that down thy cheeks are rain­ing?

If thou dost weep for grief of my sus­tain­ing,

Know, gentle wench, it small avails my mood:

If tears could help, mine own would do me good.



“But tell me, girl, when went”—and there she stay’d

Till after a deep groan—“Tar­quin from, hence?”

“Madam, ere I was up,” replied the maid,

“The more to blame my slug­gard neg­li­gence:

Yet with the fault I thus far can dis­pense;

My­self was stir­ring ere the break of day,

And, ere I rose, was Tar­quin gone away.



“But, lady, if your maid may be so bold,

She would re­quest to know your heav­i­ness.”

“O, peace!” quoth Lucrece: “if it should be told,

The re­pe­ti­tion can­not make it less;

For more it is than I can well ex­press:

And that deep tor­ture may be call’d a hell

When more is felt than one hath power to tell.



“Go, get me hither pa­per, ink, and pen:

Yet save that la­bour, for I have them here.

What should I say? One of my hus­band’s men

Bid thou be ready, by and by, to bear

A let­ter to my lord, my love, my dear:

Bid him with speed pre­pare to carry it;

The cause craves haste, and it will soon be writ.”



Her maid is gone, and she pre­pares to write,

First hov­er­ing o’er the pa­per with her quill:

Con­ceit and grief an eager com­bat fight;

What wit sets down is blot­ted straight with will;

This is too curi­ous-good, this blunt and ill:

Much like a press of people at a door,

Throng her in­ven­tions, which shall go be­fore.



At last she thus be­gins: “Thou worthy lord

Of that un­worthy wife that greeteth thee,

Health to thy per­son! next vouch­safe t’ af­ford—

If ever, love, thy Lucrece thou wilt see—

Some present speed to come and visit me.

So, I com­mend me from our house in grief:

My woes are te­di­ous, though my words are brief.”



Here folds she up the tenor of her woe,

Her cer­tain sor­row writ un­cer­tainly.

By this short sched­ule Col­lat­ine may know

Her grief, but not her grief’s true qual­ity:

She dares not thereof make dis­cov­ery,

Lest he should hold it her own gross ab­use,

Ere she with blood had stain’d her stain’d ex­cuse.



Besides, the life and feel­ing of her pas­sion

She hoards, to spend when he is by to hear her;

When sighs and groans and tears may grace the fash­ion

Of her dis­grace, the bet­ter so to clear her

From that sus­pi­cion which the world my might bear her.

To shun this blot, she would not blot the let­ter

With words, till ac­tion might be­come them bet­ter.



To see sad sights moves more than hear them told;

For then the eye in­ter­prets to the ear

The heavy mo­tion that it doth be­hold,

When every part a part of woe doth bear.

’Tis but a part of sor­row that we hear:

Deep sounds make lesser noise than shal­low fords,

And sor­row ebbs, be­ing blown with wind of words.



Her let­ter now is seal’d, and on it writ

“At Ardea to my lord with more than haste.”

The post at­tends, and she de­liv­ers it,

Char­ging the sour-faced groom to hie as fast

As lag­ging fowls be­fore the north­ern blast:

Speed more than speed but dull and slow she deems:

Ex­tremely still ur­geth such ex­tremes.



The homely vil­lain court’sies to her low;

And, blush­ing on her, with a stead­fast eye

Re­ceives the scroll without or yea or no,

And forth with bash­ful in­no­cence doth hie.

But they whose guilt within their bos­oms lie

Ima­gine every eye be­holds their blame;

For Lucrece thought he blush’d to see her shame



When, silly groom! God wot, it was de­fect

Of spirit, life, and bold au­da­city.

Such harm­less creatures have a true re­spect

To talk in deeds, while oth­ers sau­cily

Prom­ise more speed, but do it leis­urely:

Even so this pat­tern of the worn-out age

Pawn’d hon­est looks, but laid no words to gage.



His kindled duty kindled her mis­trust,

That two red fires in both their faces blazed;

She thought he blush’d, as know­ing Tar­quin’s lust,

And, blush­ing with him, wistly on him gazed;

Her earn­est eye did make him more amazed:

The more saw the blood his cheeks re­plen­ish,

The more she thought he spied in her some blem­ish.



But long she thinks till he re­turn again,

And yet the du­teous vas­sal scarce is gone.

The weary time she can­not en­ter­tain,

For now ’tis stale to sigh, to weep, to groan:

So woe hath wear­ied woe, moan tired moan,

That she her plaints a little while doth stay,

Paus­ing for means to mourn some newer way.



At last she calls to mind where hangs a piece

Of skil­ful paint­ing, made for Priam’s Troy;

Be­fore the which is drawn the power of Greece,

For Helen’s rape the city to des­troy,

Threat­en­ing cloud-kiss­ing Ilion with an­noy;

Which the con­ceited painter drew so proud,

As heaven, it seem’d, to kiss the tur­rets bow’d.



A thou­sand lam­ent­able ob­jects there,

In scorn of nature, art gave life­less life:

Many a dry drop seem’d a weep­ing tear,

Shed for the slaughter’d hus­band by the wife:

The red blood reek’d, to show the painter’s strife;

The dy­ing eyes gleam’d forth their ashy lights,

Like dy­ing coals burnt out in te­di­ous nights.



There might you see the la­bour­ing pi­oner

Begrim’d with sweat, and smeared all with dust;

And from the towers of Troy there would ap­pear

The very eyes of men through loop­holes thrust,

Gaz­ing upon the Greeks with little lust:

Such sweet ob­serv­ance in this work was had,

That one might see those far-off eyes look sad.



In great com­mand­ers grace and majesty

You might be­hold, tri­umph­ing in their faces;

In youth, quick bear­ing and dex­ter­ity;

And here and there the painter in­ter­laces

Pale cow­ards, march­ing on with trem­bling paces;

Which heart­less peas­ants did so well re­semble,

That one would swear he saw them quake and tremble.



In Ajax and Ulysses, O, what art

Of physiognomy might one be­hold!

The face of either ’cipher’d either’s heart;

Their face their man­ners most ex­pressly told:

In Ajax’ eyes blunt rage and rigour roll’d;

But the mild glance that sly Ulysses lent

Show’d deep re­gard and smil­ing gov­ern­ment.



There plead­ing might you see grave Nestor stand,

As ’twere en­cour­aging the Greeks to fight;

Mak­ing such sober ac­tion with his hand,

That it be­guiled at­ten­tion, charm’d the sight:

In speech, it seem’d, his beard, all sil­ver white,

Wagg’d up and down, and from his lips did fly

Thin wind­ing breath, which purl’d up to the sky.



About him were a press of gap­ing faces,

Which seem’d to swal­low up his sound ad­vice;

All jointly listen­ing, but with sev­eral graces,

As if some mer­maid did their ears en­tice,

Some high, some low, the painter was so nice;

The scalps of many, al­most hid be­hind,

To jump up higher seem’d, to mock the mind.



Here one man’s hand lean’d on an­other’s head,

His nose be­ing shadow’d by his neigh­bour’s ear;

Here one be­ing throng’d bears back, all boll’n and red;

Another smother’d seems to pelt and swear;

And in their rage such signs of rage they bear,

As, but for loss of Nestor’s golden words,

It seem’d they would de­bate with angry swords.



For much ima­gin­ary work was there;

Con­ceit de­ceit­ful, so com­pact, so kind,

That for Achilles’ im­age stood his spear,

Griped in an armed hand; him­self, be­hind,

Was left un­seen, save to the eye of mind:

A hand, a foot, a face, a leg, a head,

Stood for the whole to be ima­gined.



And from the walls of strong-be­sieged Troy

When their brave hope, bold Hector, march’d to field,

Stood many Tro­jan moth­ers, shar­ing joy

To see their youth­ful sons bright weapons wield;

And to their hope they such odd ac­tion yield,

That through their light joy seemed to ap­pear,

Like bright things stain’d, a kind of heavy fear.



And from the strond of Dardan, where they fought,

To Simois’ reedy banks, the red blood ran,

Whose waves to im­it­ate the battle sought

With swell­ing ridges; and their ranks began

To break upon the galled shore, and than

Re­tire again, till, meet­ing greater ranks,

They join, and shoot their foam at Simois’ banks.



To this well-painted piece is Lucrece come,

To find a face where all dis­tress is stell’d.

Many she sees where cares have carved some,

But none where all dis­tress and dol­our dwell’d,

Till she des­pair­ing Hecuba be­held,

Star­ing on Priam’s wounds with her old eyes,

Which bleed­ing un­der Pyrrhus’ proud foot lies.



In her the painter had ana­tom­ized

Time’s ruin, beauty’s wreck, and grim care’s reign:

Her cheeks with chops and wrinkles were dis­guised;

Of what she was no semb­lance did re­main:

Her blue blood, changed to black in every vein,

Want­ing the spring that those shrunk pipes had fed,

Show’d life im­prison’d in a body dead.



On this sad shadow Lucrece spends her eyes,

And shapes her sor­row to the bel­dame’s woes,

Who noth­ing wants to an­swer her but cries,

And bit­ter words to ban her cruel foes:

The painter was no god to lend her those;

And there­fore Lucrece swears he did her wrong,

To give her so much grief and not a tongue.



“Poor in­stru­ment,” quoth she, “without a sound,

I’ll tune thy woes with my lament­ing tongue;

And drop sweet balm in Priam’s painted wound,

And rail on Pyrrhus that hath done him wrong;

And with my tears quench Troy that burns so long;

And with my knife scratch out the angry eyes

Of all the Greeks that are thine en­emies.



“Show me the strum­pet that began this stir,

That with my nails her beauty I may tear.

Thy heat of lust, fond Paris, did in­cur

This load of wrath that burn­ing Troy doth bear:

Thy eye kindled the fire that bur­neth here;

And here in Troy, for tres­pass of thine eye,

The sire, the son, the dame, and daugh­ter die.



“Why should the private pleas­ure of someone

Be­come the pub­lic plague of many moe?

Let sin, alone com­mit­ted, light alone

Upon his head that hath trans­gressed so;

Let guilt­less souls be freed from guilty woe:

For one’s of­fence why should so many fall,

To plague a private sin in gen­eral?



“Lo, here weeps Hecuba, here Priam dies,

Here manly Hector faints, here Troilus swounds,

Here friend by friend in bloody chan­nel lies,

And friend to friend gives un­ad­vised wounds,

And one man’s lust these many lives con­founds:

Had dot­ing Priam check’d his son’s de­sire,

Troy had been bright with fame and not with fire.”



Here feel­ingly she weeps Troy’s painted woes:

For sor­row, like a heavy-hanging bell,

Once set on ringing, with his own weight goes;

Then little strength rings out the dole­ful knell:

So Lucrece set a-work, sad tales doth tell

To pen­cill’d pens­ive­ness and col­our’d sor­row;

She lends them words, and she their looks doth bor­row.



She throws her eyes about the paint­ing round,

And whom she finds for­lorn she doth lament.

At last she sees a wretched im­age bound,

That piteous looks to Phrygian shep­herds lent:

His face, though full of cares, yet show’d con­tent;

On­ward to Troy with the blunt swains he goes,

So mild, that Pa­tience seem’d to scorn his woes.



In him the painter la­bour’d with his skill

To hide de­ceit, and give the harm­less show

An humble gait, calm looks, eyes wail­ing still,

A brow un­bent, that seem’d to wel­come woe;

Cheeks neither red nor pale, but mingled so

That blush­ing red no guilty in­stance gave,

Nor ashy pale the fear that false hearts have.



But, like a con­stant and con­firmed devil,

He en­ter­tain’d a show so seem­ing just,

And therein so en­sconced his secret evil,

That jeal­ousy it­self cold not mis­trust

False-creep­ing craft and per­jury should thrust

Into so bright a day such black-faced storms,

Or blot with hell-born sin such saint-like forms.



The well-skill’d work­man this mild im­age drew

For per­jured Sinon, whose en­chant­ing story

The cred­u­lous Old Priam after slew;

Whose words, like wild­fire, burnt the shin­ing glory

Of rich-built Ilion, that the skies were sorry,

And little stars shot from their fixed places,

When their glass fell wherein they view’d their faces.



This pic­ture she ad­visedly per­used,

And chid the painter for his won­drous skill,

Say­ing, some shape in Sinon’s was ab­used;

So fair a form lodged not a mind so ill:

And still on him she gazed; and gaz­ing still,

Such signs of truth in his plain face she spied,

That she con­cludes the pic­ture was be­lied.



“It can­not be,” quoth she, “that so much guile”—

She would have said “can lurk in such a look;”

But Tar­quin’s shape came in her mind the while,

And from her tongue “can lurk” from “can­not” took;

“It can­not be” she in that sense for­sook,

And turn’d it thus, “It can­not be, I find,

But such a face should bear a wicked mind:



“For even as subtle Sinon here is painted,

So sober-sad, so weary, and so mild,

As if with grief or trav­ail he had fain­ted,

To me came Tar­quin armed; so be­guiled

With out­ward hon­esty, but yet de­filed

With in­ward vice: as Priam him did cher­ish,

So did I Tar­quin; so my Troy did per­ish.



“Look, look, how listen­ing Priam wets his eyes,

To see those bor­row’d tears that Sinon sheds!

Priam, why art thou old and yet not wise?

For every tear he falls a Tro­jan bleeds:

His eye drops fire, no wa­ter thence pro­ceeds;

Those round clear pearls of his that move thy pity,

Are balls of quench­less fire to burn thy city.



“Such dev­ils steal ef­fects from light­less hell;

For Sinon in his fire doth quake with cold,

And in that cold hot-burn­ing fire doth dwell;

These con­trar­ies such unity do hold,

Only to flat­ter fools, and make them bold:

So Priam’s trust false Sinon’s tears doth flat­ter,

That he finds means to burn his Troy with wa­ter.”



Here, all en­raged, such pas­sion her as­sails,

That pa­tience is quite beaten from her breast.

She tears the sense­less Sinon with her nails,

Com­par­ing him to that un­happy guest

Whose deed hath made her­self her­self de­test:

At last she smil­ingly with this gives o’er;

“Fool, fool!” quoth she, “his wounds will not be sore.”



Thus ebbs and flows the cur­rent of her sor­row,

And time doth weary time with her com­plain­ing.

She looks for night, and then she longs for mor­row,

And both she thinks too long with her re­main­ing:

Short time seems long in sor­row’s sharp sus­tain­ing:

Though woe be heavy, yet it sel­dom sleeps;

And they that watch see time how slow it creeps.



Which all this time hath over­s­lipp’d her thought,

That she with painted im­ages hath spent;

Be­ing from the feel­ing of her own grief brought

By deep sur­mise of oth­ers’ det­ri­ment;

Los­ing her woes in shows of dis­con­tent.

It easeth some, though none it ever cured,

To think their dol­our oth­ers have en­dured.



But now the mind­ful mes­sen­ger, come back,

Brings home his lord and other com­pany;

Who finds his Lucrece clad in mourn­ing black:

And round about her tear-dis­tained eye

Blue circles stream’d, like rain­bows in the sky:

These wa­ter-galls in her dim ele­ment

Fore­tell new storms to those already spent.



Which when her sad-be­hold­ing hus­band saw,

Amazedly in her sad face he stares:

Her eyes, though sod in tears, look’d red and raw,

Her lively col­our kill’d with deadly cares.

He hath no power to ask her how she fares:

Both stood, like old ac­quaint­ance in a trance,

Met far from home, won­der­ing each other’s chance.



At last he takes her by the blood­less hand,

And thus be­gins: “What un­couth ill event

Hath thee be­fall’n, that thou dost trem­bling stand?

Sweet love, what spite hath thy fair col­our spent?

Why art thou thus at­tired in dis­con­tent?

Un­mask, dear dear, this moody heav­i­ness,

And tell thy grief, that we may give re­dress.”



Three times with sighs she gives her sor­row fire,

Ere once she can dis­charge one word of woe:

At length ad­dress’d to an­swer his de­sire,

She mod­estly pre­pares to let them know

Her hon­our is ta’en pris­oner by the foe;

While Col­lat­ine and his con­sor­ted lords

With sad at­ten­tion long to hear her words.



And now this pale swan in her wa­tery nest

Be­gins the sad dirge of her cer­tain end­ing;

“Few words,” quoth she, “shall fit the tres­pass best,

Where no ex­cuse can give the fault amend­ing:

In me more woes than words are now de­pend­ing;

And my la­ments would be drawn out too long,

To tell them all with one poor tired tongue.



“Then be this all the task it hath to say:

Dear hus­band, in the in­terest of thy bed

A stranger came, and on that pil­low lay

Where thou wast wont to rest thy weary head;

And what wrong else may be ima­gined

By foul en­force­ment might be done to me,

From that, alas, thy Lucrece is not free.



“For in the dread­ful dead of dark mid­night,

With shin­ing fal­chion in my cham­ber came

A creep­ing creature, with a flam­ing light,

And softly cried ‘Awake, thou Ro­man dame,

And en­ter­tain my love; else last­ing shame

On thee and thine this night I will in­flict,

If thou my love’s de­sire do con­tra­dict.



“ ‘For some hard-fa­vour’d groom of thine,’ quoth he,

‘Un­less thou yoke thy lik­ing to my will,

I’ll murder straight, and then I’ll slaughter thee

And swear I found you where you did ful­fil

The loath­some act of lust, and so did kill

The lech­ers in their deed: this act will be

My fame and thy per­petual in­famy.’



“With this, I did be­gin to start and cry;

And then against my heart he sets his sword,

Swear­ing, un­less I took all pa­tiently,

I should not live to speak an­other word;

So should my shame still rest upon re­cord,

And never be for­got in mighty Rome

Th’ adul­ter­ate death of Lucrece and her groom.



“Mine en­emy was strong, my poor self weak,

And far the weaker with so strong a fear:

My bloody judge for­bade my tongue to speak;

No right­ful plea might plead for justice there:

His scar­let lust came evid­ence to swear

That my poor beauty had pur­loin’d his eyes;

And when the judge is robb’d the pris­oner dies.



“O, teach me how to make mine own ex­cuse!

Or at the least this refuge let me find;

Though my gross blood be stain’d with this ab­use,

Im­macu­late and spot­less is my mind;

That was not forced; that never was in­clined

To ac­cessary yield­ings, but still pure

Doth in her poison’d closet yet en­dure.”



Lo, here, the hope­less mer­chant of this loss,

With head de­clined, and voice damm’d up with woe,

With sad set eyes, and wretched arms across,

From lips new-waxen pale be­gins to blow

The grief away that stops his an­swer so:

But wretched as he is, he strives in vain;

What he breathes out his breath drinks up again.



As through an arch the vi­ol­ent roar­ing tide

Outruns the eye that doth be­hold his haste,

Yet in the eddy boundeth in his pride

Back to the strait that forc’d him on so fast;

In rage sent out, re­call’d in rage, be­ing past:

Even so his sighs, his sor­rows make a saw,

To push grief on, and back the same grief draw.



Which speech­less woe of his poor she at­ten­deth,

And his un­timely frenzy thus awaketh:

“Dear Lord, thy sor­row to my sor­row len­deth

Another power; no flood by rain­ing slaketh.

My woe too sens­ible thy pas­sion maketh

More feel­ing-pain­ful: let it then suf­fice

To drown one woe, one pair of weep­ing eyes.



“And for my sake, when I might charm thee so

For she that was thy Lucrece, now at­tend me:

Be sud­denly re­venged on my foe,

Thine, mine, his own: sup­pose thou dost de­fend me

From what is past: the help that thou shalt lend me

Comes all too late, yet let the traitor die;

For spar­ing justice feeds iniquity.



“But ere I name him, you fair lords,” quoth she,

Speak­ing to those that came with Col­lat­ine,

“Shall plight your hon­our­able faiths to me,

With swift pur­suit to venge this wrong of mine;

For ’tis a mer­it­ori­ous fair design

To chase in­justice with re­venge­ful arms:

Knights, by their oaths, should right poor ladies’ harms.”



At this re­quest, with noble dis­pos­i­tion

Each present lord began to prom­ise aid,

As bound in knight­hood to her im­pos­i­tion,

Longing to hear the hate­ful foe be­wray’d.

But she, that yet her sad task hath not said,

The prot­est­a­tion stops. “O, speak,” quoth she,

“How may this forced stain be wip’d from me?



“What is the qual­ity of mine of­fence,

Be­ing con­strain’d with dread­ful cir­cum­stance?

May my pure mind with the foul act dis­pense,

My low-de­clined hon­our to ad­vance?

May any terms ac­quit me from this chance?

The poison’d foun­tain clears it­self again;

And why not I from this com­pelled stain?”



With this, they all at once began to say,

Her body’s stain her mind un­tain­ted clears;

While with a joy­less smile she turns away

The face, that map which deep im­pres­sion bears

Of hard mis­for­tune, carved in it with tears.

“No, no,” quoth she, “no dame, here­after liv­ing,

By my ex­cuse shall claim ex­cuse’s giv­ing.”



Here with a sigh, as if her heart would break,

She throws forth Tar­quin’s name: “He, he,” she says,

But more than “he” her poor tongue could not speak;

Till after many ac­cents and delays,

Un­timely breath­ings, sick and short as­says,

She ut­ters this: “He, he, fair lords, ’tis he,

That guides this hand to give this wound to me.”



Even here she sheathed in her harm­less breast

A harm­ful knife, that thence her soul un­sheathed:

That blow did bail it from the deep un­rest

Of that pol­luted prison where it breathed:

Her con­trite sighs unto the clouds be­queathed

Her winged sprite, and through her wounds doth fly

Life’s last­ing date from can­cell’d des­tiny.



Stone-still, as­ton­ish’d with this deadly deed,

Stood Col­lat­ine and all his lordly crew;

Till Lucrece’ father that be­holds her bleed,

Him­self on her self-slaughter’d body threw;

And from the purple foun­tain Bru­tus drew

The mur­der­ous knife, and, as it left the place,

Her blood, in poor re­venge, held it in chase;



And bub­bling from her breast, it doth di­vide

In two slow rivers, that the crim­son blood

Circles her body in on every side,

Who, like a late-sack’d is­land, vastly stood

Bare and un­peopled in this fear­ful flood.

Some of her blood still pure and red re­main’d,

And some look’d black, and that false Tar­quin stain’d.



About the mourn­ing and con­gealed face

Of that black blood a wa­tery rigol goes,

Which seems to weep upon the tain­ted place:

And ever since, as pity­ing Lucrece’ woes,

Cor­rup­ted blood some wa­tery token shows;

And blood un­tain­ted still doth red abide,

Blush­ing at that which is so pu­tri­fied.



“Daughter, dear daugh­ter,” old Lu­cre­tius cries,

“That life was mine which thou hast here de­prived.

If in the child the father’s im­age lies,

Where shall I live now Lucrece is un­lived?

Thou wast not to this end from me de­rived

If chil­dren pre-de­cease pro­gen­it­ors,

We are their off­spring, and they none of ours.



“Poor broken glass, I of­ten did be­hold

In thy sweet semb­lance my old age new born;

But now that fair fresh mir­ror, dim and old,

Shows me a bare-boned death by time out­worn:

O, from thy cheeks my im­age thou hast torn,

And shiver’d all the beauty of my glass,

That I no more can see what once I was!



“O time, cease thou thy course and last no longer,

If they sur­cease to be that should sur­vive.

Shall rot­ten death make con­quest of the stronger

And leave the fal­ter­ing feeble souls alive?

The old bees die, the young pos­sess their hive:

Then live, sweet Lucrece, live again, and see

Thy father die, and not thy father thee!”



By this, starts Col­lat­ine as from a dream,

And bids Lu­cre­tius give his sor­row place;

And then in key-cold Lucrece’ bleed­ing stream

He falls, and bathes the pale fear in his face,

And coun­ter­feits to die with her a space;

Till manly shame bids him pos­sess his breath

And live to be re­venged on her death.



The deep vex­a­tion of his in­ward soul

Hath served a dumb ar­rest upon his tongue;

Who, mad that sor­row should his use con­trol,

Or keep him from heart-eas­ing words so long,

Be­gins to talk; but through his lips do throng

Weak words, so thick come in his poor heart’s aid,

That no man could dis­tin­guish what he said.



Yet some­time “Tar­quin” was pro­nounced plain,

But through his teeth, as if the name he tore.

This windy tem­pest, till it blow up rain,

Held back his sor­row’s tide, to make it more;

At last it rains, and busy winds give o’er:

Then son and father weep with equal strife

Who should weep most, for daugh­ter or for wife.



The one doth call her his, the other his,

Yet neither may pos­sess the claim they lay.

The father says “She’s mine,” “O, mine she is,”

Replies her hus­band: “do not take away

My sor­row’s in­terest; let no mourner say

He weeps for her, for she was only mine,

And only must be wail’d by Col­lat­ine.”



“O,” quoth Lu­cre­tius, “I did give that life

Which she too early and too late hath spill’d.”

“Woe, woe,” quoth Col­lat­ine, “she was my wife,

I owed her, and ’tis mine that she hath kill’d.”

“My daugh­ter” and “my wife” with clam­ours fill’d

The dis­persed air, who, hold­ing Lucrece’ life,

An­swer’d their cries, “my daugh­ter” and “my wife.”



Bru­tus, who pluck’d the knife from Lucrece’ side,

See­ing such emu­la­tion in their woe,

Began to clothe his wit in state and pride,

Bury­ing in Lucrece’ wound his folly’s show.

He with the Ro­mans was es­teemed so

As silly-jeer­ing idi­ots are with kings,

For sport­ive words and ut­ter­ing fool­ish things:



But now he throws that shal­low habit by,

Wherein deep policy did him dis­guise;

And arm’d his long-hid wits ad­visedly,

To check the tears in Col­lat­inus’ eyes.

“Thou wronged lord of Rome,” quoth he, “arise:

Let my un­soun­ded self, sup­posed a fool,

Now set thy long-ex­per­i­enced wit to school.



“Why, Col­lat­ine, is woe the cure for woe?

Do wounds help wounds, or grief help griev­ous deeds?

Is it re­venge to give thy­self a blow,

For his foul act by whom thy fair wife bleeds?

Such child­ish hu­mour from weak minds pro­ceeds:

Thy wretched wife mis­took the mat­ter so,

To slay her­self, that should have slain her foe.



“Cour­ageous Ro­man, do not steep thy heart

In such re­lent­ing dew of lam­ent­a­tions;

But kneel with me and help to bear thy part,

To rouse our Ro­man gods with in­voc­a­tions,

That they will suf­fer these ab­om­in­a­tions,

Since Rome her­self in them doth stand dis­graced,

By our strong arms from forth her fair streets chased.



“Now, by the Cap­itol that we ad­ore,

And by this chaste blood so un­justly stain’d,

By heaven’s fair sun that breeds the fat earth’s store,

By all our coun­try rights in Rome main­tain’d,

And by chaste Lucrece’ soul that late com­plain’d

Her wrongs to us, and by this bloody knife,

We will re­venge the death of this true wife.”



This said, he struck his hand upon his breast,

And kiss’d the fatal knife, to end his vow;

And to his prot­est­a­tion urged the rest,

Who, won­der­ing at him, did his words al­low:

Then jointly to the ground their knees they bow;

And that deep vow, which Bru­tus made be­fore,

He doth again re­peat, and that they swore.



When they had sworn to this ad­vised doom,

They did con­clude to bear dead Lucrece thence;

To show her bleed­ing body thor­ough Rome,

And so to pub­lish Tar­quin’s foul of­fence:

Which be­ing done with speedy di­li­gence,

The Ro­mans plaus­ibly did give con­sent

To Tar­quin’s ever­last­ing ban­ish­ment.





The Passionate Pilgrim




I


When my love swears that she is made of truth,

I do be­lieve her, though I know she lies,

That she might think me some un­tutor’d youth,

Un­skil­ful in the world’s false for­ger­ies.

Thus vainly think­ing that she thinks me young,

Al­though I know my years be past the best,

I smil­ing credit her false-speak­ing tongue,

Out­fa­cing faults in love with love’s ill rest.

But where­fore says my love that she is young?

And where­fore say not I that I am old?

O, love’s best habit is a sooth­ing tongue,

And age, in love, loves not to have years told.

There­fore, I’ll lie with love, and love with me,

Since that our faults in love thus smother’d be.





II


Two loves I have, of com­fort and des­pair,

That like two spir­its do sug­gest me still;

My bet­ter an­gel is a man right fair,

My worser spirit a wo­man col­our’d ill.

To win me soon to hell, my fe­male evil

Temp­teth my bet­ter an­gel from my side,

And would cor­rupt my saint to be a devil,

Woo­ing his pur­ity with her fair pride.

And whether that my an­gel be turn’d fiend,

Sus­pect I may, yet not dir­ectly tell:

For be­ing both to me, both to each friend,

I guess one an­gel in an­other’s hell;

The truth I shall not know, but live in doubt,

Till my bad an­gel fire my good one out.





III


Did not the heav­enly rhet­oric of thine eye,

’Gainst whom the world could not hold ar­gu­ment,

Per­suade my heart to this false per­jury?

Vows for thee broke de­serve not pun­ish­ment.

A wo­man I forswore; but I will prove,

Thou be­ing a god­dess, I forswore not thee:

My vow was earthly, thou a heav­enly love;

Thy grace be­ing gain’d cures all dis­grace in me.

My vow was breath, and breath a va­pour is;

Then, thou fair sun, that on this earth doth shine,

Ex­hale this va­pour vow; in thee it is:

If broken, then it is no fault of mine.

If by me broke, what fool is not so wise

To break an oath, to win a para­dise?





IV


Sweet Cytherea, sit­ting by a brook

With young Adonis, lovely, fresh, and green,

Did court the lad with many a lovely look,

Such looks as none could look but beauty’s queen.

She told him stor­ies to de­light his ear;

She show’d him fa­vours to al­lure his eye;

To win his heart, she touch’d him here and there—

Touches so soft still con­quer chastity.

But whether un­ripe years did want con­ceit,

Or he re­fused to take her figur’d prof­fer,

The tender nib­bler would not touch the bait,

But smile and jest at every gentle of­fer:

Then fell she on her back, fair queen, and to­ward:

He rose and ran away; ah, fool too froward!





V


If love make me forsworn, how shall I swear to love?

O never faith could hold, if not to beauty vow’d:

Though to my­self forsworn, to thee I’ll con­stant prove;

Those thoughts, to me like oaks, to thee like os­iers bow’d.

Study his bias leaves, and makes his book thine eyes,

Where all those pleas­ures live that art can com­pre­hend.

If know­ledge be the mark, to know thee shall suf­fice;

Well learned is that tongue that well can thee com­mend;

All ig­nor­ant that soul that sees thee without won­der;

Which is to me some praise, that I thy parts ad­mire:

Thy eye Jove’s light­ning seems, thy voice his dread­ful thun­der,

Which, not to an­ger bent, is mu­sic and sweet fire.

Ce­les­tial as thou art, O do not love that wrong,

To sing heaven’s praise with such an earthly tongue.





VI


Scarce had the sun dried up the dewy morn,

And scarce the herd gone to the hedge for shade,

When Cytherea, all in love for­lorn,

A long­ing tar­ri­ance for Adonis made

Under an os­ier grow­ing by a brook,

A brook where Adon used to cool his spleen:

Hot was the day; she hot­ter that did look

For his ap­proach, that of­ten there had been.

Anon he comes, and throws his mantle by,

And stood stark na­ked on the brook’s green brim:

The sun look’d on the world with glor­i­ous eye,

Yet not so wistly as this queen on him.

He, spy­ing her, bounced in, whereas he stood;

“O Jove,” quoth she, “why was not I a flood!”





VII


Fair is my love, but not so fair as fickle;

Mild as a dove, but neither true nor trusty;

Brighter than glass, and yet, as glass is, brittle;

Softer than wax, and yet, as iron, rusty:

A lily pale, with dam­ask die to grace her,

None fairer, nor none falser to de­face her.



Her lips to mine how of­ten hath she joined,

Between each kiss her oaths of true love swear­ing!

How many tales to please me hath she coined,

Dread­ing my love, the loss thereof still fear­ing!

Yet in the midst of all her pure protest­ings,

Her faith, her oaths, her tears, and all were jest­ings.



She burn’d with love, as straw with fire flameth;

She burn’d out love, as soon as straw out­bur­neth;

She fram’d the love, and yet she foil’d the fram­ing;

She bade love last, and yet she fell a turn­ing.

Was this a lover, or a lecher whether?

Bad in the best, though ex­cel­lent in neither.





VIII


If mu­sic and sweet po­etry agree,

As they must needs, the sis­ter and the brother,

Then must the love be great ’twixt thee and me,

Be­cause thou lovest the one, and I the other.

Dow­land to thee is dear, whose heav­enly touch

Upon the lute doth rav­ish hu­man sense;

Spenser to me, whose deep con­ceit is such

As, passing all con­ceit, needs no de­fence.

Thou lovest to hear the sweet me­lodi­ous sound

That Phoe­bus’ lute, the queen of mu­sic, makes;

And I in deep de­light am chiefly drown’d

Whenas him­self to singing he be­takes.

One god is god of both, as po­ets feign;

One knight loves both, and both in thee re­main.





IX


Fair was the morn when the fair queen of love,

⋮

Paler for sor­row than her milk-white dove,

For Adon’s sake, a young­ster proud and wild;

Her stand she takes upon a steep-up hill:

Anon Adonis comes with horn and hounds;

She, silly queen, with more than love’s good will,

Forbade the boy he should not pass those grounds:

“Once,” quoth she, “did I see a fair sweet youth

Here in these brakes deep-wounded with a boar,

Deep in the thigh, a spec­tacle of ruth!

See, in my thigh,” quoth she, “here was the sore.”

She showed hers: he saw more wounds than one,

And blush­ing fled, and left her all alone.





X


Sweet rose, fair flower, un­timely pluck’d, soon vaded,

Pluck’d in the bud, and vaded in the spring!

Bright ori­ent pearl, alack, too timely shaded!

Fair creature, kill’d too soon by death’s sharp sting!

Like a green plum that hangs upon a tree,

And falls, through wind, be­fore the fall should be.



I weep for thee, and yet no cause I have;

For why? thou left’st me noth­ing in thy will:

And yet thou left’st me more than I did crave;

For why? I craved noth­ing of thee still:

O yes, dear friend, I par­don crave of thee,

Thy dis­con­tent thou didst be­queath to me.





XI


Venus, with young Adonis sit­ting by her

Under a myrtle shade, began to woo him:

She told the young­ling how god Mars did try her,

And as he fell to her, so fell she to him.

“Even thus,” quoth she, “the war­like god em­braced me,”

And then she clipp’d Adonis in her arms;

“Even thus,” quoth she, “the war­like god un­laced me,”

As if the boy should use like lov­ing charms;

“Even thus,” quoth she, “he seized on my lips,”

And with her lips on his did act the seizure:

And as she fetched breath, away he skips,

And would not take her mean­ing nor her pleas­ure.

Ah, that I had my lady at this bay,

To kiss and clip me till I run away!





XII


Crabbed age and youth can­not live to­gether:

Youth is full of pleas­ance, age is full of care;

Youth like sum­mer morn, age like winter weather;

Youth like sum­mer brave, age like winter bare.

Youth is full of sport, age’s breath is short;

Youth is nimble, age is lame;

Youth is hot and bold, age is weak and cold;

Youth is wild, and age is tame.

Age, I do ab­hor thee; youth, I do ad­ore thee;

O, my love, my love is young!

Age, I do defy thee: O, sweet shep­herd, hie thee,

For me­thinks thou stay’st too long.





XIII


Beauty is but a vain and doubt­ful good;

A shin­ing gloss that va­deth sud­denly;

A flower that dies when first it “gins to bud;

A brittle glass that’s broken presently:

A doubt­ful good, a gloss, a glass, a flower,

Lost, vaded, broken, dead within an hour.



And as goods lost are seld or never found,

As vaded gloss no rub­bing will re­fresh,

As flowers dead lie wither’d on the ground,

As broken glass no ce­ment can re­dress,

So beauty blem­ish’d once’s forever lost,

In spite of physic, paint­ing, pain and cost.





XIV


Good night, good rest. Ah, neither be my share:

She bade good night that kept my rest away;

And daff’d me to a cabin hang’d with care,

To des­cant on the doubts of my de­cay.

“Farewell,” quoth she, “and come again to­mor­row:”

Fare well I could not, for I supp’d with sor­row.



Yet at my part­ing sweetly did she smile,

In scorn or friend­ship, nill I con­strue whether:

’T may be, she joy’d to jest at my ex­ile,

’T may be, again to make me wander thither:

“Wander,” a word for shad­ows like my­self,

As take the pain, but can­not pluck the pelf.





XV


Lord, how mine eyes throw gazes to the east!

My heart doth charge the watch; the morn­ing rise

Doth cite each mov­ing sense from idle rest.

Not dar­ing trust the of­fice of mine eyes,

While Philomela sits and sings, I sit and mark,

And wish her lays were tuned like the lark;



For she doth wel­come day­light with her ditty,

And drives away dark dis­mal-dream­ing night:

The night so pack’d, I post unto my pretty;

Heart hath his hope, and eyes their wished sight;

Sor­row changed to solace, solace mix’d with sor­row;

For why, she sigh’d and bade me come to­mor­row.



Were I with her, the night would post too soon;

But now are minutes ad­ded to the hours;

To spite me now, each minute seems a moon;

Yet not for me, shine sun to suc­cour flowers!

Pack night, peep day; good day, of night now bor­row:

Short, night, to-night, and length thy­self to-mor­row.





Sonnets to Sundry Notes of Music




XVI


It was a lord­ing’s daugh­ter, the fairest one of three,

That liked of her mas­ter as well as well might be,

Till look­ing on an Eng­lish­man, the fair’st that eye could see,

Her fancy fell a-turn­ing.

Long was the com­bat doubt­ful that love with love did fight,

To leave the mas­ter love­less, or kill the gal­lant knight:

To put in prac­tice either, alas, it was a spite

Unto the silly dam­sel!

But one must be re­fused; more mickle was the pain

That noth­ing could be used to turn them both to gain,

For of the two the trusty knight was wounded with dis­dain:

Alas, she could not help it!

Thus art with arms con­tend­ing was vic­tor of the day,

Which by a gift of learnlng did bear the maid away:

Then, lul­laby, the learned man hath got the lady gay;

For now my song is ended.





XVII


On a day, alack the day!

Love, whose month was ever May,

Spied a blos­som passing fair,

Play­ing in the wan­ton air:

Through the vel­vet leaves the wind,

All un­seen, ’gan pas­sage find;

That the lover, sick to death,

Wish’d him­self the heaven’s breath,

“Air,” quoth he, “thy cheeks may blow;

Air, would I might tri­umph so!

But, alas! my hand hath sworn

Ne’er to pluck thee from thy thorn:

Vow, alack! for youth un­meet:

Youth, so apt to pluck a sweet.

Thou for whom Jove would swear

Juno but an Ethi­ope were;

And deny him­self for Jove,

Turn­ing mor­tal for thy love.”





XVIII


My flocks feed not,

My ewes breed not,

My rams speed not,

All is amiss:

Love is dy­ing,

Faith’s de­fy­ing,

Heart’s deny­ing,

Causer of this.

All my merry jigs are quite for­got,

All my lady’s love is lost, God wot:

Where her faith was firmly fix’d in love,

There a nay is plac’d without re­move.

One silly cross

Wrought all my loss;

O frown­ing For­tune, cursed, fickle dame!

For now I see

In­con­stancy

More in wo­men than in men re­main.



In black mourn I,

All fears scorn I,

Love bath for­lorn me,

Liv­ing in thrall:

Heart is bleed­ing,

All help need­ing,

O cruel speed­ing,

Fraughted with gall.

My shep­herd’s pipe can sound no deal;

My wether’s bell rings dole­ful knell;

My cur­tail dog, that wont to have play’d,

Plays not at all, but seems afraid;

With sighs so deep

Pro­cures to weep,

In howl­ing wise, to see my dole­ful plight.

How sighs re­sound

Through heart­less ground,

Like a thou­sand van­quish’d men in bloody fight!



Clear wells spring not,

Sweet birds sing not,

Green plants bring not

Forth they die;

Herds stand weep­ing,

Flocks all sleep­ing,

Nymphs back peep­ing

Fear­fully:

All our pleas­ure known to us poor swains,

All our merry meet­ings on the plains,

All our even­ing sport from us is fled,

All our love is lost, for Love is dead.

Farewell, sweet lass,

Thy like ne’er was

For a sweet con­tent, the cause of all my moan:

Poor Cory­don

Must live alone;

Other help for him I see that there is none.





XIX


When as thine eye hath chose the dame,

And stall’d the deer that thou shouldst strike,

Let reason rule things worthy blame,

As well as fancy par­tial might:

Take coun­sel of some wiser head,

Neither too young, nor yet un­wed.



And when thou comest thy tale to tell,

Smooth not thy tongue with filed talk,

Lest she some subtle prac­tice smell—

A cripple soon can find a halt;—

But plainly say thou lovest her well,

And set thy per­son forth to sell.



What though her frown­ing brows be bent,

Her cloudy looks will calm ere night:

And then too late she will re­pent

That thus dis­sembled her de­light;

And twice de­sire, ere it be day,

That which with scorn she put away.



What though she strive to try her strength,

And ban and brawl, and say thee nay,

Her feeble force will yield at length,

When craft hath taught her thus to say,

“Had wo­men been so strong as men,

In faith, you had not had it then.”



And to her will frame all thy ways;

Spare not to spend—and chiefly there

Where thy desert may merit praise,

By ringing in thy lady’s ear:

The strongest castle, tower, and town,

The golden bul­let beats it down.



Serve al­ways with as­sured trust,

And in thy suit be humble, true;

Un­less thy lady prove un­just,

Press never thou to choose anew:

When time shall serve, be thou not slack

To prof­fer, though she put thee back.



The wiles and guiles that wo­men work,

Dis­sembled with an out­ward show,

The tricks and toys that in them lurk,

The cock that treads them shall not know.

Have you not heard it said full oft,

A wo­man’s nay doth stand for nought?



Think wo­men still to strive with men,

To sin and never for to saint:

There is no heaven, by holy then,

When time with age doth them at­taint.

Were kisses all the joys in bed,

One wo­man would an­other wed.



But, soft! enough, too much, I fear;

Lest that my mis­tress hear my song,

She’ll not stick to round me i’ the ear,

To teach my tongue to be so long:

Yet will she blush, here be it said,

To hear her secrets so be­wray’d.





XX


Live with me, and be my love,

And we will all the pleas­ures prove

That hills and val­leys, dales and fields,

And all the craggy moun­tains yields.



There will we sit upon the rocks,

And see the shep­herds feed their flocks,

By shal­low rivers, by whose falls

Melodi­ous birds sing mad­rig­als.



There will I make thee a bed of roses,

With a thou­sand fra­grant posies,

A cap of flowers, and a kirtle

Em­broider’d all with leaves of myrtle.



A belt of straw and ivy buds,

With coral clasps and am­ber studs;

And if these pleas­ures may thee move,

Then live with me and be my love.



Love’s An­swer.



If that the world and love were young,

And truth in every shep­herd’s tongue,

These pretty pleas­ures might me move

To live with thee and be thy love.





XXI


As it fell upon a day

In the merry month of May,

Sit­ting in a pleas­ant shade

Which a grove of myrtles made,

Beasts did leap, and birds did sing,

Trees did grow, and plants did spring;

Everything did ban­ish moan,

Save the night­in­gale alone:

She, poor bird, as all for­lorn,

Lean’d her breast up-till a thorn,

And there sung the dole­full’st ditty,

That to hear it was great pity:

“Fie, fie, fie,” now would she cry;

“Tereu, tereu!” by and by;

That to hear her so com­plain,

Scarce I could from tears re­frain;

For her griefs, so lively shown,

Made me think upon mine own.

Ah, thought I, thou mourn’st in vain;

None take pity on thy pain:

Sense­less trees, they can­not hear thee;

Ruth­less bears, they will not cheer thee.

King Pan­dion, he is dead;

All thy friends are lapp’d in lead;

All thy fel­low-birds do sing,

Care­less of thy sor­row­ing.

Even so, poor bird, like thee,

None alive will pity me.

Whilst as fickle for­tune smil’d,

Thou and I were both be­guil’d.

Every­one that flat­ters thee

Is no friend in misery.

Words are easy like the wind;

Faith­ful friends are hard to find.

Every man will be thy friend,

Whilst thou hast where­with to spend;

But if store of crowns be scant,

No man will sup­ply thy want.

If that one be prod­igal,

Bounti­ful they will him call:

And with such-like flat­ter­ing,

“Pity but he were a king;”

If he be ad­dict to vice,

Quickly him they will en­tice;

If to wo­men he be bent,

They have at com­mandement:

But if for­tune once do frown,

Then farewell his great renown:

They that fawn’d on him be­fore,

Use his com­pany no more.

He that is thy frend in­deed,

He will help thee in thy need;

If thou sor­row, he will weep;

If thou wake, he can­not sleep:

Thus of every grief in heart

He with thee doth bear a part.

These are cer­tain signs to know

Faith­ful friend from flat­ter­ing foe.





The Phoenix and the Turtle


Let the bird of loudest lay,

On the sole Ar­a­bian tree,

Her­ald sad and trum­pet be,

To whose sound chaste wings obey.



But thou shriek­ing har­binger,

Foul pre­cur­rer of the fiend,

Augur of the fever’s end,

To this troop come thou not near!



From this ses­sion in­ter­dict

Every fowl of tyr­ant wing,

Save the eagle, feather’d king:

Keep the ob­sequy so strict.



Let the priest in sur­plice white,

That de­funct­ive mu­sic can,

Be the death-divin­ing swan,

Lest the re­quiem lack his right.



And thou treble-dated crow,

That thy sable gender makest

With the breath thou givest and takest,

’Mongst our mourn­ers shalt thou go.



Here the an­them doth com­mence:

Love and con­stancy is dead;

Phoenix and the turtle fled

In a mu­tual flame from hence.



So they loved, as love in twain

Had the es­sence but in one;

Two dis­tincts, di­vi­sion none:

Num­ber there in love was slain.



Hearts re­mote, yet not asun­der;

Distance, and no space was seen

’Twixt this turtle and his queen:

But in them it were a won­der.



So between them love did shine,

That the turtle saw his right

Flam­ing in the phoenix’ sight;

Either was the other’s mine.



Prop­erty was thus ap­palled,

That the self was not the same;

Single nature’s double name

Neither two nor one was called.



Reason, in it­self con­foun­ded,

Saw di­vi­sion grow to­gether,

To them­selves yet either neither,

Simple were so well com­poun­ded,



That it cried, How true a twain

Seemeth this con­cord­ant one!

Love hath reason, reason none,

If what parts can so re­main.



Whereupon it made this threne

To the phoenix and the dove,

Co-su­premes and stars of love,

As chorus to their tra­gic scene.



Threnos.



Beauty, truth, and rar­ity.

Grace in all sim­pli­city,

Here en­clos’d in cinders lie.



Death is now the phoenix’ nest;

And the turtle’s loyal breast

To etern­ity doth rest,



Leav­ing no pos­ter­ity:

’Twas not their in­firm­ity,

It was mar­ried chastity.



Truth may seem, but can­not be;

Beauty brag, but ’tis not she;

Truth and beauty bur­ied be.



To this urn let those re­pair

That are either true or fair;

For these dead birds sigh a prayer.





Sonnets


To the only be­get­ter of

        these en­su­ing son­nets

        Mr. W. H. all hap­pi­ness

        and that etern­ity

        prom­ised by

        our ever-liv­ing poet

        wish­eth

        the well-wish­ing

        ad­ven­ture in

        set­ting

        forth

        T. T.





I


From fairest creatures we de­sire in­crease,

That thereby beauty’s rose might never die,

But as the riper should by time de­cease,

His tender heir might bear his memory:

But thou, con­trac­ted to thine own bright eyes,

Feed’st thy light’s flame with self-sub­stan­tial fuel,

Mak­ing a fam­ine where abund­ance lies,

Thy­self thy foe, to thy sweet self too cruel.

Thou that art now the world’s fresh or­na­ment

And only her­ald to the gaudy spring,

Within thine own bud bur­i­est thy con­tent

And, tender churl, mak’st waste in nig­gard­ing.

Pity the world, or else this glut­ton be,

To eat the world’s due, by the grave and thee.





II


When forty win­ters shall be­siege thy brow,

And dig deep trenches in thy beauty’s field,

Thy youth’s proud liv­ery so gazed on now,

Will be a tat­ter’d weed, of small worth held:

Then be­ing asked, where all thy beauty lies,

Where all the treas­ure of thy lusty days,

To say, within thine own deep sunken eyes,

Were an all-eat­ing shame and thrift­less praise.

How much more praise de­served thy beauty’s use,

If thou couldst an­swer “This fair child of mine

Shall sum my count and make my old ex­cuse,”

Prov­ing his beauty by suc­ces­sion thine!

This were to be new made when thou art old,

And see thy blood warm when thou feel’st it cold.





III


Look in thy glass, and tell the face thou view­est

Now is the time that face should form an­other;

Whose fresh re­pair if now thou not re­new­est,

Thou dost be­guile the world, un­bless some mother.

For where is she so fair whose un­ear’d womb

Dis­dains the till­age of thy hus­bandry?

Or who is he so fond will be the tomb

Of his self-love to stop pos­ter­ity?

Thou art thy mother’s glass, and she in thee

Calls back the lovely April of her prime:

So thou through win­dows of thine age shalt see

Des­pite of wrinkles this thy golden time.

But if thou live, re­mem­ber’d not to be,

Die single, and thine im­age dies with thee.





IV


Un­thrifty love­li­ness, why dost thou spend

Upon thy­self thy beauty’s leg­acy?

Nature’s be­quest gives noth­ing but doth lend,

And be­ing frank she lends to those are free.

Then, beau­teous nig­gard, why dost thou ab­use

The bounteous lar­gess given thee to give?

Profit­less usurer, why dost thou use

So great a sum of sums, yet canst not live?

For hav­ing traffic with thy­self alone,

Thou of thy­self thy sweet self dost de­ceive.

Then how, when nature calls thee to be gone,

What ac­cept­able audit canst thou leave?

Thy un­used beauty must be tomb’d with thee,

Which, used, lives th’ ex­ecutor to be.





V


Those hours, that with gentle work did frame

The lovely gaze where every eye doth dwell,

Will play the tyr­ants to the very same

And that un­fair which fairly doth ex­cel;

For never-rest­ing time leads sum­mer on

To hideous winter and con­founds him there;

Sap check’d with frost and lusty leaves quite gone,

Beauty o’er­snowed and bare­ness every where:

Then, were not sum­mer’s dis­til­la­tion left,

A li­quid pris­oner pent in walls of glass,

Beauty’s ef­fect with beauty were bereft,

Nor it nor no re­mem­brance what it was:

But flowers dis­till’d though they with winter meet,

Leese but their show; their sub­stance still lives sweet.





VI


Then let not winter’s ragged hand de­face

In thee thy sum­mer, ere thou be dis­till’d:

Make sweet some vial; treas­ure thou some place

With beauty’s treas­ure, ere it be self-kill’d.

That use is not for­bid­den usury

Which hap­pies those that pay the will­ing loan;

That’s for thy­self to breed an­other thee,

Or ten times hap­pier, be it ten for one;

Ten times thy­self were hap­pier than thou art,

If ten of thine ten times re­figured thee:

Then what could death do, if thou shouldst de­part,

Leav­ing thee liv­ing in pos­ter­ity?

Be not self-will’d, for thou art much too fair

To be death’s con­quest and make worms thine heir.





VII


Lo! in the ori­ent when the gra­cious light

Lifts up his burn­ing head, each un­der eye

Doth homage to his new-ap­pear­ing sight,

Serving with looks his sac­red majesty;

And hav­ing climb’d the steep-up heav­enly hill,

Resem­bling strong youth in his middle age,

Yet mor­tal looks ad­ore his beauty still,

At­tend­ing on his golden pil­grim­age;

But when from high­most pitch, with weary car,

Like feeble age, he ree­leth from the day.

The eyes, ’fore du­teous, now con­ver­ted are

From his low tract and look an­other way:

So thou, thy­self out-go­ing in thy noon,

Un­look’d on di­est, un­less thou get a son.





VIII


Music to hear, why hear’st thou mu­sic sadly?

Sweets with sweets war not, joy de­lights in joy.

Why lovest thou that which thou re­ceivest not gladly,

Or else re­ceivest with pleas­ure thine an­noy?

If the true con­cord of well-tuned sounds,

By uni­ons mar­ried, do of­fend thine ear,

They do but sweetly chide thee, who con­founds

In single­ness the parts that thou shouldst bear.

Mark how one string, sweet hus­band to an­other,

Strikes each in each by mu­tual or­der­ing,

Resem­bling sire and child and happy mother

Who all in one, one pleas­ing note do sing:

Whose speech­less song, be­ing many, seem­ing one,

Sings this to thee: “Thou single wilt prove none.”





IX


Is it for fear to wet a widow’s eye

That thou con­sumest thy­self in single life?

Ah! if thou is­sue­less shalt hap to die,

The world will wail thee, like a make­less wife;

The world will be thy widow and still weep

That thou no form of thee hast left be­hind,

When every private widow well may keep

By chil­dren’s eyes her hus­band’s shape in mind.

Look, what an un­thrift in the world doth spend

Shifts but his place, for still the world en­joys it;

But beauty’s waste hath in the world an end,

And kept un­used, the user so des­troys it.

No love to­ward oth­ers in that bosom sits

That on him­self such mur­der­ous shame com­mits.





X


For shame! deny that thou bear’st love to any,

Who for thy­self art so un­provid­ent.

Grant if thou wilt, thou art be­loved of many,

But that thou none lovest is most evid­ent;

For thou art so pos­sess’d with mur­der­ous hate

That ’gainst thy­self thou stick’st not to con­spire,

Seek­ing that beau­teous roof to ru­in­ate

Which to re­pair should be thy chief de­sire.

O, change thy thought, that I may change my mind!

Shall hate be fairer lodged than gentle love?

Be, as thy pres­ence is, gra­cious and kind,

Or to thy­self at least kind-hearted prove:

Make thee an­other self, for love of me,

That beauty still may live in thine or thee.





XI


As fast as thou shalt wane, so fast thou grow­est

In one of thine, from that which thou de­partest;

And that fresh blood which youngly thou be­stow­est

Thou mayst call thine when thou from youth con­vertest.

Herein lives wis­dom, beauty and in­crease;

Without this, folly, age and cold de­cay:

If all were minded so, the times should cease

And threescore year would make the world away.

Let those whom Nature hath not made for store,

Harsh fea­ture­less and rude, bar­renly per­ish:

Look, whom she best en­dow’d she gave the more;

Which bounteous gift thou shouldst in bounty cher­ish:

She carved thee for her seal, and meant thereby

Thou shouldst print more, not let that copy die.





XII


When I do count the clock that tells the time,

And see the brave day sunk in hideous night;

When I be­hold the vi­olet past prime,

And sable curls all sil­ver’d o’er with white;

When lofty trees I see bar­ren of leaves

Which erst from heat did can­opy the herd,

And sum­mer’s green all girded up in sheaves

Borne on the bier with white and bristly beard,

Then of thy beauty do I ques­tion make,

That thou among the wastes of time must go,

Since sweets and beau­ties do them­selves for­sake

And die as fast as they see oth­ers grow;

And noth­ing ’gainst Time’s scythe can make de­fence

Save breed, to brave him when he takes thee hence.





XIII


O, that you were your­self! but, love, you are

No longer yours than you your­self here live:

Against this com­ing end you should pre­pare,

And your sweet semb­lance to some other give.

So should that beauty which you hold in lease

Find no de­term­in­a­tion; then you were

Your­self again after your­self’s de­cease,

When your sweet is­sue your sweet form should bear.

Who lets so fair a house fall to de­cay,

Which hus­bandry in hon­our might up­hold

Against the stormy gusts of winter’s day

And bar­ren rage of death’s eternal cold?

O, none but un­thrifts! Dear my love, you know

You had a father: let your son say so.





XIV


Not from the stars do I my judge­ment pluck;

And yet me­thinks I have as­tro­nomy,

But not to tell of good or evil luck,

Of plagues, of dearths, or sea­sons’ qual­ity;

Nor can I for­tune to brief minutes tell,

Point­ing to each his thun­der, rain and wind,

Or say with princes if it shall go well,

By oft pre­dict that I in heaven find:

But from thine eyes my know­ledge I de­rive,

And, con­stant stars, in them I read such art

As truth and beauty shall to­gether thrive,

If from thy­self, to store thou wouldst con­vert;

Or else of thee this I pro­gnost­ic­ate:

Thy end is truth’s and beauty’s doom and date.





XV


When I con­sider everything that grows

Holds in per­fec­tion but a little mo­ment,

That this huge stage presen­teth nought but shows

Whereon the stars in secret in­flu­ence com­ment;

When I per­ceive that men as plants in­crease,

Cheered and check’d even by the self-same sky,

Vaunt in their youth­ful sap, at height de­crease,

And wear their brave state out of memory;

Then the con­ceit of this in­con­stant stay

Sets you most rich in youth be­fore my sight,

Where waste­ful Time de­bat­eth with De­cay,

To change your day of youth to sul­lied night;

And all in war with Time for love of you,

As he takes from you, I en­graft you new.





XVI


But where­fore do not you a migh­tier way

Make war upon this bloody tyr­ant, Time?

And for­tify your­self in your de­cay

With means more blessed than my bar­ren rhyme?

Now stand you on the top of happy hours,

And many maiden gar­dens yet un­set

With vir­tu­ous wish would bear you liv­ing flowers,

Much liker than your painted coun­ter­feit:

So should the lines of life that life re­pair,

Which this, Time’s pen­cil, or my pu­pil pen,

Neither in in­ward worth nor out­ward fair,

Can make you live your­self in eyes of men.

To give away your­self, keeps your­self still,

And you must live, drawn by your own sweet skill.





XVII


Who will be­lieve my verse in time to come,

If it were fill’d with your most high deserts?

Though yet, heaven knows, it is but as a tomb

Which hides your life and shows not half your parts.

If I could write the beauty of your eyes

And in fresh num­bers num­ber all your graces,

The age to come would say “this poet lies;

Such heav­enly touches ne’er touch’d earthly faces.”

So should my pa­pers yel­low’d with their age

Be scorn’d like old men of less truth than tongue,

And your true rights be term’d a poet’s rage

And stretched metre of an an­tique song:

But were some child of yours alive that time,

You should live twice; in it and in my rhyme.





XVIII


Shall I com­pare thee to a sum­mer’s day?

Thou art more lovely and more tem­per­ate:

Rough winds do shake the darling buds of May,

And sum­mer’s lease hath all too short a date:

So­me­time too hot the eye of heaven shines,

And of­ten is his gold com­plex­ion dimm’d;

And every fair from fair some­time de­clines,

By chance or nature’s chan­ging course un­trimm’d;

But thy eternal sum­mer shall not fade

Nor lose pos­ses­sion of that fair thou ow­est;

Nor shall Death brag thou wander’st in his shade,

When in eternal lines to time thou grow­est:

So long as men can breathe or eyes can see,

So long lives this and this gives life to thee.





XIX


De­vour­ing Time, blunt thou the lion’s paws,

And make the earth de­vour her own sweet brood;

Pluck the keen teeth from the fierce ti­ger’s jaws,

And burn the long-lived phoenix in her blood;

Make glad and sorry sea­sons as thou fleets,

And do whate’er thou wilt, swift-footed Time,

To the wide world and all her fad­ing sweets;

But I for­bid thee one most hein­ous crime:

O, carve not with thy hours my love’s fair brow,

Nor draw no lines there with thine an­tique pen;

Him in thy course un­tain­ted do al­low

For beauty’s pat­tern to suc­ceed­ing men.

Yet, do thy worst, old Time: des­pite thy wrong,

My love shall in my verse ever live young.





XX


A wo­man’s face with Nature’s own hand painted

Hast thou, the mas­ter-mis­tress of my pas­sion;

A wo­man’s gentle heart, but not ac­quain­ted

With shift­ing change, as is false wo­men’s fash­ion;

An eye more bright than theirs, less false in rolling,

Gild­ing the ob­ject whereupon it gaz­eth;

A man in hue all “hues” in his con­trolling,

Which steals men’s eyes and wo­men’s souls amaz­eth.

And for a wo­man wert thou first cre­ated;

Till Nature, as she wrought thee, fell a-dot­ing,

And by ad­di­tion me of thee de­feated,

By adding one thing to my pur­pose noth­ing.

But since she prick’d thee out for wo­men’s pleas­ure,

Mine be thy love and thy love’s use their treas­ure.





XXI


So is it not with me as with that Muse

Stirr’d by a painted beauty to his verse,

Who heaven it­self for or­na­ment doth use

And every fair with his fair doth re­hearse;

Mak­ing a couple­ment of proud com­pare,

With sun and moon, with earth and sea’s rich gems,

With April’s first-born flowers, and all things rare

That heaven’s air in this huge ron­dure hems.

O, let me, true in love, but truly write,

And then be­lieve me, my love is as fair

As any mother’s child, though not so bright

As those gold candles fix’d in heaven’s air:

Let them say more that like of hearsay well;

I will not praise that pur­pose not to sell.





XXII


My glass shall not per­suade me I am old,

So long as youth and thou are of one date;

But when in thee time’s fur­rows I be­hold,

Then look I death my days should ex­pi­ate.

For all that beauty that doth cover thee

Is but the seemly raiment of my heart,

Which in thy breast doth live, as thine in me:

How can I then be elder than thou art?

O, there­fore, love, be of thy­self so wary

As I not for my­self, but for thee will;

Bear­ing thy heart which I will keep so chary

As tender nurse her babe from faring ill.

Pre­sume not on thy heart when mine is slain;

Thou gavest me thine, not to give back again.





XXIII


As an un­per­fect actor on the stage

Who with his fear is put be­side his part,

Or some fierce thing re­plete with too much rage,

Whose strength’s abund­ance weak­ens his own heart,

So I, for fear of trust, for­get to say

The per­fect ce­re­mony of love’s rite,

And in mine own love’s strength seem to de­cay,

O’er­charged with bur­den of mine own love’s might.

O, let my looks be then the elo­quence

And dumb pres­agers of my speak­ing breast,

Who plead for love and look for re­com­pense

More than that tongue that more hath more ex­press’d.

O, learn to read what si­lent love hath writ:

To hear with eyes be­longs to love’s fine wit.





XXIV


Mine eye hath play’d the painter and hath stell’d

Thy beauty’s form in table of my heart;

My body is the frame wherein ’tis held,

And per­spect­ive it is best painter’s art.

For through the painter must you see his skill,

To find where your true im­age pic­tured lies;

Which in my bosom’s shop is hanging still,

That hath his win­dows glazed with thine eyes.

Now see what good turns eyes for eyes have done:

Mine eyes have drawn thy shape, and thine for me

Are win­dows to my breast, where-through the sun

De­lights to peep, to gaze therein on thee;

Yet eyes this cun­ning want to grace their art;

They draw but what they see, know not the heart.





XXV


Let those who are in fa­vour with their stars

Of pub­lic hon­our and proud titles boast,

Whilst I, whom for­tune of such tri­umph bars,

Un­look’d for joy in that I hon­our most.

Great princes’ fa­vour­ites their fair leaves spread

But as the marigold at the sun’s eye,

And in them­selves their pride lies bur­ied,

For at a frown they in their glory die.

The pain­ful war­rior famoused for fight,

After a thou­sand vic­tor­ies once foil’d,

Is from the book of hon­our razed quite,

And all the rest for­got for which he toil’d:

Then happy I, that love and am be­loved

Where I may not re­move nor be re­moved.





XXVI


Lord of my love, to whom in vas­salage

Thy merit hath my duty strongly knit,

To thee I send this writ­ten em­bas­sage,

To wit­ness duty, not to show my wit:

Duty so great, which wit so poor as mine

May make seem bare, in want­ing words to show it,

But that I hope some good con­ceit of thine

In thy soul’s thought, all na­ked, will be­stow it;

Till what­so­ever star that guides my mov­ing

Points on me gra­ciously with fair as­pect

And puts ap­parel on my tat­ter’d lov­ing,

To show me worthy of thy sweet re­spect:

Then may I dare to boast how I do love thee;

Till then not show my head where thou mayst prove me.





XXVII


Weary with toil, I haste me to my bed,

The dear re­s­pose for limbs with travel tired;

But then be­gins a jour­ney in my head,

To work my mind, when body’s work’s ex­pired:

For then my thoughts, from far where I abide,

In­tend a zeal­ous pil­grim­age to thee,

And keep my droop­ing eye­lids open wide,

Look­ing on dark­ness which the blind do see:

Save that my soul’s ima­gin­ary sight

Presents thy shadow to my sight­less view,

Which, like a jewel hung in ghastly night,

Makes black night beau­teous and her old face new.

Lo! thus, by day my limbs, by night my mind,

For thee and for my­self no quiet find.





XXVIII


How can I then re­turn in happy plight,

That am de­barr’d the be­ne­fit of rest?

When day’s op­pres­sion is not eased by night,

But day by night, and night by day, op­press’d?

And each, though en­emies to either’s reign,

Do in con­sent shake hands to tor­ture me;

The one by toil, the other to com­plain

How far I toil, still farther off from thee.

I tell the day, to please him thou art bright

And dost him grace when clouds do blot the heaven:

So flat­ter I the swart-com­plex­ion’d night,

When spark­ling stars twire not thou gild’st the even.

But day doth daily draw my sor­rows longer

And night doth nightly make grief’s length seem stronger.





XXIX


When, in dis­grace with For­tune and men’s eyes,

I all alone be­weep my out­cast state

And trouble deaf heaven with my boot­less cries

And look upon my­self and curse my fate,

Wish­ing me like to one more rich in hope,

Featured like him, like him with friends pos­sess’d,

Desir­ing this man’s art and that man’s scope,

With what I most en­joy con­ten­ted least;

Yet in these thoughts my­self al­most des­pising,

Haply I think on thee, and then my state,

Like to the lark at break of day arising

From sul­len earth, sings hymns at heaven’s gate;

For thy sweet love re­mem­ber’d such wealth brings

That then I scorn to change my state with kings.





XXX


When to the ses­sions of sweet si­lent thought

I sum­mon up re­mem­brance of things past,

I sigh the lack of many a thing I sought,

And with old woes new wail my dear time’s waste:

Then can I drown an eye, un­used to flow,

For pre­cious friends hid in death’s date­less night,

And weep afresh love’s long since can­cell’d woe,

And moan the ex­pense of many a van­ish’d sight:

Then can I grieve at griev­ances fore­gone,

And heav­ily from woe to woe tell o’er

The sad ac­count of fore-be­moaned moan,

Which I new pay as if not paid be­fore.

But if the while I think on thee, dear friend,

All losses are re­stored and sor­rows end.





XXXI


Thy bosom is en­deared with all hearts,

Which I by lack­ing have sup­posed dead,

And there reigns love and all love’s lov­ing parts,

And all those friends which I thought bur­ied.

How many a holy and ob­sequious tear

Hath dear re­li­gious love stol’n from mine eye

As in­terest of the dead, which now ap­pear

But things re­moved that hid­den in thee lie!

Thou art the grave where bur­ied love doth live,

Hung with the trophies of my lov­ers gone,

Who all their parts of me to thee did give;

That due of many now is thine alone:

Their im­ages I loved I view in thee,

And thou, all they, hast all the all of me.





XXXII


If thou sur­vive my well-con­ten­ted day,

When that churl Death my bones with dust shall cover,

And shalt by for­tune once more re-sur­vey

These poor rude lines of thy de­ceased lover,

Com­pare them with the bet­ter­ing of the time,

And though they be out­stripp’d by every pen,

Reserve them for my love, not for their rhyme,

Ex­ceeded by the height of hap­pier men.

O, then vouch­safe me but this lov­ing thought:

“Had my friend’s Muse grown with this grow­ing age,

A dearer birth than this his love had brought,

To march in ranks of bet­ter equipage:

But since he died and po­ets bet­ter prove,

Theirs for their style I’ll read, his for his love.”





XXXIII


Full many a glor­i­ous morn­ing have I seen

Flat­ter the moun­tain tops with sov­er­eign eye,

Kiss­ing with golden face the mead­ows green,

Gild­ing pale streams with heav­enly al­chemy;

Anon per­mit the basest clouds to ride

With ugly rack on his ce­les­tial face,

And from the for­lorn world his vis­age hide,

Steal­ing un­seen to west with this dis­grace:

Even so my sun one early morn did shine

With all-tri­umphant splend­our on my brow;

But out, alack! he was but one hour mine;

The re­gion cloud hath mask’d him from me now.

Yet him for this my love no whit dis­daineth;

Suns of the world may stain when heaven’s sun staineth.





XXXIV


Why didst thou prom­ise such a beau­teous day

And make me travel forth without my cloak,

To let base clouds o’er­take me in my way,

Hid­ing thy bravery in their rot­ten smoke?

’Tis not enough that through the cloud thou break,

To dry the rain on my storm-beaten face,

For no man well of such a salve can speak

That heals the wound and cures not the dis­grace:

Nor can thy shame give physic to my grief;

Though thou re­pent, yet I have still the loss:

The of­fender’s sor­row lends but weak re­lief

To him that bears the strong of­fence’s cross.

Ah! but those tears are pearl which thy love sheds,

And they are rich and ransom all ill deeds.





XXXV


No more be grieved at that which thou hast done:

Roses have thorns, and sil­ver foun­tains mud;

Clouds and ec­lipses stain both moon and sun,

And loath­some canker lives in sweetest bud.

All men make faults, and even I in this,

Author­iz­ing thy tres­pass with com­pare,

My­self cor­rupt­ing, salv­ing thy amiss,

Ex­cus­ing thy sins more than thy sins are;

For to thy sen­sual fault I bring in sense—

Thy ad­verse party is thy ad­voc­ate—

And ’gainst my­self a law­ful plea com­mence:

Such civil war is in my love and hate

That I an ac­cessary needs must be

To that sweet thief which sourly robs from me.





XXXVI


Let me con­fess that we two must be twain,

Al­though our un­di­vided loves are one:

So shall those blots that do with me re­main

Without thy help by me be borne alone.

In our two loves there is but one re­spect,

Though in our lives a sep­ar­able spite,

Which though it al­ter not love’s sole ef­fect,

Yet doth it steal sweet hours from love’s de­light.

I may not ever­more ac­know­ledge thee,

Lest my be­wailed guilt should do thee shame,

Nor thou with pub­lic kind­ness hon­our me,

Un­less thou take that hon­our from thy name:

But do not so; I love thee in such sort

As, thou be­ing mine, mine is thy good re­port.





XXXVII


As a de­crepit father takes de­light

To see his act­ive child do deeds of youth,

So I, made lame by for­tune’s dearest spite,

Take all my com­fort of thy worth and truth.

For whether beauty, birth, or wealth, or wit,

Or any of these all, or all, or more,

En­titled in thy parts do crowned sit,

I make my love en­graf­ted to this store:

So then I am not lame, poor, nor des­pised,

Whilst that this shadow doth such sub­stance give

That I in thy abund­ance am suf­ficed

And by a part of all thy glory live.

Look, what is best, that best I wish in thee:

This wish I have; then ten times happy me!





XXXVIII


How can my Muse want sub­ject to in­vent,

While thou dost breathe, that pour’st into my verse

Thine own sweet ar­gu­ment, too ex­cel­lent

For every vul­gar pa­per to re­hearse?

O, give thy­self the thanks, if aught in me

Worthy per­usal stand against thy sight;

For who’s so dumb that can­not write to thee,

When thou thy­self dost give in­ven­tion light?

Be thou the tenth Muse, ten times more in worth

Than those old nine which rhymers in­voc­ate;

And he that calls on thee, let him bring forth

Eternal num­bers to out­live long date.

If my slight Muse do please these curi­ous days,

The pain be mine, but thine shall be the praise.





XXXIX


O, how thy worth with man­ners may I sing,

When thou art all the bet­ter part of me?

What can mine own praise to mine own self bring?

And what is’t but mine own when I praise thee?

Even for this let us di­vided live,

And our dear love lose name of single one,

That by this sep­ar­a­tion I may give

That due to thee which thou de­ser­vest alone.

O ab­sence, what a tor­ment wouldst thou prove,

Were it not thy sour leis­ure gave sweet leave

To en­ter­tain the time with thoughts of love,

Which time and thoughts so sweetly doth de­ceive,

And that thou teachest how to make one twain,

By prais­ing him here who doth hence re­main!





XL


Take all my loves, my love, yea, take them all;

What hast thou then more than thou hadst be­fore?

No love, my love, that thou mayst true love call;

All mine was thine be­fore thou hadst this more.

Then if for my love thou my love re­ceivest,

I can­not blame thee for my love thou usest;

But yet be blamed, if thou thy­self de­ceivest

By wil­ful taste of what thy­self re­fusest.

I do for­give thy rob­bery, gentle thief,

Al­though thou steal thee all my poverty;

And yet, love knows, it is a greater grief

To bear greater wrong than hate’s known in­jury.

Las­ci­vi­ous grace, in whom all ill well shows,

Kill me with spites; yet we must not be foes.





XLI


Those pretty wrongs that liberty com­mits,

When I am some­time ab­sent from thy heart,

Thy beauty and thy years full well be­fits,

For still tempta­tion fol­lows where thou art.

Gentle thou art and there­fore to be won,

Beau­teous thou art, there­fore to be as­sailed;

And when a wo­man woos, what wo­man’s son

Will sourly leave her till he have pre­vailed?

Ay me! but yet thou mightst my seat for­bear,

And chide thy beauty and thy stray­ing youth,

Who lead thee in their riot even there

Where thou art forced to break a two­fold truth,

Hers, by thy beauty tempt­ing her to thee,

Thine, by thy beauty be­ing false to me.





XLII


That thou hast her, it is not all my grief,

And yet it may be said I loved her dearly;

That she hath thee, is of my wail­ing chief,

A loss in love that touches me more nearly.

Lov­ing of­fend­ers, thus I will ex­cuse ye:

Thou dost love her, be­cause thou know’st I love her;

And for my sake even so doth she ab­use me,

Suffer­ing my friend for my sake to ap­prove her.

If I lose thee, my loss is my love’s gain,

And los­ing her, my friend hath found that loss;

Both find each other, and I lose both twain,

And both for my sake lay on me this cross:

But here’s the joy; my friend and I are one;

Sweet flat­tery! then she loves but me alone.





XLIII


When most I wink, then do mine eyes best see,

For all the day they view things un­re­spec­ted;

But when I sleep, in dreams they look on thee,

And darkly bright are bright in dark dir­ec­ted.

Then thou, whose shadow shad­ows doth make bright,

How would thy shadow’s form form happy show

To the clear day with thy much clearer light,

When to un­see­ing eyes thy shade shines so!

How would, I say, mine eyes be blessed made

By look­ing on thee in the liv­ing day,

When in dead night thy fair im­per­fect shade

Through heavy sleep on sight­less eyes doth stay!

All days are nights to see till I see thee,

And nights bright days when dreams do show thee me.





XLIV


If the dull sub­stance of my flesh were thought,

In­jur­i­ous dis­tance should not stop my way;

For then des­pite of space I would be brought,

From lim­its far re­mote, where thou dost stay.

No mat­ter then al­though my foot did stand

Upon the farthest earth re­moved from thee;

For nimble thought can jump both sea and land

As soon as think the place where he would be.

But, ah! thought kills me that I am not thought,

To leap large lengths of miles when thou art gone,

But that so much of earth and wa­ter wrought

I must at­tend time’s leis­ure with my moan,

Re­ceiv­ing nought by ele­ments so slow

But heavy tears, badges of either’s woe.





XLV


The other two, slight air and pur­ging fire,

Are both with thee, wherever I abide;

The first my thought, the other my de­sire,

These present-ab­sent with swift mo­tion slide.

For when these quicker ele­ments are gone

In tender em­bassy of love to thee,

My life, be­ing made of four, with two alone

Sinks down to death, op­press’d with mel­an­choly;

Until life’s com­pos­i­tion be re­cured,

By those swift mes­sen­gers re­turned from thee,

Who even but now come back again as­sured,

Of thy fair health, re­count­ing it to me:

This told, I joy; but then no longer glad,

I send them back again and straight grow sad.





XLVI


Mine eye and heart are at a mor­tal war

How to di­vide the con­quest of thy sight;

Mine eye my heart thy pic­ture’s sight would bar,

My heart mine eye the free­dom of that right.

My heart doth plead that thou in him dost lie—

A closet never pierced with crys­tal eyes—

But the de­fend­ant doth that plea deny

And says in him thy fair ap­pear­ance lies.

To ’cide this title is im­panneled

A quest of thoughts, all ten­ants to the heart,

And by their ver­dict is de­term­ined

The clear eye’s moi­ety and the dear heart’s part:

As thus; mine eye’s due is thy out­ward part,

And my heart’s right thy in­ward love of heart.





XLVII


Betwixt mine eye and heart a league is took,

And each doth good turns now unto the other:

When that mine eye is fam­ish’d for a look,

Or heart in love with sighs him­self doth smother,

With my love’s pic­ture then my eye doth feast

And to the painted ban­quet bids my heart;

Another time mine eye is my heart’s guest

And in his thoughts of love doth share a part:

So, either by thy pic­ture or my love,

Thy­self away art present still with me;

For thou not farther than my thoughts canst move,

And I am still with them and they with thee;

Or, if they sleep, thy pic­ture in my sight

Awakes my heart to heart’s and eye’s de­light.





XLVIII


How care­ful was I, when I took my way,

Each trifle un­der truest bars to thrust,

That to my use it might un­used stay

From hands of false­hood, in sure wards of trust!

But thou, to whom my jew­els trifles are,

Most worthy com­fort, now my greatest grief,

Thou, best of dearest, and mine only care,

Art left the prey of every vul­gar thief.

Thee have I not lock’d up in any chest,

Save where thou art not, though I feel thou art,

Within the gentle clos­ure of my breast,

From whence at pleas­ure thou mayst come and part;

And even thence thou wilt be stol’n I fear,

For truth proves thiev­ish for a prize so dear.





XLIX


Against that time, if ever that time come,

When I shall see thee frown on my de­fects,

When as thy love hath cast his ut­most sum,

Call’d to that audit by ad­vised re­spects;

Against that time when thou shalt strangely pass

And scarcely greet me with that sun thine eye,

When love, con­ver­ted from the thing it was,

Shall reas­ons find of settled grav­ity—

Against that time do I en­sconce me here

Within the know­ledge of mine own desert,

And this my hand against my­self up­rear,

To guard the law­ful reas­ons on thy part:

To leave poor me thou hast the strength of laws,

Since why to love I can al­lege no cause.





L


How heavy do I jour­ney on the way,

When what I seek, my weary travel’s end,

Doth teach that case and that re­pose to say

“Thus far the miles are meas­ured from thy friend!”

The beast that bears me, tired with my woe,

Plods dully on, to bear that weight in me,

As if by some in­stinct the wretch did know

His rider loved not speed, be­ing made from thee:

The bloody spur can­not pro­voke him on

That some­times an­ger thrusts into his hide;

Which heav­ily he an­swers with a groan,

More sharp to me than spur­ring to his side;

For that same groan doth put this in my mind;

My grief lies on­ward and my joy be­hind.





LI


Thus can my love ex­cuse the slow of­fence

Of my dull bearer when from thee I speed:

From where thou art, why should I haste me thence?

Till I re­turn, of post­ing is no need.

O, what ex­cuse will my poor beast then find,

When swift ex­tremity can seem but slow?

Then should I spur, though moun­ted on the wind;

In winged speed no mo­tion shall I know:

Then can no horse with my de­sire keep pace;

There­fore de­sire, of per­fect’st love be­ing made,

Shall neigh—no dull flesh—in his fiery race;

But love, for love, thus shall ex­cuse my jade;

Since from thee go­ing he went wil­ful-slow,

Towards thee I’ll run, and give him leave to go.





LII


So am I as the rich, whose blessed key

Can bring him to his sweet up-locked treas­ure,

The which he will not every hour sur­vey,

For blunt­ing the fine point of sel­dom pleas­ure.

There­fore are feasts so sol­emn and so rare,

Since, sel­dom com­ing, in that long year set,

Like stones of worth they thinly placed are,

Or cap­tain jew­els in the car­canet.

So is the time that keeps you as my chest,

Or as the ward­robe which the robe doth hide,

To make some spe­cial in­stant spe­cial blest,

By new un­fold­ing his im­prison’d pride.

Blessed are you, whose wor­thi­ness gives scope,

Be­ing had, to tri­umph, be­ing lack’d to hope.





LIII


What is your sub­stance, whereof are you made,

That mil­lions of strange shad­ows on you tend?

Since every­one hath, every­one, one shade,

And you, but one, can every shadow lend.

Describe Adonis, and the coun­ter­feit

Is poorly im­it­ated after you;

On Helen’s cheek all art of beauty set,

And you in Gre­cian tires are painted new:

Speak of the spring and foison of the year;

The one doth shadow of your beauty show,

The other as your bounty doth ap­pear;

And you in every blessed shape we know.

In all ex­ternal grace you have some part,

But you like none, none you, for con­stant heart.





LIV


O, how much more doth beauty beau­teous seem

By that sweet or­na­ment which truth doth give!

The rose looks fair, but fairer we it deem

For that sweet odour which doth in it live.

The canker-blooms have full as deep a dye

As the per­fumed tinc­ture of the roses,

Hang on such thorns and play as wan­tonly

When sum­mer’s breath their masked buds dis­closes:

But, for their vir­tue only is their show,

They live un­woo’d and un­re­spec­ted fade,

Die to them­selves. Sweet roses do not so;

Of their sweet deaths are sweetest odours made:

And so of you, beau­teous and lovely youth,

When that shall fade, my verse dis­tills your truth.





LV


Not marble, nor the gil­ded monu­ments

Of princes, shall out­live this power­ful rhyme;

But you shall shine more bright in these con­tents

Than un­swept stone be­smear’d with slut­tish time.

When waste­ful war shall statues over­turn,

And broils root out the work of ma­sonry,

Nor Mars his sword nor war’s quick fire shall burn

The liv­ing re­cord of your memory.

’Gainst death, and all-ob­li­vi­ous enmity

Shall you pace forth; your praise shall still find room

Even in the eyes of all pos­ter­ity

That wear this world out to the end­ing doom.

So, till the judg­ment that your­self arise,

You live in this, and dwell in lov­ers’ eyes.





LVI


Sweet love re­new thy force; be it not said

Thy edge should blunter be than ap­pet­ite,

Which but to-day by feed­ing is al­lay’d,

To-mor­row sharpen’d in his former might:

So love be thou; al­though to-day thou fill

Thy hungry eyes even till they wink with ful­ness,

To-mor­row see again, and do not kill

The spirit of love with a per­petual dul­ness.

Let this sad in­terim like the ocean be

Which parts the shore, where two con­trac­ted new

Come daily to the banks, that, when they see

Return of love, more blest may be the view;

Else call it winter, which be­ing full of care

Makes sum­mer’s wel­come thrice more wish’d, more rare.





LVII


Be­ing your slave, what should I do but tend

Upon the hours and times of your de­sire?

I have no pre­cious time at all to spend,

Nor ser­vices to do, till you re­quire.

Nor dare I chide the world-without-end hour

Whilst I, my sov­er­eign, watch the clock for you,

Nor think the bit­ter­ness of ab­sence sour,

When you have bid your ser­vant once adieu;

Nor dare I ques­tion with my jeal­ous thought

Where you may be, or your af­fairs sup­pose,

But, like a sad slave, stay and think of nought

Save, where you are, how happy you make those.

So true a fool is love, that in your will,

Though you do any­thing, he thinks no ill.





LVIII


That god for­bid that made me first your slave,

I should in thought con­trol your times of pleas­ure,

Or at your hand the ac­count of hours to crave,

Be­ing your vas­sal, bound to stay your leis­ure!

O, let me suf­fer, be­ing at your beck,

The im­prison’d ab­sence of your liberty;

And pa­tience, tame to suf­fer­ance, bide each check,

Without ac­cus­ing you of in­jury.

Be where you list, your charter is so strong

That you your­self may priv­il­age your time

To what you will; to you it doth be­long

Your­self to par­don of self-do­ing crime.

I am to wait, though wait­ing so be hell;

Not blame your pleas­ure, be it ill or well.





LIX


If there be noth­ing new, but that which is

Hath been be­fore, how are our brains be­guiled,

Which, la­bour­ing for in­ven­tion, bear amiss

The second bur­then of a former child!

O, that re­cord could with a back­ward look,

Even of five hun­dred courses of the sun,

Show me your im­age in some an­tique book,

Since mind at first in char­ac­ter was done!

That I might see what the old world could say

To this com­posed won­der of your frame;

Whether we are men­ded, or whether bet­ter they,

Or whether re­volu­tion be the same.

O, sure I am, the wits of former days

To sub­jects worse have given ad­mir­ing praise.





LX


Like as the waves make to­wards the pebbled shore,

So do our minutes hasten to their end;

Each chan­ging place with that which goes be­fore,

In se­quent toil all for­wards do con­tend.

Nativ­ity, once in the main of light,

Crawls to ma­tur­ity, where­with be­ing crown’d,

Crooked ec­lipses ’gainst his glory fight,

And Time that gave, doth now his gift con­found.

Time doth trans­fix the flour­ish set on youth

And delves the par­al­lels in beauty’s brow,

Feeds on the rar­it­ies of nature’s truth,

And noth­ing stands but for his scythe to mow:

And yet to times in hope my verse shall stand,

Prais­ing thy worth, des­pite his cruel hand.





LXI


Is it thy will thy im­age should keep open

My heavy eye­lids to the weary night?

Dost thou de­sire my slum­bers should be broken,

While shad­ows like to thee do mock my sight?

Is it thy spirit that thou send’st from thee

So far from home into my deeds to pry,

To find out shames and idle hours in me,

The scope and ten­ure of thy jeal­ousy?

O, no! thy love, though much, is not so great:

It is my love that keeps mine eye awake;

Mine own true love that doth my rest de­feat,

To play the watch­man ever for thy sake:

For thee watch I whilst thou dost wake else­where,

From me far off, with oth­ers all too near.





LXII


Sin of self-love pos­ses­seth all mine eye

And all my soul and all my every part;

And for this sin there is no rem­edy,

It is so groun­ded in­ward in my heart.

Me­thinks no face so gra­cious is as mine,

No shape so true, no truth of such ac­count;

And for my­self mine own worth do define,

As I all other in all worths sur­mount.

But when my glass shows me my­self in­deed,

Beated and chopp’d with tann’d an­tiquity,

Mine own self-love quite con­trary I read:

Self so self-lov­ing were iniquity.

’Tis thee, my­self, that for my­self I praise,

Paint­ing my age with beauty of thy days.





LXIII


Against my love shall be, as I am now,

With Time’s in­jur­i­ous hand crush’d and o’er­worn;

When hours have drain’d his blood and filled his brow

With lines and wrinkles; when his youth­ful morn

Hath trav­ell’d on to age’s steepy night,

And all those beau­ties whereof now he’s king

Are van­ish­ing or van­ish’d out of sight,

Steal­ing away the treas­ure of his spring;

For such a time do I now for­tify

Against con­found­ing age’s cruel knife,

That he shall never cut from memory

My sweet love’s beauty, though my lover’s life:

His beauty shall in these black lines be seen,

And they shall live, and he in them still green.





LXIV


When I have seen by Time’s fell hand de­faced

The rich proud cost of out­worn bur­ied age;

When some­time lofty towers I see down­razed

And brass eternal slave to mor­tal rage;

When I have seen the hungry ocean gain

Ad­vant­age on the king­dom of the shore,

And the firm soil win of the wa­tery main,

In­creas­ing store with loss and loss with store;

When I have seen such in­ter­change of state,

Or state it­self con­foun­ded to de­cay;

Ruin hath taught me thus to ru­min­ate,

That Time will come and take my love away.

This thought is as a death, which can­not choose

But weep to have that which it fears to lose.





LXV


Since brass, nor stone, nor earth, nor bound­less sea,

But sad mor­tal­ity o’er-sways their power,

How with this rage shall beauty hold a plea,

Whose ac­tion is no stronger than a flower?

O, how shall sum­mer’s honey breath hold out

Against the wrack­ful siege of bat­ter­ing days,

When rocks im­preg­nable are not so stout,

Nor gates of steel so strong, but Time de­cays?

O fear­ful med­it­a­tion! where, alack,

Shall Time’s best jewel from Time’s chest lie hid?

Or what strong hand can hold his swift foot back?

Or who his spoil of beauty can for­bid?

O, none, un­less this mir­acle have might,

That in black ink my love may still shine bright.





LXVI


Tired with all these, for rest­ful death I cry,

As, to be­hold desert a beg­gar born,

And needy noth­ing trimm’d in jol­lity,

And purest faith un­hap­pily forsworn,

And gil­ded hon­our shame­fully mis­placed,

And maiden vir­tue rudely strum­peted,

And right per­fec­tion wrong­fully dis­graced,

And strength by limp­ing sway dis­abled,

And art made tongue-tied by au­thor­ity,

And folly doc­tor-like con­trolling skill,

And simple truth mis­call’d sim­pli­city,

And cap­tive good at­tend­ing cap­tain ill:

Tired with all these, from these would I be gone,

Save that, to die, I leave my love alone.





LXVII


Ah! where­fore with in­fec­tion should he live,

And with his pres­ence grace im­pi­ety,

That sin by him ad­vant­age should achieve

And lace it­self with his so­ci­ety?

Why should false paint­ing im­it­ate his cheek

And steal dead seem­ing of his liv­ing hue?

Why should poor beauty in­dir­ectly seek

Roses of shadow, since his rose is true?

Why should he live, now Nature bank­rupt is,

Beg­gar’d of blood to blush through lively veins?

For she hath no ex­chequer now but his,

And proud of many, lives upon his gains.

O, him she stores, to show what wealth she had

In days long since, be­fore these last so bad.





LXVIII


Thus is his cheek the map of days out­worn,

When beauty lived and died as flowers do now,

Be­fore these bas­tard signs of fair were born,

Or durst in­habit on a liv­ing brow;

Be­fore the golden tresses of the dead,

The right of sep­ulchres, were shorn away,

To live a second life on second head;

Ere beauty’s dead fleece made an­other gay:

In him those holy an­tique hours are seen,

Without all or­na­ment, it­self and true,

Mak­ing no sum­mer of an­other’s green,

Rob­bing no old to dress his beauty new;

And him as for a map doth Nature store,

To show false Art what beauty was of yore.





LXIX


Those parts of thee that the world’s eye doth view

Want noth­ing that the thought of hearts can mend;

All tongues, the voice of souls, give thee that due,

Ut­ter­ing bare truth, even so as foes com­mend.

Thy out­ward thus with out­ward praise is crown’d;

But those same tongues that give thee so thine own

In other ac­cents do this praise con­found

By see­ing farther than the eye hath shown.

They look into the beauty of thy mind,

And that, in guess, they meas­ure by thy deeds;

Then, churls, their thoughts, al­though their eyes were kind,

To thy fair flower add the rank smell of weeds:

But why thy odour matcheth not thy show,

The solve is this, that thou dost com­mon grow.





LXX


That thou art blamed shall not be thy de­fect,

For slander’s mark was ever yet the fair;

The or­na­ment of beauty is sus­pect,

A crow that flies in heaven’s sweetest air.

So thou be good, slander doth but ap­prove

Thy worth the greater, be­ing woo’d of time;

For canker vice the sweetest buds doth love,

And thou present’st a pure un­stained prime.

Thou hast pass’d by the am­bush of young days,

Either not as­sail’d or vic­tor be­ing charged;

Yet this thy praise can­not be so thy praise,

To tie up envy ever­more en­larged:

If some sus­pect of ill mask’d not thy show,

Then thou alone king­doms of hearts shouldst owe.





LXXI


No longer mourn for me when I am dead

Than you shall hear the surly sul­len bell

Give warn­ing to the world that I am fled

From this vile world, with vilest worms to dwell:

Nay, if you read this line, re­mem­ber not

The hand that writ it; for I love you so

That I in your sweet thoughts would be for­got

If think­ing on me then should make you woe.

O, if, I say, you look upon this verse

When I per­haps com­poun­ded am with clay,

Do not so much as my poor name re­hearse,

But let your love even with my life de­cay,

Lest the wise world should look into your moan

And mock you with me after I am gone.





LXXII


O, lest the world should task you to re­cite

What merit lived in me, that you should love

After my death, dear love, for­get me quite,

For you in me can noth­ing worthy prove;

Un­less you would de­vise some vir­tu­ous lie,

To do more for me than mine own desert,

And hang more praise upon de­ceased I

Than nig­gard truth would will­ingly im­part:

O, lest your true love may seem false in this,

That you for love speak well of me un­true,

My name be bur­ied where my body is,

And live no more to shame nor me nor you.

For I am shamed by that which I bring forth,

And so should you, to love things noth­ing worth.





LXXIII


That time of year thou mayst in me be­hold

When yel­low leaves, or none, or few, do hang

Upon those boughs which shake against the cold,

Bare ruin’d choirs, where late the sweet birds sang.

In me thou see’st the twi­light of such day

As after sun­set fa­deth in the west,

Which by and by black night doth take away,

Death’s second self, that seals up all in rest.

In me thou see’st the glow­ing of such fire

That on the ashes of his youth doth lie,

As the death-bed whereon it must ex­pire

Con­sumed with that which it was nour­ish’d by.

This thou per­ceivest, which makes thy love more strong,

To love that well which thou must leave ere long.





LXXIV


But be con­ten­ted: when that fell ar­rest

Without all bail shall carry me away,

My life hath in this line some in­terest,

Which for me­morial still with thee shall stay.

When thou re­view­est this, thou dost re­view

The very part was con­sec­rate to thee:

The earth can have but earth, which is his due;

My spirit is thine, the bet­ter part of me:

So then thou hast but lost the dregs of life,

The prey of worms, my body be­ing dead,

The cow­ard con­quest of a wretch’s knife,

Too base of thee to be re­membered.

The worth of that is that which it con­tains,

And that is this, and this with thee re­mains.





LXXV


So are you to my thoughts as food to life,

Or as sweet-sea­son’d showers are to the ground;

And for the peace of you I hold such strife

As ’twixt a miser and his wealth is found;

Now proud as an en­joyer and anon

Doubt­ing the filch­ing age will steal his treas­ure,

Now count­ing best to be with you alone,

Then bet­ter’d that the world may see my pleas­ure;

So­me­time all full with feast­ing on your sight

And by and by clean starved for a look;

Possess­ing or pur­su­ing no de­light,

Save what is had or must from you be took.

Thus do I pine and sur­feit day by day,

Or glut­ton­ing on all, or all away.





LXXVI


Why is my verse so bar­ren of new pride,

So far from vari­ation or quick change?

Why with the time do I not glance aside

To new-found meth­ods and to com­pounds strange?

Why write I still all one, ever the same,

And keep in­ven­tion in a noted weed,

That every word doth al­most tell my name,

Show­ing their birth and where they did pro­ceed?

O know, sweet love, I al­ways write of you,

And you and love are still my ar­gu­ment;

So all my best is dress­ing old words new,

Spend­ing again what is already spent:

For as the sun is daily new and old,

So is my love still telling what is told.





LXXVII


Thy glass will show thee how thy beau­ties wear,

Thy dial how thy pre­cious minutes waste;

These va­cant leaves thy mind’s im­print will bear,

And of this book this learn­ing mayst thou taste.

The wrinkles which thy glass will truly show

Of mouthed graves will give thee memory;

Thou by thy dial’s shady stealth mayst know

Time’s thiev­ish pro­gress to etern­ity.

Look, what thy memory can­not con­tain

Com­mit to these waste blanks, and thou shalt find

Those chil­dren nursed, de­liver’d from thy brain,

To take a new ac­quaint­ance of thy mind.

These of­fices, so oft as thou wilt look,

Shall profit thee and much en­rich thy book.





LXXVIII


So oft have I in­voked thee for my Muse

And found such fair as­sist­ance in my verse

As every alien pen hath got my use

And un­der thee their poesy dis­perse.

Thine eyes that taught the dumb on high to sing

And heavy ig­nor­ance aloft to fly

Have ad­ded feath­ers to the learned’s wing

And given grace a double majesty.

Yet be most proud of that which I com­pile,

Whose in­flu­ence is thine and born of thee:

In oth­ers’ works thou dost but mend the style,

And arts with thy sweet graces graced be;

But thou art all my art and dost ad­vance

As high as learn­ing my rude ig­nor­ance.





LXXIX


Whilst I alone did call upon thy aid,

My verse alone had all thy gentle grace,

But now my gra­cious num­bers are de­cay’d,

And my sick Muse doth give an other place.

I grant, sweet love, thy lovely ar­gu­ment

Deserves the trav­ail of a wor­thier pen,

Yet what of thee thy poet doth in­vent

He robs thee of and pays it thee again.

He lends thee vir­tue and he stole that word

From thy be­ha­viour; beauty doth he give

And found it in thy cheek; he can af­ford

No praise to thee, but what in thee doth live.

Then thank him not for that which he doth say,

Since what he owes thee, thou thy­self dost pay.





LXXX


O, how I faint when I of you do write,

Know­ing a bet­ter spirit doth use your name,

And in the praise thereof spends all his might,

To make me tongue-tied, speak­ing of your fame!

But since your worth, wide as the ocean is,

The humble as the proudest sail doth bear,

My saucy bark in­ferior far to his

On your broad main doth wil­fully ap­pear.

Your shal­low­est help will hold me up afloat,

Whilst he upon your sound­less deep doth ride;

Or, be­ing wreck’d, I am a worth­less boat,

He of tall build­ing and of goodly pride:

Then if he thrive and I be cast away,

The worst was this; my love was my de­cay.





LXXXI


Or I shall live your epi­taph to make,

Or you sur­vive when I in earth am rot­ten;

From hence your memory death can­not take,

Al­though in me each part will be for­got­ten.

Your name from hence im­mor­tal life shall have,

Though I, once gone, to all the world must die:

The earth can yield me but a com­mon grave,

When you en­tombed in men’s eyes shall lie.

Your monu­ment shall be my gentle verse,

Which eyes not yet cre­ated shall o’er-read,

And tongues to be your be­ing shall re­hearse

When all the breath­ers of this world are dead;

You still shall live—such vir­tue hath my pen—

Where breath most breathes, even in the mouths of men.





LXXXII


I grant thou wert not mar­ried to my Muse

And there­fore mayst without at­taint o’er­look

The ded­ic­ated words which writers use

Of their fair sub­ject, bless­ing every book.

Thou art as fair in know­ledge as in hue,

Find­ing thy worth a limit past my praise,

And there­fore art en­forced to seek anew

Some fresher stamp of the time-bet­ter­ing days.

And do so, love; yet when they have de­vised

What strained touches rhet­oric can lend,

Thou truly fair wert truly sym­path­ized

In true plain words by thy true-telling friend;

And their gross paint­ing might be bet­ter used

Where cheeks need blood; in thee it is ab­used.





LXXXIII


I never saw that you did paint­ing need

And there­fore to your fair no paint­ing set;

I found, or thought I found, you did ex­ceed

That bar­ren tender of a poet’s debt;

And there­fore have I slept in your re­port,

That you your­self be­ing ex­tant well might show

How far a mod­ern quill doth come too short,

Speak­ing of worth, what worth in you doth grow.

This si­lence for my sin you did im­pute,

Which shall be most my glory, be­ing dumb;

For I im­pair not beauty be­ing mute,

When oth­ers would give life and bring a tomb.

There lives more life in one of your fair eyes

Than both your po­ets can in praise de­vise.





LXXXIV


Who is it that says most? which can say more

Than this rich praise, that you alone are you?

In whose con­fine im­mured is the store

Which should ex­ample where your equal grew.

Lean pen­ury within that pen doth dwell

That to his sub­ject lends not some small glory;

But he that writes of you, if he can tell

That you are you, so dig­ni­fies his story,

Let him but copy what in you is writ,

Not mak­ing worse what nature made so clear,

And such a coun­ter­part shall fame his wit,

Mak­ing his style ad­mired every where.

You to your beau­teous bless­ings add a curse,

Be­ing fond on praise, which makes your praises worse.





LXXXV


My tongue-tied Muse in man­ners holds her still,

While com­ments of your praise, richly com­piled,

Reserve their char­ac­ter with golden quill

And pre­cious phrase by all the Muses filed.

I think good thoughts whilst other write good words,

And like un­letter’d clerk still cry “Amen”

To every hymn that able spirit af­fords

In pol­ish’d form of well-re­fined pen.

Hear­ing you praised, I say “ ’Tis so, ’tis true,”

And to the most of praise add some­thing more;

But that is in my thought, whose love to you,

Though words come hind­most, holds his rank be­fore.

Then oth­ers for the breath of words re­spect,

Me for my dumb thoughts, speak­ing in ef­fect.





LXXXVI


Was it the proud full sail of his great verse,

Bound for the prize of all too pre­cious you,

That did my ripe thoughts in my brain in­hearse,

Mak­ing their tomb the womb wherein they grew?

Was it his spirit, by spir­its taught to write

Above a mor­tal pitch, that struck me dead?

No, neither he, nor his com­peers by night

Giv­ing him aid, my verse as­ton­ished.

He, nor that af­fable fa­mil­iar ghost

Which nightly gulls him with in­tel­li­gence,

As vic­tors of my si­lence can­not boast;

I was not sick of any fear from thence:

But when your coun­ten­ance fill’d up his line,

Then lack’d I mat­ter; that en­feebled mine.





LXXXVII


Farewell! thou art too dear for my pos­sess­ing,

And like enough thou know’st thy es­tim­ate:

The charter of thy worth gives thee re­leas­ing;

My bonds in thee are all de­term­in­ate.

For how do I hold thee but by thy grant­ing?

And for that riches where is my de­serving?

The cause of this fair gift in me is want­ing,

And so my pat­ent back again is swerving.

Thy­self thou gavest, thy own worth then not know­ing,

Or me, to whom thou gavest it, else mis­tak­ing;

So thy great gift, upon mis­pri­sion grow­ing,

Comes home again, on bet­ter judge­ment mak­ing.

Thus have I had thee, as a dream doth flat­ter,

In sleep a king, but wak­ing no such mat­ter.





LXXXVIII


When thou shalt be dis­posed to set me light

And place my merit in the eye of scorn,

Upon thy side against my­self I’ll fight

And prove thee vir­tu­ous, though thou art forsworn.

With mine own weak­ness be­ing best ac­quain­ted,

Upon thy part I can set down a story

Of faults con­ceal’d, wherein I am at­tain­ted,

That thou in los­ing me shalt win much glory:

And I by this will be a gainer too;

For bend­ing all my lov­ing thoughts on thee,

The in­jur­ies that to my­self I do,

Do­ing thee vant­age, double-vant­age me.

Such is my love, to thee I so be­long,

That for thy right my­self will bear all wrong.





LXXXIX


Say that thou didst for­sake me for some fault,

And I will com­ment upon that of­fence;

Speak of my lame­ness, and I straight will halt,

Against thy reas­ons mak­ing no de­fence.

Thou canst not, love, dis­grace me half so ill,

To set a form upon de­sired change,

As I’ll my­self dis­grace: know­ing thy will,

I will ac­quaint­ance strangle and look strange,

Be ab­sent from thy walks, and in my tongue

Thy sweet be­loved name no more shall dwell,

Lest I, too much pro­fane, should do it wrong

And haply of our old ac­quaint­ance tell.

For thee against my­self I’ll vow de­bate,

For I must ne’er love him whom thou dost hate.





XC


Then hate me when thou wilt; if ever, now;

Now, while the world is bent my deeds to cross,

Join with the spite of for­tune, make me bow,

And do not drop in for an after-loss:

Ah, do not, when my heart hath ’scaped this sor­row,

Come in the rear­ward of a con­quer’d woe;

Give not a windy night a rainy mor­row,

To linger out a pur­posed over­throw.

If thou wilt leave me, do not leave me last,

When other petty griefs have done their spite,

But in the on­set come; so shall I taste

At first the very worst of for­tune’s might,

And other strains of woe, which now seem woe,

Com­pared with loss of thee will not seem so.





XCI


Some glory in their birth, some in their skill,

Some in their wealth, some in their body’s force,

Some in their gar­ments, though new-fangled ill,

Some in their hawks and hounds, some in their horse;

And every hu­mour hath his ad­junct pleas­ure,

Wherein it finds a joy above the rest:

But these par­tic­u­lars are not my meas­ure;

All these I bet­ter in one gen­eral best.

Thy love is bet­ter than high birth to me,

Richer than wealth, prouder than gar­ments’ cost,

Of more de­light than hawks and horses be;

And hav­ing thee, of all men’s pride I boast:

Wretched in this alone, that thou mayst take

All this away and me most wretchcd make.





XCII


But do thy worst to steal thy­self away,

For term of life thou art as­sured mine,

And life no longer than thy love will stay,

For it de­pends upon that love of thine.

Then need I not to fear the worst of wrongs,

When in the least of them my life hath end.

I see a bet­ter state to me be­longs

Than that which on thy hu­mour doth de­pend;

Thou canst not vex me with in­con­stant mind,

Since that my life on thy re­volt doth lie.

O, what a happy title do I find,

Happy to have thy love, happy to die!

But what’s so blessed-fair that fears no blot?

Thou mayst be false, and yet I know it not.





XCIII


So shall I live, sup­pos­ing thou art true,

Like a de­ceived hus­band; so love’s face

May still seem love to me, though al­ter’d new;

Thy looks with me, thy heart in other place:

For there can live no hatred in thine eye,

There­fore in that I can­not know thy change.

In many’s looks the false heart’s his­tory

Is writ in moods and frowns and wrinkles strange,

But heaven in thy cre­ation did de­cree

That in thy face sweet love should ever dwell;

Whate’er thy thoughts or thy heart’s work­ings be,

Thy looks should noth­ing thence but sweet­ness tell.

How like Eve’s apple doth thy beauty grow,

If thy sweet vir­tue an­swer not thy show!





XCIV


They that have power to hurt, and will do none,

That do not do the thing they most do show,

Who, mov­ing oth­ers, are them­selves as stone,

Un­moved, cold, and to tempta­tion slow,

They rightly do in­herit heaven’s graces

And hus­band nature’s riches from ex­pense;

They are the lords and own­ers of their faces,

Oth­ers but stew­ards of their ex­cel­lence.

The sum­mer’s flower is to the sum­mer sweet,

Though to it­self it only live and die,

But if that flower with base in­fec­tion meet,

The basest weed out­braves his dig­nity:

For sweetest things turn sourest by their deeds;

Lilies that fester smell far worse than weeds.





XCV


How sweet and lovely dost thou make the shame,

Which like a canker in the fra­grant rose,

Doth spot the beauty of thy bud­ding name!

O, in what sweets dost thou thy sins en­close!

That tongue that tells the story of thy days,

Mak­ing las­ci­vi­ous com­ments on thy sport,

Can­not dis­praise but in a kind of praise;

Nam­ing thy name blesses an ill re­port.

O, what a man­sion have those vices got

Which for their hab­it­a­tion chose out thee,

Where beauty’s veil doth cover every blot,

And all things turns to fair that eyes can see!

Take heed, dear heart, of this large priv­ilege;

The hard­est knife ill-used doth lose his edge.





XCVI


Some say thy fault is youth, some wan­ton­ness;

Some say thy grace is youth and gentle sport;

Both grace and faults are loved of more and less;

Thou makest faults graces that to thee re­sort.

As on the fin­ger of a throned queen

The basest jewel will be well es­teem’d,

So are those er­rors that in thee are seen

To truths trans­lated and for true things deem’d.

How many lambs might the stern wolf be­tray,

If like a lamb he could his looks trans­late!

How many gazers mightst thou lead away,

If thou wouldst use the strength of all thy state!

But do not so; I love thee in such sort

As, thou be­ing mine, mine is thy good re­port.





XCVII


How like a winter hath my ab­sence been

From thee, the pleas­ure of the fleet­ing year!

What freez­ings have I felt, what dark days seen!

What old Decem­ber’s bare­ness every­where!

And yet this time re­moved was sum­mer’s time,

The teem­ing au­tumn, big with rich in­crease,

Bear­ing the wan­ton bur­den of the prime,

Like widow’d wombs after their lords’ de­cease:

Yet this abund­ant is­sue seem’d to me

But hope of orphans and un­father’d fruit;

For sum­mer and his pleas­ures wait on thee,

And, thou away, the very birds are mute;

Or if they sing, ’tis with so dull a cheer

That leaves look pale, dread­ing the winter’s near.





XCVIII


From you have I been ab­sent in the spring,

When proud-pied April dress’d in all his trim

Hath put a spirit of youth in everything,

That heavy Saturn laugh’d and leap’d with him.

Yet nor the lays of birds nor the sweet smell

Of dif­fer­ent flowers in odour and in hue

Could make me any sum­mer’s story tell,

Or from their proud lap pluck them where they grew;

Nor did I won­der at the lily’s white,

Nor praise the deep ver­mil­ion in the rose;

They were but sweet, but fig­ures of de­light,

Drawn after you, you pat­tern of all those.

Yet seem’d it winter still, and, you away,

As with your shadow I with these did play:





XCIX


The for­ward vi­olet thus did I chide:

Sweet thief, whence didst thou steal thy sweet that smells,

If not from my love’s breath? The purple pride

Which on thy soft cheek for com­plex­ion dwells

In my love’s veins thou hast too grossly dyed.

The lily I con­demned for thy hand,

And buds of mar­joram had stol’n thy hair:

The roses fear­fully on thorns did stand,

One blush­ing shame, an­other white des­pair;

A third nor red nor white, had stol’n of both

And to his rob­bery had an­nex’d thy breath;

But, for his theft, in pride of all his growth

A venge­ful canker eat him up to death.

More flowers I noted, yet I none could see

But sweet or col­our it had stol’n from thee.





C


Where art thou, Muse, that thou for­get’st so long

To speak of that which gives thee all thy might?

Spend’st thou thy fury on some worth­less song,

Dark­en­ing thy power to lend base sub­jects light?

Return for­get­ful Muse, and straight re­deem

In gentle num­bers time so idly spent;

Sing to the ear that doth thy lays es­teem

And gives thy pen both skill and ar­gu­ment.

Rise, resty Muse, my love’s sweet face sur­vey,

If Time have any wrinkle graven there;

If any, be a satire to de­cay,

And make Time’s spoils des­pised every­where.

Give my love fame faster than Time wastes life;

So thou pre­vent’st his scythe and crooked knife.





CI


O tru­ant Muse, what shall be thy amends

For thy neg­lect of truth in beauty dyed?

Both truth and beauty on my love de­pends;

So dost thou too, and therein dig­ni­fied.

Make an­swer, Muse: wilt thou not haply say

“Truth needs no col­our, with his col­our fix’d;

Beauty no pen­cil, beauty’s truth to lay;

But best is best, if never in­ter­mix’d?”

Be­cause he needs no praise, wilt thou be dumb?

Ex­cuse not si­lence so; for’t lies in thee

To make him much out­live a gil­ded tomb,

And to be praised of ages yet to be.

Then do thy of­fice, Muse; I teach thee how

To make him seem long hence as he shows now.





CII


My love is strengthen’d, though more weak in seem­ing;

I love not less, though less the show ap­pear:

That love is mer­chand­ized whose rich es­teem­ing

The owner’s tongue doth pub­lish every where.

Our love was new and then but in the spring

When I was wont to greet it with my lays,

As Philomel in sum­mer’s front doth sing

And stops her pipe in growth of riper days:

Not that the sum­mer is less pleas­ant now

Than when her mourn­ful hymns did hush the night,

But that wild mu­sic bur­thens every bough

And sweets grown com­mon lose their dear de­light.

There­fore like her I some­time hold my tongue,

Be­cause I would not dull you with my song.





CIII


Alack, what poverty my Muse brings forth,

That hav­ing such a scope to show her pride,

The ar­gu­ment all bare is of more worth

Than when it hath my ad­ded praise be­side!

O, blame me not, if I no more can write!

Look in your glass, and there ap­pears a face

That over-goes my blunt in­ven­tion quite,

Dulling my lines and do­ing me dis­grace.

Were it not sin­ful then, striv­ing to mend,

To mar the sub­ject that be­fore was well?

For to no other pass my verses tend

Than of your graces and your gifts to tell;

And more, much more, than in my verse can sit

Your own glass shows you when you look in it.





CIV


To me, fair friend, you never can be old,

For as you were when first your eye I eyed,

Such seems your beauty still. Three win­ters cold,

Have from the forests shook three sum­mers’ pride,

Three beau­teous springs to yel­low au­tumn turn’d

In pro­cess of the sea­sons have I seen,

Three April per­fumes in three hot Junes burn’d,

Since first I saw you fresh, which yet are green.

Ah! yet doth beauty, like a dial hand,

Steal from his fig­ure and no pace per­ceived;

So your sweet hue, which me­thinks still doth stand,

Hath mo­tion and mine eye may be de­ceived:

For fear of which, hear this, thou age un­bred;

Ere you were born was beauty’s sum­mer dead.





CV


Let not my love be call’d id­ol­atry,

Nor my be­loved as an idol show,

Since all alike my songs and praises be

To one, of one, still such, and ever so.

Kind is my love to-day, to-mor­row kind,

Still con­stant in a won­drous ex­cel­lence;

There­fore my verse to con­stancy con­fined,

One thing ex­press­ing, leaves out dif­fer­ence.

“Fair, kind, and true” is all my ar­gu­ment,

“Fair, kind, and true” vary­ing to other words;

And in this change is my in­ven­tion spent,

Three themes in one, which won­drous scope af­fords.

“Fair, kind, and true,” have of­ten lived alone,

Which three till now never kept seat in one.





CVI


When in the chron­icle of wasted time

I see de­scrip­tions of the fairest wights,

And beauty mak­ing beau­ti­ful old rhyme

In praise of ladies dead and lovely knights,

Then, in the blazon of sweet beauty’s best,

Of hand, of foot, of lip, of eye, of brow,

I see their an­tique pen would have ex­press’d

Even such a beauty as you mas­ter now.

So all their praises are but proph­ecies

Of this our time, all you pre­fig­ur­ing;

And, for they look’d but with divin­ing eyes,

They had not skill enough your worth to sing:

For we, which now be­hold these present days,

Have eyes to won­der, but lack tongues to praise.





CVII


Not mine own fears, nor the proph­etic soul

Of the wide world dream­ing on things to come,

Can yet the lease of my true love con­trol,

Sup­posed as for­feit to a con­fined doom.

The mor­tal moon hath her ec­lipse en­dured

And the sad au­gurs mock their own pres­age;

In­cer­tain­ties now crown them­selves as­sured

And peace pro­claims olives of end­less age.

Now with the drops of this most balmy time

My love looks fresh, and Death to me sub­scribes,

Since, spite of him, I’ll live in this poor rhyme,

While he in­sults o’er dull and speech­less tribes:

And thou in this shalt find thy monu­ment,

When tyr­ants’ crests and tombs of brass are spent.





CVIII


What’s in the brain that ink may char­ac­ter

Which hath not figured to thee my true spirit?

What’s new to speak, what now to re­gister,

That may ex­press my love or thy dear merit?

Noth­ing, sweet boy; but yet, like pray­ers di­vine,

I must each day say o’er the very same,

Count­ing no old thing old, thou mine, I thine,

Even as when first I hal­low’d thy fair name.

So that eternal love in love’s fresh case

Weighs not the dust and in­jury of age,

Nor gives to ne­ces­sary wrinkles place,

But makes an­tiquity for aye his page,

Find­ing the first con­ceit of love there bred

Where time and out­ward form would show it dead.





CIX


O, never say that I was false of heart,

Though ab­sence seem’d my flame to qual­ify.

As easy might I from my­self de­part

As from my soul, which in thy breast doth lie:

That is my home of love: if I have ranged,

Like him that travels I re­turn again,

Just to the time, not with the time ex­changed,

So that my­self bring wa­ter for my stain.

Never be­lieve, though in my nature reign’d

All frailties that be­siege all kinds of blood,

That it could so pre­pos­ter­ously be stain’d,

To leave for noth­ing all thy sum of good;

For noth­ing this wide uni­verse I call,

Save thou my rose; in it thou art my all.





CX


Alas, ’tis true I have gone here and there

And made my­self a mot­ley to the view,

Gored mine own thoughts, sold cheap what is most dear,

Made old of­fences of af­fec­tions new;

Most true it is that I have look’d on truth

Askance and strangely: but by all above,

These blenches gave my heart an­other youth,

And worse es­says proved thee my best of love.

Now all is done, have what shall have no end:

Mine ap­pet­ite I never more will grind

On newer proof, to try an older friend,

A god in love, to whom I am con­fined.

Then give me wel­come, next my heaven the best,

Even to thy pure and most most lov­ing breast.





CXI


O, for my sake do you with For­tune chide,

The guilty god­dess of my harm­ful deeds,

That did not bet­ter for my life provide

Than pub­lic means which pub­lic man­ners breeds.

Thence comes it that my name re­ceives a brand,

And al­most thence my nature is sub­dued

To what it works in, like the dyer’s hand:

Pity me then, and wish I were re­new’d;

Whilst, like a will­ing pa­tient, I will drink

Po­tions of eisel ’gainst my strong in­fec­tion;

No bit­ter­ness that I will bit­ter think,

Nor double pen­ance to cor­rect cor­rec­tion.

Pity me then, dear friend, and I as­sure ye

Even that your pity is enough to cure me.





CXII


Your love and pity doth the im­pres­sion fill

Which vul­gar scan­dal stamp’d upon my brow;

For what care I who calls me well or ill,

So you o’er-green my bad, my good al­low?

You are my all the world, and I must strive

To know my shames and praises from your tongue;

None else to me, nor I to none alive,

That my steel’d sense or changes right or wrong.

In so pro­found abysm I throw all care

Of oth­ers’ voices, that my ad­der’s sense

To critic and to flat­terer stopped are.

Mark how with my neg­lect I do dis­pense:

You are so strongly in my pur­pose bred

That all the world be­sides me­thinks are dead.





CXIII


Since I left you, mine eye is in my mind;

And that which gov­erns me to go about

Doth part his func­tion and is partly blind,

Seems see­ing, but ef­fec­tu­ally is out;

For it no form de­liv­ers to the heart

Of bird, of flower, or shape, which it doth latch:

Of his quick ob­jects hath the mind no part,

Nor his own vis­ion holds what it doth catch;

For if it see the rud’st or gentlest sight,

The most sweet fa­vour or de­formed’st creature,

The moun­tain or the sea, the day or night,

The crow or dove, it shapes them to your fea­ture:

In­cap­able of more, re­plete with you,

My most true mind thus makes mine un­true.





CXIV


Or whether doth my mind, be­ing crown’d with you,

Drink up the mon­arch’s plague, this flat­tery?

Or whether shall I say, mine eye saith true,

And that your love taught it this al­chemy,

To make of mon­sters and things in­di­gest

Such cher­ubins as your sweet self re­semble,

Creat­ing every bad a per­fect best,

As fast as ob­jects to his beams as­semble?

O, ’tis the first; ’tis flat­tery in my see­ing,

And my great mind most kingly drinks it up:

Mine eye well knows what with his gust is ’gree­ing,

And to his pal­ate doth pre­pare the cup:

If it be poison’d, ’tis the lesser sin

That mine eye loves it and doth first be­gin.





CXV


Those lines that I be­fore have writ do lie,

Even those that said I could not love you dearer:

Yet then my judg­ment knew no reason why

My most full flame should af­ter­wards burn clearer.

But reck­on­ing time, whose mil­lion’d ac­ci­dents

Creep in ’twixt vows and change de­crees of kings,

Tan sac­red beauty, blunt the sharp’st in­tents,

Divert strong minds to the course of al­ter­ing things;

Alas, why, fear­ing of time’s tyranny,

Might I not then say “Now I love you best,”

When I was cer­tain o’er in­cer­tainty,

Crown­ing the present, doubt­ing of the rest?

Love is a babe; then might I not say so,

To give full growth to that which still doth grow?





CXVI


Let me not to the mar­riage of true minds

Ad­mit im­ped­i­ments. Love is not love

Which al­ters when it al­ter­a­tion finds,

Or bends with the re­mover to re­move:

O, no! it is an ever-fixed mark

That looks on tem­pests and is never shaken;

It is the star to every wan­der­ing bark,

Whose worth’s un­known, al­though his height be taken.

Love’s not Time’s fool, though rosy lips and cheeks

Within his bend­ing sickle’s com­pass come;

Love al­ters not with his brief hours and weeks,

But bears it out even to the edge of doom.

If this be er­ror and upon me proved,

I never writ, nor no man ever loved.





CXVII


Ac­cuse me thus: that I have scan­ted all

Wherein I should your great deserts re­pay,

For­got upon your dearest love to call,

Whereto all bonds do tie me day by day;

That I have fre­quent been with un­known minds

And given to time your own dear-pur­chased right;

That I have hois­ted sail to all the winds

Which should trans­port me farthest from your sight.

Book both my wil­ful­ness and er­rors down

And on just proof sur­mise ac­cu­mu­late;

Bring me within the level of your frown,

But shoot not at me in your waken’d hate;

Since my ap­peal says I did strive to prove

The con­stancy and vir­tue of your love.





CXVIII


Like as, to make our ap­pet­ite more keen,

With eager com­pounds we our pal­ate urge,

As, to pre­vent our mal­ad­ies un­seen,

We sicken to shun sick­ness when we purge,

Even so, be­ing full of your ne’er-cloy­ing sweet­ness,

To bit­ter sauces did I frame my feed­ing

And, sick of wel­fare, found a kind of meet­ness

To be dis­eased ere that there was true need­ing.

Thus policy in love, to an­ti­cip­ate

The ills that were not, grew to faults as­sured

And brought to medi­cine a health­ful state

Which, rank of good­ness, would by ill be cured:

But thence I learn, and find the les­son true,

Drugs poison him that so feil sick of you.





CXIX


What po­tions have I drunk of Siren tears,

Distill’d from lim­becks foul as hell within,

Ap­ply­ing fears to hopes and hopes to fears,

Still los­ing when I saw my­self to win!

What wretched er­rors hath my heart com­mit­ted,

Whilst it hath thought it­self so blessed never!

How have mine eyes out of their spheres been fit­ted

In the dis­trac­tion of this mad­ding fever!

O be­ne­fit of ill! now I find true

That bet­ter is by evil still made bet­ter;

And ruin’d love, when it is built anew,

Grows fairer than at first, more strong, far greater.

So I re­turn re­buked to my con­tent

And gain by ills thrice more than I have spent.





CXX


That you were once un­kind be­friends me now,

And for that sor­row which I then did feel

Needs must I un­der my trans­gres­sion bow,

Un­less my nerves were brass or ham­mer’d steel.

For if you were by my un­kind­ness shaken

As I by yours, y’have pass’d a hell of time,

And I, a tyr­ant, have no leis­ure taken

To weigh how once I suf­fer’d in your crime.

O, that our night of woe might have re­mem­ber’d

My deep­est sense, how hard true sor­row hits,

And soon to you, as you to me, then tender’d

The humble salve which wounded bos­oms fits!

But that your tres­pass now be­comes a fee;

Mine ransoms yours, and yours must ransom me.





CXXI


’Tis bet­ter to be vile than vile es­teem’d,

When not to be re­ceives re­proach of be­ing,

And the just pleas­ure lost, which is so deem’d

Not by our feel­ing but by oth­ers’ see­ing:

For why should oth­ers’ false adul­ter­ate eyes

Give sa­luta­tion to my sport­ive blood?

Or on my frailties why are frailer spies,

Which in their wills count bad what I think good?

No, I am that I am, and they that level

At my ab­uses reckon up their own:

I may be straight, though they them­selves be bevel;

By their rank thoughts my deeds must not be shown;

Un­less this gen­eral evil they main­tain,

All men are bad, and in their bad­ness reign.





CXXII


Thy gift, thy tables, are within my brain

Full char­ac­ter’d with last­ing memory,

Which shall above that idle rank re­main

Bey­ond all date, even to etern­ity;

Or at the least, so long as brain and heart

Have fac­ulty by nature to sub­sist;

Till each to razed ob­li­vion yield his part

Of thee, thy re­cord never can be miss’d.

That poor re­ten­tion could not so much hold,

Nor need I tal­lies thy dear love to score;

There­fore to give them from me was I bold,

To trust those tables that re­ceive thee more:

To keep an ad­junct to re­mem­ber thee

Were to im­port for­get­ful­ness in me.





CXXIII


No, Time, thou shalt not boast that I do change:

Thy pyr­am­ids built up with newer might

To me are noth­ing novel, noth­ing strange;

They are but dress­ings Of a former sight.

Our dates are brief, and there­fore we ad­mire

What thou dost foist upon us that is old,

And rather make them born to our de­sire

Than think that we be­fore have heard them told:

Thy re­gisters and thee I both defy,

Not won­der­ing at the present nor the past,

For thy re­cords and what we see doth lie,

Made more or less by thy con­tinual haste.

This I do vow and this shall ever be;

I will be true, des­pite thy scythe and thee.





CXXIV


If my dear love were but the child of state,

It might for For­tune’s bas­tard be un­father’d,

As sub­ject to Time’s love or to Time’s hate,

Weeds among weeds, or flowers with flowers gather’d.

No, it was buil­ded far from ac­ci­dent;

It suf­fers not in smil­ing pomp, nor falls

Under the blow of thralled dis­con­tent,

Whereto the in­vit­ing time our fash­ion calls:

It fears not policy, that heretic,

Which works on leases of short-num­ber’d hours,

But all alone stands hugely politic,

That it nor grows with heat nor drowns with showers.

To this I wit­ness call the fools of time,

Which die for good­ness, who have lived for crime.





CXXV


Were’t aught to me I bore the can­opy,

With my ex­tern the out­ward hon­our­ing,

Or laid great bases for etern­ity,

Which proves more short than waste or ru­in­ing?

Have I not seen dwell­ers on form and fa­vour

Lose all, and more, by pay­ing too much rent,

For com­pound sweet for­go­ing simple sa­vour,

Pi­ti­ful thrivers, in their gaz­ing spent?

No, let me be ob­sequious in thy heart,

And take thou my ob­la­tion, poor but free,

Which is not mix’d with seconds, knows no art,

But mu­tual render, only me for thee.

Hence, thou sub­orn’d in­former! a true soul

When most im­peach’d stands least in thy con­trol.





CXXVI


O thou, my lovely boy, who in thy power

Dost hold Time’s fickle glass, his sickle, hour;

Who hast by wan­ing grown, and therein show’st

Thy lov­ers with­er­ing as thy sweet self grow’st;

If Nature, sov­er­eign mis­tress over wrack,

As thou goest on­wards, still will pluck thee back,

She keeps thee to this pur­pose, that her skill

May time dis­grace and wretched minutes kill.

Yet fear her, O thou min­ion of her pleas­ure!

She may de­tain, but not still keep, her treas­ure:

Her audit, though delay’d, an­swer’d must be,

And her quietus is to render thee.





CXXVII


In the old age black was not coun­ted fair,

Or if it were, it bore not beauty’s name;

But now is black beauty’s suc­cess­ive heir,

And beauty slander’d with a bas­tard shame:

For since each hand hath put on nature’s power,

Fair­ing the foul with art’s false bor­row’d face,

Sweet beauty hath no name, no holy bower,

But is pro­faned, if not lives in dis­grace.

There­fore my mis­tress’ eyes are raven black,

Her eyes so suited, and they mourn­ers seem

At such who not born fair, no beauty lack,

Slander­ing cre­ation with a false es­teem:

Yet so they mourn, be­com­ing of their woe,

That every tongue says beauty should look so.





CXXVIII


How oft, when thou, my mu­sic, mu­sic play’st,

Upon that blessed wood whose mo­tion sounds

With thy sweet fin­gers when thou gently sway’st

The wiry con­cord that mine ear con­founds,

Do I envy those jacks that nimble leap

To kiss the tender in­ward of thy hand,

Whilst my poor lips, which should that har­vest reap,

At the wood’s bold­ness by thee blush­ing stand!

To be so tickled, they would change their state

And situ­ation with those dan­cing chips,

O’er whom thy fin­gers walk with gentle gait,

Mak­ing dead wood more blest than liv­ing lips.

Since saucy jacks so happy are in this,

Give them thy fin­gers, me thy lips to kiss.





CXXIX


The ex­pense of spirit in a waste of shame

Is lust in ac­tion; and till ac­tion, lust

Is per­jured, mur­der­ous, bloody full of blame,

Sav­age, ex­treme, rude, cruel, not to trust,

En­joy’d no sooner but des­pised straight,

Past reason hunted, and no sooner had

Past reason hated, as a swal­low’d bait

On pur­pose laid to make the taker mad;

Mad in pur­suit and in pos­ses­sion so;

Had, hav­ing, and in quest to have, ex­treme;

A bliss in proof, and proved, a very woe;

Be­fore, a joy pro­posed; be­hind a dream.

All this the world well knows; yet none knows well

To shun the heaven that leads men to this hell.





CXXX


My mis­tress’ eyes are noth­ing like the sun;

Coral is far more red, than her lips’ red;

If snow be white, why then her breasts are dun;

If hairs be wires, black wires grow on her head.

I have seen roses dam­ask’d, red and white,

But no such roses see I in her cheeks;

And in some per­fumes is there more de­light

Than in the breath that from my mis­tress reeks.

I love to hear her speak, yet well I know

That mu­sic hath a far more pleas­ing sound;

I grant I never saw a god­dess go;

My mis­tress when she walks, treads on the ground:

And yet, by heaven, I think my love as rare

As any she be­lied with false com­pare.





CXXXI


Thou art as tyr­an­nous, so as thou art,

As those whose beau­ties proudly make them cruel;

For well thou know’st to my dear dot­ing heart

Thou art the fairest and most pre­cious jewel.

Yet, in good faith, some say that thee be­hold

Thy face hath not the power to make love groan:

To say they err I dare not be so bold,

Al­though I swear it to my­self alone.

And, to be sure that is not false I swear,

A thou­sand groans but think­ing on thy face,

One on an­other’s neck, do wit­ness bear

Thy black is fairest in my judg­ment’s place.

In noth­ing art thou black save in thy deeds,

And thence this slander, as I think pro­ceeds.





CXXXII


Thine eyes I love, and they, as pity­ing me,

Know­ing thy heart tor­ment me with dis­dain,

Have put on black and lov­ing mourn­ers be,

Look­ing with pretty ruth upon my pain.

And truly not the morn­ing sun of heaven

Bet­ter be­comes the grey cheeks of the east,

Nor that full star that ush­ers in the even

Doth half that glory to the sober west,

As those two mourn­ing eyes be­come thy face:

O, let it then as well be­seem thy heart

To mourn for me, since mourn­ing doth thee grace,

And suit thy pity like in every part.

Then will I swear beauty her­self is black

And all they foul that thy com­plex­ion lack.





CXXXIII


Beshrew that heart that makes my heart to groan

For that deep wound it gives my friend and me!

Is’t not enough to tor­ture me alone,

But slave to slavery my sweet’st friend must be?

Me from my­self thy cruel eye hath taken,

And my next self thou harder hast en­gross’d:

Of him, my­self, and thee I am for­saken;

A tor­ment thrice threefold thus to be cross’d.

Prison my heart in thy steel bosom’s ward,

But then my friend’s heart let my poor heart bail;

Whoe’er keeps me, let my heart be his guard;

Thou canst not then use rigour in my gaol:

And yet thou wilt; for I, be­ing pent in thee,

Per­force am thine, and all that is in me.





CXXXIV


So, now I have con­fess’d that he is thine,

And I my­self am mort­gaged to thy will,

My­self I’ll for­feit, so that other mine

Thou wilt re­store, to be my com­fort still:

But thou wilt not, nor he will not be free,

For thou art cov­et­ous and he is kind;

He learn’d but surety-like to write for me

Under that bond that him as fist doth bind.

The stat­ute of thy beauty thou wilt take,

Thou usurer, that put’st forth all to use,

And sue a friend came debtor for my sake;

So him I lose through my un­kind ab­use.

Him have I lost; thou hast both him and me:

He pays the whole, and yet am I not free.





CXXXV


Who­ever hath her wish, thou hast thy “Will,”

And “Will” to boot, and “Will” in over­plus;

More than enough am I that vex thee still,

To thy sweet will mak­ing ad­di­tion thus.

Wilt thou, whose will is large and spa­cious,

Not once vouch­safe to hide my will in thine?

Shall will in oth­ers seem right gra­cious,

And in my will no fair ac­cept­ance shine?

The sea, all wa­ter, yet re­ceives rain still

And in abund­ance ad­deth to his store;

So thou, be­ing rich in “Will,” add to thy “Will”

One will of mine, to make thy large “Will” more.

Let no un­kind, no fair be­seech­ers kill;

Think all but one, and me in that one “Will.”





CXXXVI


If thy soul check thee that I come so near,

Swear to thy blind soul that I was thy “Will,”

And will, thy soul knows, is ad­mit­ted there;

Thus far for love my love-suit, sweet, ful­fil.

“Will” will ful­fil the treas­ure of thy love,

Ay, fill it full with wills, and my will one.

In things of great re­ceipt with case we prove

Among a num­ber one is reckon’d none:

Then in the num­ber let me pass un­told,

Though in thy stores’ ac­count I one must be;

For noth­ing hold me, so it please thee hold

That noth­ing me, a some­thing sweet to thee:

Make but my name thy love, and love that still,

And then thou lovest me, for my name is “Will.”





CXXXVII


Thou blind fool, Love, what dost thou to mine eyes,

That they be­hold, and see not what they see?

They know what beauty is, see where it lies,

Yet what the best is take the worst to be.

If eyes cor­rupt by over-par­tial looks

Be an­chor’d in the bay where all men ride,

Why of eyes’ false­hood hast thou forged hooks,

Whereto the judg­ment of my heart is tied?

Why should my heart think that a sev­eral plot

Which my heart knows the wide world’s com­mon place?

Or mine eyes see­ing this, say this is not,

To put fair truth upon so foul a face?

In things right true my heart and eyes have erred,

And to this false plague are they now trans­ferr’d.





CXXXVIII


When my love swears that she is made of truth

I do be­lieve her, though I know she lies,

That she might think me some un­tutor’d youth,

Un­learned in the world’s false sub­tleties.

Thus vainly think­ing that she thinks me young,

Al­though she knows my days are past the best,

Sim­ply I credit her false-speak­ing tongue:

On both sides thus is simple truth sup­press’d.

But where­fore says she not she is un­just?

And where­fore say not I that I am old?

O, love’s best habit is in seem­ing trust,

And age in love loves not to have years told:

There­fore I lie with her and she with me,

And in our faults by lies we flat­ter’d be.





CXXXIX


O, call not me to jus­tify the wrong

That thy un­kind­ness lays upon my heart;

Wound me not with thine eye but with thy tongue;

Use power with power and slay me not by art.

Tell me thou lovest else­where, but in my sight,

Dear heart, for­bear to glance thine eye aside:

What need’st thou wound with cun­ning when thy might

Is more than my o’er­press’d de­fence can bide?

Let me ex­cuse thee: ah! my love well knows

Her pretty looks have been mine en­emies,

And there­fore from my face she turns my foes,

That they else­where might dart their in­jur­ies:

Yet do not so; but since I am near slain,

Kill me out­right with looks and rid my pain.





CXL


Be wise as thou art cruel; do not press

My tongue-tied pa­tience with too much dis­dain;

Lest sor­row lend me words and words ex­press

The man­ner of my pity-want­ing pain.

If I might teach thee wit, bet­ter it were,

Though not to love, yet, love, to tell me so;

As testy sick men, when their deaths be near,

No news but health from their phys­i­cians know;

For if I should des­pair, I should grow mad,

And in my mad­ness might speak ill of thee:

Now this ill-wrest­ing world is grown so bad,

Mad slan­der­ers by mad ears be­lieved be.

That I may not be so, nor thou be­lied,

Bear thine eyes straight, though thy proud heart go wide.





CXLI


In faith, I do not love thee with mine eyes,

For they in thee a thou­sand er­rors note;

But ’tis my heart that loves what they des­pise,

Who in des­pite of view is pleased to dote;

Nor are mine ears with thy tongue’s tune de­lighted,

Nor tender feel­ing, to base touches prone,

Nor taste, nor smell, de­sire to be in­vited

To any sen­sual feast with thee alone:

But my five wits nor my five senses can

Dis­suade one fool­ish heart from serving thee,

Who leaves un­sway’d the like­ness of a man,

Thy proud heart’s slave and vas­sal wretch to be:

Only my plague thus far I count my gain,

That she that makes me sin awards me pain.





CXLII


Love is my sin and thy dear vir­tue hate,

Hate of my sin, groun­ded on sin­ful lov­ing:

O, but with mine com­pare thou thine own state,

And thou shalt find it mer­its not re­prov­ing;

Or, if it do, not from those lips of thine,

That have pro­faned their scar­let or­na­ments

And seal’d false bonds of love as oft as mine,

Robbed oth­ers’ beds’ rev­en­ues of their rents.

Be it law­ful I love thee, as thou lovest those

Whom thine eyes woo as mine im­por­tune thee:

Root pity in thy heart, that when it grows

Thy pity may de­serve to pit­ied be.

If thou dost seek to have what thou dost hide,

By self-ex­ample mayst thou be denied!





CXLIII


Lo! as a care­ful huswife runs to catch

One of her feather’d creatures broke away,

Sets down her babe and makes all swift dis­patch

In pur­suit of the thing she would have stay,

Whilst her neg­lected child holds her in chase,

Cries to catch her whose busy care is bent

To fol­low that which flies be­fore her face,

Not priz­ing her poor in­fant’s dis­con­tent;

So runn’st thou after that which flies from thee,

Whilst I thy babe chase thee afar be­hind;

But if thou catch thy hope, turn back to me,

And play the mother’s part, kiss me, be kind:

So will I pray that thou mayst have thy “Will,”

If thou turn back, and my loud cry­ing still.





CXLIV


Two loves I have of com­fort and des­pair,

Which like two spir­its do sug­gest me still:

The bet­ter an­gel is a man right fair,

The worser spirit a wo­man col­our’d ill.

To win me soon to hell, my fe­male evil

Temp­teth my bet­ter an­gel from my side,

And would cor­rupt my saint to be a devil,

Woo­ing his pur­ity with her foul pride.

And whether that my an­gel be turn’d fiend

Sus­pect I may, yet not dir­ectly tell;

But be­ing both from me, both to each friend,

I guess one an­gel in an­other’s hell:

Yet this shall I ne’er know, but live in doubt,

Till my bad an­gel fire my good one out.





CXLV


Those lips that Love’s own hand did make

Breathed forth the sound that said “I hate”

To me that lan­guish’d for her sake;

But when she saw my woe­ful state,

Straight in her heart did mercy come,

Chid­ing that tongue that ever sweet

Was used in giv­ing gentle doom,

And taught it thus anew to greet;

“I hate” she al­ter’d with an end,

That fol­low’d it as gentle day

Doth fol­low night, who like a fiend

From heaven to hell is flown away;

“I hate” from hate away she threw,

And saved my life, say­ing “not you.”





CXLVI


Poor soul, the centre of my sin­ful earth,

⋮ these rebel powers ar­ray,

Why dost thou pine within and suf­fer dearth,

Paint­ing thy out­ward walls so costly gay?

Why so large cost, hav­ing so short a lease,

Dost thou upon thy fad­ing man­sion spend?

Shall worms, in­her­it­ors of this ex­cess,

Eat up thy charge? is this thy body’s end?

Then, soul, live thou upon thy ser­vant’s loss,

And let that pine to ag­grav­ate thy store;

Buy terms di­vine in selling hours of dross;

Within be fed, without be rich no more:

So shall thou feed on Death, that feeds on men,

And Death once dead, there’s no more dy­ing then.





CXLVII


My love is as a fever, long­ing still

For that which longer nur­seth the dis­ease,

Feed­ing on that which doth pre­serve the ill,

The un­cer­tain sickly ap­pet­ite to please.

My reason, the phys­i­cian to my love,

Angry that his pre­scrip­tions are not kept,

Hath left me, and I des­per­ate now ap­prove

Desire is death, which physic did ex­cept.

Past cure I am, now reason is past care,

And frantic-mad with ever­more un­rest;

My thoughts and my dis­course as mad­men’s are,

At ran­dom from the truth vainly ex­press’d;

For I have sworn thee fair and thought thee bright,

Who art as black as hell, as dark as night.





CXLVIII


O me, what eyes hath Love put in my head,

Which have no cor­res­pond­ence with true sight!

Or, if they have, where is my judg­ment fled,

That cen­sures falsely what they see aright?

If that be fair whereon my false eyes dote,

What means the world to say it is not so?

If it be not, then love doth well de­note

Love’s eye is not so true as all men’s “No.”

How can it? O, how can Love’s eye be true,

That is so vex’d with watch­ing and with tears?

No mar­vel then, though I mis­take my view;

The sun it­self sees not, till heaven clears.

O cun­ning Love! with tears thou keep’st me blind,

Lest eyes well-see­ing thy foul faults should find.





CXLIX


Canst thou, O cruel! say I love thee not,

When I against my­self with thee par­take?

Do I not think on thee, when I for­got

Am of my­self, all tyr­ant, for thy sake?

Who hat­eth thee that I do call my friend?

On whom frown’st thou that I do fawn upon?

Nay, if thou lour’st on me do I not spend

Revenge upon my­self with present moan?

What merit do I in my­self re­spect,

That is so proud thy ser­vice to des­pise,

When all my best doth wor­ship thy de­fect,

Com­manded by the mo­tion of thine eyes?

But, love, hate on, for now I know thy mind;

Those that can see thou lovest, and I am blind.





CL


O, from what power hast thou this power­ful might

With in­suf­fi­ciency my heart to sway?

To make me give the lie to my true sight,

And swear that bright­ness doth not grace the day?

Whence hast thou this be­com­ing of things ill,

That in the very re­fuse of thy deeds

There is such strength and war­rantise of skill

That, in my mind, thy worst all best ex­ceeds?

Who taught thee how to make me love thee more

The more I hear and see just cause of hate?

O, though I love what oth­ers do ab­hor,

With oth­ers thou shouldst not ab­hor my state:

If thy un­wor­thi­ness raised love in me,

More worthy I to be be­loved of thee.





CLI


Love is too young to know what con­science is;

Yet who knows not con­science is born of love?

Then, gentle cheater, urge not my amiss,

Lest guilty of my faults thy sweet self prove:

For, thou be­tray­ing me, I do be­tray

My no­bler part to my gross body’s treason;

My soul doth tell my body that he may

Tri­umph in love; flesh stays no farther reason;

But, rising at thy name, doth point out thee

As his tri­umphant prize. Proud of this pride,

He is con­ten­ted thy poor drudge to be,

To stand in thy af­fairs, fall by thy side.

No want of con­science hold it that I call

Her “love” for whose dear love I rise and fall.





CLII


In lov­ing thee thou know’st I am forsworn,

But thou art twice forsworn, to me love swear­ing,

In act thy bed-vow broke and new faith torn

In vow­ing new hate after new love bear­ing.

But why of two oaths’ breach do I ac­cuse thee,

When I break twenty? I am per­jured most;

For all my vows are oaths but to mis­use thee

And all my hon­est faith in thee is lost,

For I have sworn deep oaths of thy deep kind­ness,

Oaths of thy love, thy truth, thy con­stancy,

And, to en­lighten thee, gave eyes to blind­ness,

Or made them swear against the thing they see;

For I have sworn thee fair; more per­jured I,

To swear against the truth so foul a lie!





CLIII


Cu­pid laid by his brand, and fell asleep:

A maid of Dian’s this ad­vant­age found,

And his love-kind­ling fire did quickly steep

In a cold val­ley-foun­tain of that ground;

Which bor­row’d from this holy fire of Love

A date­less lively heat, still to en­dure,

And grew a seet­ing bath, which yet men prove

Against strange mal­ad­ies a sov­er­eign cure.

But at my mis­tress’ eye Love’s brand new-fired,

The boy for trial needs would touch my breast;

I, sick withal, the help of bath de­sired,

And thither hied, a sad dis­tem­per’d guest,

But found no cure: the bath for my help lies

Where Cu­pid got new fire—my mis­tress’ eyes.





CLIV


The little Love-god ly­ing once asleep

Laid by his side his heart-in­flam­ing brand,

Whilst many nymphs that vow’d chaste life to keep

Came trip­ping by; but in her maiden hand

The fairest vo­tary took up that fire

Which many le­gions of true hearts had warm’d;

And so the gen­eral of hot de­sire

Was sleep­ing by a vir­gin hand dis­arm’d.

This brand she quenched in a cool well by,

Which from Love’s fire took heat per­petual,

Grow­ing a bath and health­ful rem­edy

For men dis­eased; but I, my mis­tress’ thrall,

Came there for cure, and this by that I prove,

Love’s fire heats wa­ter, wa­ter cools not love.





A Lover’s Complaint


From off a hill whose con­cave womb re­worded

A plaint­ful story from a sis­ter­ing vale,

My spir­its to at­tend this double voice ac­cor­ded,

And down I laid to list the sad-tuned tale;

Ere long es­pied a fickle maid full pale,

Tear­ing of pa­pers, break­ing rings a-twain,

Storm­ing her world with sor­row’s wind and rain.



Upon her head a plat­ted hive of straw,

Which for­ti­fied her vis­age from the sun,

Whereon the thought might think some­time it saw

The car­cass of a beauty spent and done:

Time had not scythed all that youth be­gun,

Nor youth all quit; but, spite of heaven’s fell rage,

Some beauty peep’d through lat­tice of sear’d age.



Oft did she heave her nap­kin to her eyne,

Which on it had con­ceited char­ac­ters,

Laund’ring the silken fig­ures in the brine

That seasoned woe had pel­leted in tears,

And of­ten read­ing what con­tents it bears;

As of­ten shriek­ing un­dis­tin­guish’d woe,

In clam­ours of all size, both high and low.



So­me­times her lev­ell’d eyes their car­riage ride,

As they did batt’ry to the spheres in­tend;

So­me­time di­ver­ted their poor balls are tied

To th’orbed earth; some­times they do ex­tend

Their view right on; anon their gazes lend

To every place at once, and nowhere fix’d,

The mind and sight dis­trac­tedly com­mix’d.



Her hair, nor loose nor tied in formal plat,

Pro­claim’d in her a care­less hand of pride;

For some un­tuck’d des­cen­ded her sheav’d hat,

Hanging her pale and pined cheek be­side;

Some in her threaden fil­let still did bide,

And, true to bond­age, would not break from thence,

Though slackly braided in loose neg­li­gence.



A thou­sand fa­vours from a maund she drew,

Of am­ber, crys­tal, and of beaded jet,

Which one by one she in a river threw,

Upon whose weep­ing mar­gent she was set,

Like usury ap­ply­ing wet to wet,

Or mon­arch’s hands that lets not bounty fall

Where want cries some, but where ex­cess begs all.



Of fol­ded sched­ules had she many a one,

Which she per­used, sigh’d, tore, and gave the flood;

Crack’d many a ring of posied gold and bone,

Bid­ding them find their sep­ulchres in mud;

Found yet mo let­ters sadly penn’d in blood,

With sleided silk feat and af­fectedly

En­swathed, and seal’d to curi­ous secrecy.



These of­ten bathed she in her flux­ive eyes,

And of­ten kiss’d, and of­ten ’gan to tear;

Cried, “O false blood, thou re­gister of lies,

What un­ap­proved wit­ness dost thou bear!

Ink would have seem’d more black and damned here!”

This said, in top of rage the lines she rents,

Big dis­con­tent so break­ing their con­tents.



A rev­er­end man that grazed his cattle nigh—

So­me­time a blusterer, that the ruffle knew

Of court, of city, and had let go by

The swift­est hours, ob­served as they flew—

Towards this af­flic­ted fancy fastly drew,

And, priv­ileged by age, de­sires to know

In brief the grounds and motives of her woe.



So slides he down upon his grained bat,

And comely-dis­tant sits he by her side;

When he again de­sires her, be­ing sat,

Her griev­ance with his hear­ing to di­vide:

If that from him there may be aught ap­plied

Which may her suf­fer­ing ec­stasy as­suage,

’Tis prom­ised in the char­ity of age.



“Father,” she says, “though in me you be­hold

The in­jury of many a blast­ing hour,

Let it not tell your judge­ment I am old;

Not age, but sor­row, over me hath power:

I might as yet have been a spread­ing flower,

Fresh to my­self, if I had self-ap­plied

Love to my­self and to no love be­side.



“But, woe is me! too early I at­ten­ded

A youth­ful suit—it was to gain my grace—

Of one by nature’s out­wards so com­men­ded,

That maid­ens’ eyes stuck over all his face:

Love lack’d a dwell­ing, and made him her place;

And when in his fair parts she did abide,

She was new lodged and newly dei­fied.



“His browny locks did hang in crooked curls;

And every light oc­ca­sion of the wind

Upon his lips their silken par­cels hurls.

What’s sweet to do, to do will aptly find:

Each eye that saw him did en­chant the mind,

For on his vis­age was in little drawn

What large­ness thinks in Paradise was sawn.



“Small show of man was yet upon his chin;

His phoenix down began but to ap­pear

Like un­shorn vel­vet on that term­less skin

Whose bare out-bragg’d the web it seem’d to wear:

Yet show’d his vis­age by that cost more dear;

And nice af­fec­tions waver­ing stood in doubt

If best were as it was, or best without.



“His qual­it­ies were beau­teous as his form,

For maiden-tongued he was, and thereof free;

Yet if men moved him, was he such a storm

As oft ’twixt May and April is to see,

When winds breathe sweet, un­ruly though they be.

His rude­ness so with his au­thor­ized youth

Did liv­ery false­ness in a pride of truth.



“Well could he ride, and of­ten men would say

‘That horse his mettle from his rider takes:

Proud of sub­jec­tion, noble by the sway,

What rounds, what bounds, what course, what stop he makes!’

And con­tro­versy hence a ques­tion takes,

Whether the horse by him be­came his deed,

Or he his man­age by the well-do­ing steed.



“But quickly on this side the ver­dict went:

His real habitude gave life and grace

To ap­per­tain­ings and to or­na­ment,

Ac­com­plish’d in him­self, not in his case:

All aids, them­selves made fairer by their place,

Came for ad­di­tions; yet their pur­posed trim

Pieced not his grace, but were all graced by him.



“So on the tip of his sub­du­ing tongue

All kind of ar­gu­ments and ques­tion deep,

All rep­lic­a­tion prompt, and reason strong,

For his ad­vant­age still did wake and sleep:

To make the weeper laugh, the laugher weep,

He had the dia­lect and dif­fer­ent skill,

Catch­ing all pas­sions in his craft of will:



“That he did in the gen­eral bosom reign

Of young, of old; and sexes both en­chanted,

To dwell with him in thoughts, or to re­main

In per­sonal duty, fol­low­ing where he haunted:

Con­sents be­witch’d, ere he de­sire, have gran­ted;

And dia­logued for him what he would say,

Ask’d their own wills, and made their wills obey.



“Many there were that did his pic­ture get,

To serve their eyes, and in it put their mind;

Like fools that in th’ ima­gin­a­tion set

The goodly ob­jects which abroad they find

Of lands and man­sions, theirs in thought as­sign’d;

And la­bour­ing in moe pleas­ures to be­stow them

Than the true gouty land­lord which doth owe them:



“So many have, that never touch’d his hand,

Sweetly sup­posed them mis­tress of his heart.

My woe­ful self, that did in free­dom stand,

And was my own fee-simple, not in part,

What with his art in youth, and youth in art,

Threw my af­fec­tions in his charmed power,

Reserved the stalk and gave him all my flower.



“Yet did I not, as some my equals did,

De­mand of him, nor be­ing de­sired yiel­ded;

Find­ing my­self in hon­our so for­bid,

With safest dis­tance I mine hon­our shiel­ded:

Ex­per­i­ence for me many bul­warks buil­ded

Of proofs new-bleed­ing, which re­main’d the foil

Of this false jewel, and his amor­ous spoil.



“But ah, who ever shunn’d by pre­ced­ent

The destined ill she must her­self as­say?

Or for­ceed ex­amples ’gainst her own con­tent,

To put the by-past per­ils in her way?

Coun­sel may stop a while what will not stay;

For when we rage, ad­vice is of­ten seen

By blunt­ing us to make our wills more keen.



“Nor gives it sat­is­fac­tion to our blood,

That we must curb it upon oth­ers’ proof;

To be for­bode the sweets that seems so good,

For fear of harms that preach in our be­hoof.

O ap­pet­ite, from judge­ment stand aloof!

The one a pal­ate hath that needs will taste,

Though Reason weep, and cry, ‘It is thy last.’



“For fur­ther I could say, ‘This man’s un­true,’

And knew the pat­terns of his foul be­guil­ing;

Heard where his plants in oth­ers’ orch­ards grew,

Saw how de­ceits were gil­ded in his smil­ing;

Knew vows were ever brokers to de­fil­ing;

Thought char­ac­ters and words merely but art,

And bas­tards of his foul adul­ter­ate heart.



“And long upon these terms I held my city,

Till thus he ’gan be­siege me: ‘Gentle maid,

Have of my suf­fer­ing youth some feel­ing pity,

And be not of my holy vows afraid:

That’s to ye sworn, to none was ever said;

For feasts of love I have been call’d unto,

Till now did ne’er in­vite, nor never woo.



“ ‘All my of­fences that abroad you see

Are er­rors of the blood, none of the mind;

Love made them not: with ac­ture they may be,

Where neither party is nor true nor kind:

They sought their shame that so their shame did find;

And so much less of shame in me re­mains,

By how much of me their re­proach con­tains.



“ ‘Among the many that mine eyes have seen,

Not one whose flame my heart so much as warm’d,

Or my af­fec­tion put to the smal­lest teen,

Or any of my leis­ures ever charm’d:

Harm have I done to them, but ne’er was harm’d;

Kept hearts in liv­er­ies, but mine own was free,

And reign’d com­mand­ing in his mon­archy.



“ ‘Look here, what trib­utes wounded fan­cies sent me,

Of paled pearls and ru­bies red as blood;

Fig­ur­ing that they their pas­sions like­wise lent me

Of grief and blushes, aptly un­der­stood

In blood­less white and the en­crim­son’d mood;

Ef­fects of ter­ror and dear mod­esty,

En­camp’d in hearts, but fight­ing out­wardly.



“ ‘And, lo, be­hold these tal­ents of their hair,

With twis­ted metal amor­ously em­pleach’d,

I have re­ceived from many a sev­eral fair,

Their kind ac­cept­ance weep­ingly be­seech’d,

With the an­nex­ions of fair gems en­rich’d,

And deep-brain’d son­nets that did amp­lify

Each stone’s dear nature, worth, and qual­ity.



“ ‘The dia­mond—why, ’twas beau­ti­ful and hard,

Whereto his in­vised prop­er­ties did tend;

The deep green em­er­ald, in whose fresh re­gard

Weak sights their sickly ra­di­ance do amend;

The heaven-hued sap­phire and the opal blend

With ob­jects man­i­fold: each sev­eral stone,

With wit well blazon’d, smiled or made some moan.



“ ‘Lo, all these trophies of af­fec­tions hot,

Of pens­ived and sub­dued de­sires the tender,

Nature hath charged me that I hoard them not,

But yield them up where I my­self must render,

That is, to you, my ori­gin and en­der;

For these, of force, must your ob­la­tions be,

Since I their al­tar, you em­pat­ron me.



“ ‘O, then, ad­vance of yours that phrase­less hand,

Whose white weighs down the airy scale of praise;

Take all these similes to your own com­mand,

Hal­low’d with sighs that burn­ing lungs did raise;

What me your min­is­ter, for you obeys,

Works un­der you; and to your audit comes

Their dis­tract par­cels in com­bined sums.



“ ‘Lo, this device was sent me from a nun,

Or sis­ter sanc­ti­fied, of holi­est note;

Which late her noble suit in court did shun,

Whose rarest hav­ings made the blos­soms dote;

For she was sought by spir­its of richest coat,

But kept cold dis­tance, and did thence re­move,

To spend her liv­ing in eternal love.



“ ‘But, O my sweet, what la­bour is’t to leave

The thing we have not, mas­ter­ing what not strives,

Play­ing the place which did no form re­ceive,

Play­ing pa­tient sports in un­con­strained gyves?

She that her fame so to her­self con­trives,

The scars of battle ’sca­peth by the flight,

And makes her ab­sence vali­ant, not her might.



“ ‘O, par­don me, in that my boast is true:

The ac­ci­dent which brought me to her eye

Upon the mo­ment did her force sub­due,

And now she would the caged cloister fly:

Re­li­gious love put out Re­li­gion’s eye:

Not to be temp­ted, would she be im­mured,

And now, to tempt, all liberty pro­cured.



“ ‘How mighty then you are, O, hear me tell!

The broken bos­oms that to me be­long

Have emp­tied all their foun­tains in my well,

And mine I pour your ocean all among:

I strong o’er them, and you o’er me be­ing strong,

Must for your vic­tory us all con­gest,

As com­pound love to physic your cold breast.



“ ‘My parts had power to charm a sac­red nun,

Who, dis­cip­lined, ay, di­eted in grace,

Be­lieved her eyes when they to as­sail be­gun,

All vows and con­sec­ra­tions giv­ing place:

O most po­ten­tial love! vow, bond, nor space,

In thee hath neither sting, knot, nor con­fine,

For thou art all, and all things else are thine.



“ ‘When thou im­pressest, what are pre­cepts worth

Of stale ex­ample? When thou wilt in­flame,

How coldly those im­ped­i­ments stand forth

Of wealth, of fi­lial fear, law, kindred, fame!

Love’s arms are peace, ’gainst rule, ’gainst sense, ’gainst shame,

And sweetens, in the suf­fer­ing pangs it bears,

The aloes of all forces, shocks, and fears.



“ ‘Now all these hearts that do on mine de­pend,

Feel­ing it break, with bleed­ing groans they pine;

And sup­plic­ant their sighs to your ex­tend,

To leave the bat­tery that you make ’gainst mine,

Lend­ing soft audi­ence to my sweet design,

And cre­dent soul to that strong-bon­ded oath

That shall prefer and un­der­take my troth.’



“This said, his wa­tery eyes he did dis­mount,

Whose sights till then were lev­ell’d on my face;

Each cheek a river run­ning from a fount

With brin­ish cur­rent down­ward flow’d apace:

O, how the chan­nel to the stream gave grace!

Who glazed with crys­tal gate the glow­ing roses

That flame through wa­ter which their hue en­closes.



“O father, what a hell of witch­craft lies

In the small orb of one par­tic­u­lar tear!

But with the in­und­a­tion of the eyes

What rocky heart to wa­ter will not wear?

What breast so cold that is not warmed here?

O cleft ef­fect! cold mod­esty, hot wrath,

Both fire from hence and chill ex­tinc­ture hath.



“For, lo, his pas­sion, but an art of craft,

Even there re­solved my reason into tears;

There my white stole of chastity I daff’d,

Shook off my sober guards and civil fears;

Ap­pear to him, as he to me ap­pears,

All melt­ing; though our drops this dif­fer­ence bore,

His poison’d me, and mine did him re­store.



“In him a plen­it­ude of subtle mat­ter,

Ap­plied to cau­tels, all strange forms re­ceives,

Of burn­ing blushes, or of weep­ing wa­ter,

Or swoon­ing pale­ness; and he takes and leaves,

In either’s apt­ness, as it best de­ceives,

To blush at speeches rank, to weep at woes,

Or to turn white and swoon at tra­gic shows:



“That not a heart which in his level came

Could ’scape the hail of his all-hurt­ing aim,

Show­ing fair nature is both kind and tame;

And, veil’d in them, did win whom he would maim:

Against the thing he sought he would ex­claim;

When he most burn’d in heart-wish’d lux­ury,

He preach’d pure maid, and prais’d cold chastity.



“Thus merely with the gar­ment of a Grace,

The na­ked and con­cealed fiend he cover’d;

That th’ un­ex­per­i­ent gave the tempter place,

Which like a cher­ubin above them hover’d.

Who, young and simple, would not be so lover’d?

Ay me! I fell; and yet do ques­tion make

What I should do again for such a sake.



“O, that in­fec­ted mois­ture of his eye,

O, that false fire which in his cheek so glow’d,

O, that forced thun­der from his heart did fly,

O, that sad breath his spongy lungs be­stow’d,

O, all that bor­row’d mo­tion seem­ing owed,

Would yet again be­tray the fore-be­tray’d,

And new per­vert a re­con­ciled maid!”

